
Shion summoned the three and asked them directly.

And the three brothers responded as if it were natural,

「Of course, Nee-san! Whether it’s our old man, or uncle, we will defeat them!」

「Yeah! We will show our seriousness!」

「Fuu~ fuu fuu! My stomach is growling.」

His stomach is growling……?[1]

For an instant, Shion thought ‘What is this guy talking about?’, however she splendidly ignored it.

Oh well, since he’s fat, it couldn’t be helped that it would growl. However, Shion never thought that it would ever manifest in a form of motivation.

However, it was troublesome for her to tsukkomi it.

It will be alright if the people in question are ok. The problem might actually be their uncle.

「Dagruel has a younger brother?」

「Yes! It seems our old man has two.

One of them is our old man’s aide, but I’ve never met the other one.」

「They said that he’s a dangerous person so it seems he had to be sealed because of that, right?」

「Oh well, it will be easy-peasy if you entrust the task to us!」

When the third son Debura said so, for some reason Shion became uneasy.

Oh well, they are her cute subordinates who had became strong enough to equal the former Demon Lord standard. She decided to believe in them, and she succeeded in pushing away her uneasiness.

To such a Shion,

「However, for such an upright person as Dagruel-dono to turn out to be a traitor…… it was something hard to believe.」

Adalman said so while letting out a sigh.

When he was installing the transfer magic formation, Dagruel was quite cooperative, and he got along well with Adalman who also had an upright character.

Therefore, Adalman felt that it was simply too unbelievable.

「Oh well, it seems he was was acquainted with the person who calls himself Velda, so he might have some kind of old ties with him.」

Shion concluded so.

No matter what was said, holding back against him was unnecessary, as he was an enemy.

After all, Shion would not forgive that Velda-scum who had babbled such nonsense like destroying her dearest master Rimuru.

If Dagruel is assisting that person, that would be the same as telling Shion you’d like to die, huh?.

If it were the old Shion, she would have gone ahead and attacked by herself and struck him with all her might.

「Fu. If you think about it, I have also become well rounded.」

Shion sprouted a smile, she was satisfied with the growth of her heart.

「Eh? Shion-sama isn’t round at all[2]!?」

Because Debura shouted in surprise, Shion struck his stomach with her hand like she was going to gouge his stomach.

It was the so-called corkscrew punch.

「You shit-for-brains――I’ll kill you!!」

So, she spat those words at Debura (the third son) who crouched down on the ground.

Debura was someone that no matter how much he ate, the nutrients just went to his sides and never did reach his brain.

He was the number one fool among the trio.

「Th-this reward is――」

Debura had a joyful smile on his face for some reason and then fainted.

His two older brothers who saw this envied him, the other two brothers are fools as well.

Shion imagined a cold sweat going down her back. ‘What a frightening bunch’, she thought.

Gradually she has begun to not need to hold back against them. If only assessed from durability, the three brothers would rank first place without a doubt.

In this world, there are really frightening people. In various meanings[3].

Whilst Shion was thinking about this, she immediately turned her attention and glared at the approaching troops of Dagruel to her front.

With a simple『Magic Power Perception』, she investigated Dagruel’s army.

She perceived some people with large amounts of energy. However, only a few of them were worth watching out for. If it’s with her current power, enemies that she should be cautious to that extent did not exist.

However, that’s assuming that the results of the『Magic Power Perception』were accurate.

At least the Demon Lord Dagruel seems to be a martial artist who had had a one vs one battle against Veldora in the past. Shion’s perception hadn’t perceived anyone who had such huge power amongst the troops.

That reminded her……

Suddenly Shion remembered it. That Veldora and Dagruel had talked about training to suppress their magic power.

(No, it can’t be. It’s not something that can be so easily attained. I want to think that……)

However, she felt that it was possible when she thought about the growth speeds of Dagruel’s sons and their foolish tenacity.

‘I’ll think about it when the time comes’, thus Shion made up her mind after she gave up thinking about it.

Dagruel’s army had shown its perfect appearance.

Chain of Restraint Titan Army, total number 100.000.

Shion’s army was advantageous in number. Yet it might be inferior in terms of quality.

There were Giant Ogres and Cyclops. Even big shots like some Hecatoncheires[4] of the Titan races.

Various types of giants were approaching in crowds.

In Shion’s honest impression, ‘No matter how many bones there are, it wouldn’t matter, right?’ or so she thought.

「Oh dear, what a magnificent view. This may be a bit harsh for my cute skeletons.」

「A bit?」

「……somewhat, it’s a bit tough, but they should manage somehow or another.」

「Ho….. do you have a plan?」

「Hmm, I can’t say it’s a plan, but Albert’s command abilities are quite good.

In addition, please look at them properly. The equipment of the Pawn Soldiers are complete.」

Shion noticed it as Aldaman said it to her.

Needless to say about the Death Knights, the Pawn Soldiers were equipped with leather armor.

It was the best quality goods with the Tempest mark and made in the dwarf’s workshop.

The Pawn Knights were, surprisingly, only equipped with simple breastplates.

They seemed to be stingily made with demon steel exclusively for the skeletons to use, but the performance was guaranteed. Judging from the dull light they’re emitting, they might be charged magic items.

As one might expect, the Zombie Soldiers received cheap makeshift equipment……

「Hey…… aren’t you overdoing things? How did you obtain that amount of demon steel?」

「What? It was an easy matter. From various sources, like the melted cheap equipment from adventurers, or iron ores I procured via Arnaud.

Oh yes, from everyone of the imperial soldier before, it was a joyous thing for there were so many people who had quite good equipment!

However, the most delicious was the Iron Golem Subjugation though.」

Shion understood Adalman’s explanation whom had been speaking in a cheerful voice.

He was not just playing inside the labyrinth, it seemed that he was also steadily collecting materials.

Among the monsters included in the golem group which sometimes appears, Iron Golems contain an abundance of iron. Whenever such a monster was defeated, he would store it inside the labyrinth, and then high quality demon steel was completed before anyone realizes.

Whilst doing combat training against Iron Golems, material can be collected too. It was precisely killing two birds with one stone.

As things are now, the other floor guardians might do something to raise money too.

(Tte, by any chance has he been earning more money than me!?)

Shion is a former monster and doesn’t have any deep attachments towards money. However, she has recently been having quite a hard time thinking of a way to prepare equipment for her subordinates.

In the first place, Shion was always unconcerned about money and other such things. It was only a recent change for her to begin paying attention to such matters. ‘It’s ridiculous for me to make money’, and thus Shion didn’t have any money.

The first priority of the workshops of Tempest was the second army led by Gerudo.

Recently, the equipment had been distributed to all of its members, though the maintenance was also a problematic issue since there are a lot of members. Since the equipment was made from demon steel, it would repair itself from the majority of damage, however it was also a fact that it was mostly used up for them.

Next was the businesses for selling to the adventurers.

Because this was a national policy, it could be that the aim is to earn foreign currencies, so Shion couldn’t interfere.

Thus, by reserving her free time, she had laboriously obtained the equipment through wholesale.

Of course, it was for free.

Because, they were all things that had been made by the blacksmiths for practice, which were then handed over to her.

She hadn’t had any dissatisfaction until now, however it was not amusing for her that the simple Pawn Soldiers were equipped with magic armor.

Before the Empire came to attack, she had received a number of sets of armor from Rimuru. They were beautiful full plates all with a certain bluish purple color.

However, it was only given to the members of Yomigaeri and the commanders, it had not been distributed to the newcomers that had recently joined. For them, the similarities in their equipment were limited to the color.

Since it couldn’t be helped, she was going to report it to Rimuru with the thought of getting new equipment, but……

After seeing how the newcomer Adalman hadn’t relied on Rimuru and had prepared the equipment by himself, it made Shion have second thoughts.

‘It seems I have depended too much on Rimuru-sama’ so.

(What a guy! I will display that we can procure equipment by ourselves!)

Suddenly, Shion mustered her motivation.

Regardless, in front of them stood an army of giants in large suits of armor. Materials that they were free to take.

「Listen you guys. I won’t say much. But do you guys understand what you need to do?」

「「「Uooooooo!! One’s equipment is gained by one’s own efforts!!」」」

In response to Shion’s question, the elite corps displayed their motivation.

Shion nods satisfied to that.

Adalman, who was next to her, felt that something was a little off, however he couldn’t quite place it.

Adalman, because he has a perspective similar to that of a human, he had bribed the craftsmen through various means in order to receive the equipment.

He wouldn’t say unreasonable things such as ‘Do it for free!’ like Shion.

(Not good. It would be better for me to not say anything to Shion-dono.)

Yesterday, a guy had suddenly appeared and claimed that Rimuru was dead, Aldaman had a hard time calming Shion down.

‘Rimuru-sama won’t perish that easily!’ He had frantically calmed Shion, ‘The blessing hasn’t disappeared, so in the worst case he may have been sealed somewhere’ was how he tried to convince Shion into calming down.

However,

「Sealed you say!? Then, I must leave immediately in order to help him!!」

To Shion who began to say unreasonable things,

「The enemy’s commander is approaching!

Umm, if it’s the person named Dagruel, he might know about the details!」

He said that, and thus succeeded in turning Shion’s anger towards the enemy.

Even this time, with the matter about the armor, he had nearly ended up picking a fight with Shion, as such he was scared about whether she would snatch the Pawn Soldiers’ armor.

No, Adalman certainly thought that it wasn’t strange to make a comparison about the quality of the equipment even though the Pawn Soldier are small fry compared to Shion’s Elite corps.

Adalman had felt relieved since he was splendidly able to divert Shion’s attention away.

The tongue is the origin of calamity. Saying needless things will just catch Shion’s interest, and dwelling on it any further could be dangerous, was what Adalman thought.

Therefore, he pointed her aggression towards the enemy,

「Well then, Shion-dono. May I perform the opening strike?」

He asked.

He was worried that if he did as he pleased, afterwards there would be complaints from her.

If Shion was the one who opened the battle, he would only be able to support. Since it would be impossible for him to use his large scale attacks as he would hit his allies as well once both army collides.

So if possible, he wanted to be the one who opened the battle, however…... that was solely up to Shion’s decision.

「Very well, I will permit you to do it. You better rampage to your heart’s content!」

Shion gave permission whilst in high spirits, as the prospect of obtaining equipment was in sight.

Shion’s cold eyes gazed like a predator who had her prey in sight.

When Adalman heard Shion’s words,

「Thank you very much. Well then!」

He bowed to Shion and moved elsewhere.

Shion who saw that, laughed lightly.

‘To the ones who mock the Great Demon Lord Rimuru, die!

And if by any chance Rimuru-sama is sealed, I will show that I will rescue him.’

Those were her thoughts.

By the way, she was satisfied as she seemed to be about to be able to renew her subordinates’ equipment and also able to go wild against a suitable foe.

At the same time, in her mind, a cool-headed calculation was being carried out.

Though their numbers surpass the enemy’s, they were inferior in terms of quality. She mustn’t look down on this battle.

Worst case scenario, even if she loses her entire army, she thought that it may be necessary in order to defeat Dagruel.

In the sky and on the ground.

Since when being attacked from two sides, the defense will immediately collapse should one of the sides be defeated.

Even in the worst case, this side must absolutely not be defeated.

Shion engraved that fact in her mind whilst conversing with the fools and Adalman.

Glancing at Dagura, Ryura, and Debura, the three that are Dagruel’s sons, Shion thought even further.

How strong is Dagruel, truly?

Dagruel seems to have two younger brothers too, and the ability of those two are yet unknown.

They are opponents that she must never be careless with.

Even so, the victor will be me!

Shion smiled fearlessly still.

Her smile encouraged her allies and gave them strength.

The battle would begin soon.

* * *

[1] EN: For once, I have to agree with Shion's tsukkomi.

[2] It’s a pun that doesn’t translate well. The pun is: Shion says: 私も丸くなったものだ. 丸くなった means her personality become rounded/mellowed. Someone that is rounded (belly) is fat, so the Dagura heard it and interpret it as: I have become fat / gain weight). Hence the pun…

[3] Yeah, like how there’re three creepy M who adores you. XD

[4] https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hecatoncheires The singular form: Hecatoncheir (meaning “Hundred-Handed Ones"), also called the Centimanes. They are a giant/Titan with a hundred arms.





Chapter 206: Vs Dagruel Part 2


Adalman stood on the back of the Death Dragon, Wenti, as he glared at the ground.

Wenti who was soaring high in the sky with her original appearance, that of a wicked dragon, was scattering around an ominous aura.

Human who have weak resistance will die just by being exposed to her aura. However, on the contrary it gives power to Adalman.

‘Fumu’ with a nod, Adalman began thinking.

Making pre-battle statements would be futile as the oppositions opinion was so far off.

Against Dagruel’s army, which already invaded and trespassed the national borders, even warning is meaningless.

If that’s the case, he decided that it might be okay for him to cast a very flashy extreme magic as the sign of the start of the war.

Adalman begins to chant the incantation.

Though he can use it without chanting, he lengthily chants it because of old habits and spiritual buildup.

However, this incantation of his, he thought that chanting it properly is better than going the easy route.

The reason why is, it can’t be used inside the labyrinth――or rather, it was unusable due to him lacking the magic power while he was alive――he had the knowledge, but this is the first time he’s decided to use the magic for real.

If it's for a flashy magic, then it will be good. Such was his idea.

Trying not to be too eager chanting the incantation for the first time in his life, he looks at the ground and determine the sphere of influence of the magic.

He didn’t care whether it will activate or not.

According to the ancient documents, it’s an extreme magic that needs several Archmages to activate it.

It’d be funny if he couldn’t invoke the magic, fortunately there’s no witnesses here. So, he will just cast a different magic at that time.

(Well now, this magic will become the signal for the start of the war. Please succeed!)

While Adalman prayed so, the perfect magic mastery effect of the Ultimate Gift 『Necromicon』is activated.

Adalman’s knowledge is being corrected by Seeker of Truth, and words are engraved into his mind. It seems that if he succeed in chanting the spell in the first time, he will be able to invoke the magic immediately for the second time.

(Ah, I see…… in this case, I understand that chanting the incantation is not necessary.)

Filled with a pleasant feeling of fulfillment, Adalman understood his ability.

And then ――[1]

「Well then, you better experience this properly――an ancient extreme magic[2]――”Tempest Meteor[3]”!!」

――In an instant, glittering dazzling lights pours down from the magic formation that appeared suddenly in the sky.

It’s as beautiful as the wonder of a starry night……. However, it’s a dreadful light that brings forth death and destruction.

Even though it’s a grand magic that would need several Archmages of old to successfully cast, the completed extreme magic of Adalman is several levels above it in scale and power. And it’s magic that starts with Tempest in its name symbolizing their country.

With the correction of Ultimate Gift『Necromicon』, he had shown this world the perfected result.

The best that the past Archmages able to summon were just several meteorites.

Even so, it was a grand magic of strategic-class showing a great effect as anti-army magic, but…… the number of meteorites summoned by the magic that Adalman invoked exceeds 1.000.

The ground is rained down by meteorites with diameter of 50cm~1m, spreading death to Dagruel’s troops.

Even if the giants are known for their superior regeneration power, there’s no meaning if they received damage they can’t regenerate. The limbs that tried to catch the meteorite are blown off, and their heads are crushed.

The giant race who intended to invade with their huge power is at their wit’s end as they weren’t even able to escape.

The extreme magic that Adalman cast showed more effect than he had intended.

Only by one magic, nearly one third of Dagruels army became unable to fight.

「Look, Gadra. As I expected, my magic is wonderful right?」

Surprised by the result having more effect than expected, Adalman boasts it to his companion, Gadra, like it’s natural.

Because his bone face doesn’t have an expression, he’s safe knowing that his true feelings weren’t exposed.

Being able to boast to the man who is his rival is the greatest thing, above all else.

It was not amusing for Gadra who came to this war against his will, but he can’t help admitting the power of Adalman’s extreme magic.

For Gadra-roushi who is a newcomer, he wanted to attain some achievement.

You see, since he earned his affiliation with Demon Lord Rimuru only by deserting the Empire, it was painful, not being useful at all.

This war was a competition for the hegemony of this world. He thought, if he couldn’t be useful now, he’d end up being useless throughout in his career history.

Although he’s taken part in the discussion of various researches, he’s not satisfied with just that.

「Humph. Shut up! I will show you the real extreme magic!

It’s just that, because my magic power is not enough, could I have you cooperate with me……

(Rather, what the heck is this guy, how can he learn such magic!? His forte should be Divine Magic and Undead Magic though……

This kind magic is my specialty you know…… I’m, sad.)」

Gadra with Adalman’s cooperation commencing the chant of the incantation while harboring an indescribable feeling.

Gadra receives the aid of Ultimate Gift『Grimoire』and understand the principle of the incantation as well as Adalman.

(Indeed, this is really wonderful! Unfortunately, I didn’t have enough energy even with my magic power……)

Gadra regrets that he’s unable use the magic just with his own power, but it can’t be helped and he come to a clear decision.

He had reincarnated repeatedly and was proud of his enormous amounts of energy, far more than most people, but compared with the high-ranking of Tempest, he is just an insignificant person.

There’re frustrated feelings of being defeated by Adalman who once was his rival, but he understands that being prideful is useless.

So he chooses the strongest magic in his knowledge and begins to chant it.

The highest level of darkness magic that even Adalman don’t know.

While Adalman just used probably one of the highest level summoning spells. If Adalman is able to use summoning arts, it’s not strange that its application usage reached the ultimate level.

‘Then, with the highest level of darkness magic he’s most skillful in, let’s show it in this place!’ Gadra thought so.

And――

「Oh thou who suffers in everlasting starvation, heed my call! “Nihilistic Hazard[4]”!!」

The strongest of Divine Magic is the ultimate anti-personnel destruction magic “Disintegration” which is well-known.

It’s known that there’re a few people who can use it, but its high power is guaranteed.

It’s said that person who receives a direct hit and can survive doesn’t exist[5]. However, if there’s weakness of this magic, it might be that it’s a single target magic.

The attack range is extremely short. It was a natural reason why the magic has a high power, but against an army it was a useless magic.

Because he’s well informed about this matter, it might be why Adalman used the strongest spell in summoning magic――

――And what Gadra chose was the opposite of “Disintegration”, the strongest large-scale annihilation spell of darkness magic.

A very large magic formation emerges on the ground and the sky.

And, like connecting the sky and the ground, dark electric discharge begun to appear――and innumerable spheres of electricity were released.

The fang of darkness that swallows all substances.

It’s darkness magic that brings void to this world and is considered as one of the forbidden spells.

The void let loose in the world doesn’t vanish until it’s negative energy turns null.

Everyone inside the barrier of the magic formation that links the ground and the sky is devoured and their existence is erased.

It was one of the ultimate magics that was feared, as a mistake in its control can bring destruction to the world.

「Wahahahaha! How’s that! Amazing right!?」

「You fool! What are you thinking! If I didn’t help you, you would absolutely fail to control it you know?!」

「Th, that’s might be right, but I want to be in the spotlight too!」

「That’s not an excuse! To use such dangerous magic……」

Adalman is stunned.

Certainly, as this world might be destroyed if Gadra fails his control of the magic, Gadra can’t make any excuse.

He was confident in his control, but he almost loses his consciousness as he didn’t have enough energy.

He succeeded in his experiment before with his own energy, and the best he could do was to confine several people inside the field. It’s only to the degree of better than an anti-personnel spell.

It was barely a success at that time, but it would end with casualty that a village disappeared in case he failed in his control.

That’s because he was only putting a little energy in it, when he put enormous magic essence to invoke the magic like what they done right now, the world will be really in crisis.

But, that’s only the story if he failed.

「We-well, it’s all good right. It’s a success!」

Gadra who’s not reflecting, could be called as a degenerate mad genius.

Adalman letting out a given up sigh as he recalled the thing.

It would be useless even if he says anything anyway, in fact, there’s no problem since he succeeded.

Besides, they seemed to succeed in greatly reducing the number of the enemy’s army with two extreme magic.

As the giant race could be said as a lump of energy, they seem not to be totally annihilated as they can counter the minus energy.

But still, when compared to their original number, the number had already decreased by a half. Normally in such situation people would give up the war and withdraw.

Then what will be their choice……?

With that thought, Adalmans group would breathlessly witness it with their eyes.

――The Giants continue their attack without minding the death of their comrades.

Those who avoided instant death regenerated from their damage with their transcendence regeneration like it was nothing ――They didn’t show any behavior indicating that they mind about their decrease in number.

Their appearance is very eerie and aroused fear to those who opposed them.

But that’s in case the people who fight them had a sense of fear.

Adalman and co are fed up after seeing the attitude of Dagruel’s army.

「Good grief…… Do those people didn’t feel fear?」

「Not at all, I guess. Usually when thinking about countermeasures, they should have pull back immediately.」

Looking at each other face, the two nod in agreement of each other’s thoughts.

「Should we fall back?」

「Yeah. We used too much magic power. Let’s withdraw.

However, I’m glad that my corps is the Immortal Legion, which don’t fear death.

The Giant race army, which thought nothing of death, they’re more difficult than a mere death soldier……」

「Completely. But, it’s good that we can reduce their number here.

They’re still a threat even with such number, but they would be defeated if the clash begins as they didn’t know anything.」

「There’s no meaning having the advantage of number. Oh well, let’s return and report it to Shion-dono」

Adalman caressed the head of the Death Dragon Wenti and gave her an order to withdraw.

He succeeded in the opening by delivering a blow to the enemy with his magic accordingly to his original objective. There’s no need to stay too long in the place.

He comes back quickly as he need to report the threat of Dagruel’s army.

Their fearsome points were their immovable mind and their super regeneration.

Even though it’s possible to revive the Immortal Legion, it would be of course impossible if they were crushed into small pieces.

He has the premonition that the giants with their overwhelming destructive power will trample on the Immortal legion.

Oh well, that’s fine.

Anyway, Adalman think that it’s good as long as they’re able to decrease the number of the giants.

(At any rate, I need to return and discuss about this.)

Adalman returned to the camp while thinking about what would happen later.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

The total number of Chain of Restrain Titan Army was approximately 100.000.

For his army to be reduced by about 50.000 before the clash with the enemy main force, even for Dagruel, it was a miscalculation

For Dagruel, however, he didn’t feel the loss at all.

That is because the people killed by the magic had little strength and have no luck.

It’s true that it was a splendid magic.

But, falling back due to what can be assumed as anti-group magic is something that a soldier couldn’t do.

In fact, the steps of the true main force of the people he trusted will not be hindered by anyone.

The magic a while ago was certainly splendid.

Probably it’s the work of that Ghost King named Adalman who visited him to construct the transfer magic formation before.

As expected, he has a superb ability.

And also his magician friend who looks like a wise man, it wouldn’t be strange if the second magic is his work.

They’re a wonderful people. As an enemy, they make his heart excited.

It just unfortunately, Dagruel can’t be defeated by magic.

Because, as a true giant, he has the absolute ability called『Magic Nullity』.

By activating the Anti Magic Guard (Absolute Magic Defense), it will automatically neutralize all magic attacks.

As long as he has this ability, he can ignore all magic attacks.

Therefore, people who killed by the current magic are weak and an existence which can to be thrown away.

Suddenly, he thinks about his sons, Dagura, Ryura and Debura, those three.

They’re going to fight against him, but what kind of fight they will show to him?

His sons whom only have big power because he raised them indulgently, but their actual ability is not really much.

Everyone around Dino said that handing over the throne to those sons are fine, though he ignored it…..

It’s must be the work of that crafty guy. Anyway, he let him corrupt his sons, and it might be a compliment that he thought to add them as his subordinates.

……Or possibly, his aim might be actually was to deprave Dagruel and making him retire after foreseeing this current situation.

As a matter of fact, he was anticipating the current, this situation.

――By depraving and making Dagruel retire, is it possible to escape from Veldanava’s rule?

‘Am I thinking into it too much?’ so Dagruel denied the thought .

That good-natured friend of his is also affiliated with Velda. That’s right, we two can’t go against Velda’s order.

Because it’s absolutely impossible to go against their creator master.

But, in case of his sons, they’re released from that curse.

(That’s right, I….. Did I wish for my sons to live freely?)

Even so, Dagruel won’t hold back if they stand in front of him as an enemy.

(They should be stronger. At least, they could last for a bit against me.)

Dagruel has no hesitation.

He only accomplishes his mission.

Simple and frank, as he was a soldier.

And so――

The power of the Giants sweep over this battlefield.

* * *

[1] In case you just realize, the Author omitted the incantation XD.

[2] 極大魔法 Kyokudai Mahou, if you watch or read Magi you’ll know about this word.

[3] 爆覇流星嵐 Bakuha ryuseiran : Supreme Exploding Meteor Storm.

[4] 絶牙虚無災害 Zekkibakyomu saigai : Severing Fang Nihility Calamity

[5] There’s though





Chapter 207: Vs Dagruel Part 3


Dagruel's forces continued marching forward.

Although the lines crumbled for a short period, by the time they made contact with the Immortal Legion the lines had already reformed.

Accepting the deaths of their comrades as though nothing has happened, they overcame the hurdle and continued moving onward.

Within their eyes, was their absolute faith and fealty to Dagruel.

The giants marched onwards, embodying the statement "There is nothing to fear!".

2 hours after the battle started.

The battlefield had fallen into a stalemate.

The majority of the giants were roughly 3~5m in height, among them were also super big individuals towering at 10m in height.

At first the giants pushed against the Immortal Legion making use of their size, crushing the skeletons as though twigs, but as time passed the situation changed like the flip of a coin.

Because of Adalman's usage of his Undead magic's ultimate arts.

Using the scattered bodies of the Skeletons, Giant Skeletons were summoned. And what these huge bodies equipped, were Magic Weapons that are made from fusing together heaps of magic steel weapons.

As the vessel was composed from the unity of many Grudges of the Dead, the weapons that they previously wielded adapted and changed to suit their present form.

With that, multiple Skeleton Giants at 7m in height were created.

While the giants were making up for their handicap in numbers with their combat prowess and size, they started to lose that advantage with the emergence of the Giant Skeletons.

The Immortal Legion was clad in a holy aura, with Heal Rain (Light of Recovery), which would normally burn them to cinders, being cast over them by Adalman; this gave a new meaning to the word "undying".

They would recover on the spot, no matter how much they get battered and broken.

But, the giants weren't losing out either.

Whatever injuries that are inflicted upon their bodies, as long as it isn't fatal damage, they will steadily regenerate and recover.

As neither side has been losing numbers, the situation was just a back and forth of them trading blows.

‘So, what's the plan now.’

On the outer walls, which have been enchanted with a barrier which prevents intrusion from monsters, was Shion, standing atop the highest point and viewing the battlefield with a bird's eye view.

Due to Adalman and Gadra's great magic attack, their forces now outnumber the enemy 3 to 1.

At first they thought they might be able to achieve an overwhelming victory, but according to Adalman's report, the giants showed no fear.

Then he reported something even more troublesome, their Super Regeneration.

Though the Immortal Legion has stopped getting knocked around, the number of casualties for the giants was lower than expected.

While the Big Giants are busy fighting the Giant Skeletons, the Death Knights would move in to finish a foe.

That was the plan of action they decided upon, but it was still easier said than done.

Though Shion's elite guard, the Terror Knights, were kept in reserve, Shion came to the conclusion that even if they were to be mobilized, they wouldn't be able to make much of an impact on the battlefield with their fear inducing abilities.

The reason was obviously because there won't be much of an effect, on enemies that don't feel fear. Chances are the effects would be easily Resisted.

This is troublesome.... Shion thought, as she bit her lip.

Shortly after the battle started, they had a brief strategic meet with Adalman who just returned.

As they can't count on their advantage in numbers, they decided to probe the enemy for information by making use of the Immortal Legion's undead property.

It was a conservative move, but for the sake of discerning the enemy's capabilities, they reached the consensus of avoiding a full scale clash at the very beginning.

In addition, there was a point of concern that Gadra spoke of.

「I found it to be a little perplexing, how did they disperse the “Nihilistic Hazard”....?

To me, it looked as though they were nullifying the magic――」

That was what he said.

As he has spent all his Energy and was unable to cast another volley of Great Magic, it was his intuition as a Great Magic User that gave him the feeling that something was amiss.

The meteor attacks also didn't cause as much damage as was expected, but it was how unnaturally his “Nihilistic Hazard” was dispersed that really gave rise to his suspicions.

It might just be him imagining things, but it's better to take note of this.

It's not like Shion could use magic, but attacks that made use of energy could be affected too. It was expected to at least be wary in case it really happens.

Shion was observing the battlefield, as she thought of such details.

Standing by behind her, were Dagura, Ryuura and Debura.

What they were looking at, was an individual who looks like a commanding officer of Dagruel's forces, who was locked in a duel with Albert.

The officer wielded a great sword like it was part of his body, he showed great pride in his strength, setting him apart from his peers. It looks like Albert is the only one able to stand up against him.

The man moved nimbly and skillfully, uncharacteristic of his bulky build at 3m in height.

Seeing as he is up against the ultra first class swordsmanship from Albert, him being able to battle toe to toe with Albert was abnormal as it is.

「What a strength. To think there would be a warrior who lives by the sword among the giants.」

「Right. That's our old man's adjutant, uncle Grasword.」

Dagura answered, from hearing what Shion muttered.

Grasword. An ultra first rate two handed sword user. And, the second-in-command of the giant forces.

Though his total Energy levels are lower than Dagruel, it is said that his swordsmanship is at a higher level instead.

If you look at it from another perspective, it might be Albert who is the abnormal one, being able to cross swords with such an individual.

He was parrying heavy attacks that would normally crush opponents as though a flowing willow, he's even adding in counterattacks.

It was a feat possible only due to the full set of Gods class equipment he was bestowed with. That was because if it was equipment of Legend class or below, it would have shattered from receiving the first attack.

Due to Grasword's abilities『Magic Immunity』and『Weapon Destruction』.

Normal equipment would be destroyed the moment they made contact. Armor would also be destroyed, and his opponent would then have to receive his killer attacks "naked".

That, was knowledge that was known to only Dagura and his brothers at that moment, and Albert being the only one able to put up a proper fight against him was a coincidence that was nothing short of a miracle.

But, it was ironic that nobody knew, the fact that this coincidence has been narrowly preventing the collapse of the front lines, if you can call it irony that is.

Though the threat was there, as there was someone who was able to stand against and hold back the threat, the danger the threat posed was not noticed by the others.

However, all that was irrelevant to the 2 persons in question. Such things were the least of their worries, as they duked it out ever more intensely.

「Hmm, our old man ain't making his move. Should we move in to face him, if he actually shows movement?」

「Don't be getting excited just yet. It's obvious, but I'll be the one to face him. You boys lead the Terror Knights and prevent any potential interruptions.」

「Roger that. But, it's better to not underestimate our old man.

Though Nee-san might be pretty powerful, our old man's a real monster.」

Shion and co. had such exchanges, while they turned their attention to the main enemy encampment.

There were no signs of movement. But, that instead gave off an extremely ominous atmosphere.

It felt dangerous to make the first move, as there is no movement from the main enemy encampment.

It still didn't feel like the proper opportunity to move her elite forces yet, but the present situation isn't going to change from them just staring at it.

The frustration was starting to set in on Shion.

(Should I just go with an all out attack?)

Right as Shion was contemplating such thoughts.

Suddenly, a change to the situation occurred.

The change was as intense as it was sudden.

「That's....」

Hearing Ryura's muttering, Shion, who was looking at Albert and Grasword's battle, diverted her attention.

A certain individual, was walking out from Dagruel's main encampment.

Wrapped in layer upon layer of chains, was a man who looks like he lost too much weight.

At a height of 2.5m, he was of a smaller frame than what you would expect of the giants.

But, despite being chained all over, the intense presence coming from him drew more attention than any other giant could.

Their natural instincts were appealing desperately, at how dangerous that man is.

「T-that's.... Is that, our uncle that has been sealed for the longest time? 」

「So that's.... Feared and known as the War God, the Rampaging Kishin[1].... Uncle Fenn!?」

「Fueーfue fue fue. I'm gettin' hungry!」

Without saying anything, another corkscrew punch made its way to Debura's gut.

And,

「You had your fill with that? Next time you say something as irrelevant as that, don't think you're gonna survive!」

Shion angrily said her piece.

But, the tension was broken thanks to Debura's dumb interjection.

They began observing that individual, now that they have calmed down.

The chains were writhing and pulsing. There was a smile on the man's face, even though he looked like he was heavily restricted by the weird chains.

The kind of smile, that show just how elated a person is.

A simple probe, showed that his predicted Energy levels surpassed Dagruel.

Shion was surprised.

Though there were many beings that had high Energy levels among her comrades, this made them look like children in comparison.

This, to Shion's knowledge, was at the highest level――it was at the class of the True Dragons, he was comparable to Veldora or Velgrind.

「No shit.... That guy is one heck of a beast! Isn't it pretty much impossible for you boys to face "That"!?」

Shion exclaimed.

It was unexpected that there would be another monster of this level besides Dagruel.

She thought it was excessive, to have 2 members of the 12 Guardians here.

As Demon Lord Ruminas was also here.

No matter how "big" Demon Lord Dagruel was, it shouldn't be too difficult to handle as there was 3 awakened demon lord class beings here, were her thoughts.

But having reached this point, she recognizes how naive that thought was.

She has also noticed, that it was just really good luck, that Albert is able to keep the second-in-command in check all by himself.

「This, is way nastier than what was expected. So that, is our other uncle――Fenn, huh.」

「You don't say, a monster of that level was unexpected, even for me....

Uncle Grasword was bad enough already, uncle Fenn is on a whole other level――」

「Fueーfue fue. That skinny bones, Imma bet I can beat him easily if it's weight we're talking about!」

‘Maybe I should really kill this fatso.’

As Shion was thinking that, something happened to the chained man.

The chains, were being released.

「Those chains, is that Gleipnir!? If that's the case, this would be pretty dangerous yes?」

Gadra-roushi who has been standing by behind them, spoke up to Shion.

As he has used all his Energy earlier, Gadra-roushi has been resting after the end of their meeting, but has woken up from noticing the changes in the battlefield's atmosphere.

「Oh, it's Gadra huh. So, what's that Gleipnir?」

「Right. This is something that has only been passed down in ancient texts....

It is said, that during the age of gods, the dragon emperor sealed an evil god[2].

2 of the 3 brothers turned over a new leaf, but as the remaining sibling chose to retain his brutal nature, he was sealed with the Chains of God.

Gleipnir, are the names of the Chains of God.」

Gleipnir.

Chains that sealed an evil god who emitted immense amounts of Energy.

If the legends are true, the chains will have been absorbing the Energy emitted from the evil god, and have "evolved".

During that time period, these chains were said to be the possession of the dragon emperor, and was able to seal both divine and demonic beings. In the current era, it wouldn't be surprising if it had properties on par with God class artifacts.

But, what was truly terrifying, was not the chains.

The evil god which was sealed by those very chains, was what they needed to be wary of.

「Do you think the stories are true?」

「I'm afraid so.... My advice for the best course of action, would be to retreat.」

Shion frowned, at Gadra's submissive view.

But, it wasn't out of anger.

For someone as aged and knowledgeable as Gadra, there was a certain "weight" for him to give such advice to Shion, whom he is fully aware of her aggressive nature.

That, was a warning, coming from someone who knows how capable the 12 guardians are.

「We will not retreat.

We, have been given orders from Rimuru-sama to defend these lands.

To retreat, would be to go against Rimuru-sama's will.

As of now, as Rimuru-sama is concealing himself, that means we have been given the reins on how we intend to end this great war.

But! That will only happen after we manage the problem that we have here at this location.

We have our orders, and we shall not fail to execute them.

This represents our faith in Rimuru-sama, and also serves to prove that Rimuru-sama's strategies are the proper answer.

Any objections?」

「――There are none.」

「Alright.」

That's right, retreat was out of the question.

To them, retreating would be the same as saying Rimuru's strategy was mistaken, as he was the one who judged that Shion and co. would be able to successfully defend this land.

Such thoughts will never be acknowledged

On the off chance that defeat actually occurs.... That defeat too, would have been accepted as Orders from Rimuru.

Having received Shion's intense will, the disposition of Shion's elite guard changed.

The elite guard standing by at the outer peripheral walls overheard the conversation between Gadra and Shion.

If a conversation isn't conducted privately, the contents are usually transmitted to the vicinity. The elite guard made their preparations, having received Shion's will.

Meanwhile――

Fenn makes his move.

He traverses the battlefield at incredible speeds, moving as though he was the wind itself.

And finishes his sprint by launching an offensive against Adalman, who was at the rear lines supporting his allies with magic.

Adalman, who was supposed to be protected by many layers of magic barriers, was knocked onto the ground in a single blow.

Fenn grasps the initiative of their battle in an instant.

The battlefield was visited by a terrifying silence

「Im, impossible-!! What speed, no, power!?

Adalman constantly protects himself with a myriad of magic barriers, how did he―!?」

Shion shouted.

Such bewildering power. Adalman was brought to the ground, from an attack that was simply a punch brimming with fighting spirit, without the use of any abilities.

Though Death Dragon Wenti immediately went to Adalman's aid, she too was sent flying from a simple Aura Bullet released from Fenn's palm.

After seeing this unreal combat power, Shion wasn't even trying to hide her surprise.

Adalman looks like a rear support type, so it is assumed that he isn't suited to close quarters battles.

Even if that was the case, he still is one of the 12 guardians, evasion via teleporting should have been possible after using high speed cognition.

As he wasn't able to do that, the chances of the opponent having some kind of cognition obstruction effect or ability are now very high.

What an enemy, I need to head to his aid soon――

Just as Shion was thinking about that,

「Fumu. To still spectating, in front of me.... That's some composure you got there, hmm?」

Shion hears a voice behind her.

This is Shion's main camp, so having multiple defensive barriers in place is a no brainer.

It is possible, to ignore all of those barriers, and in addition, to be able to stand behind Shion without her even realizing it?

There's no way that's possible! As Shion thought, and she turns around.

There stood a towering giant.

Standing right on the peripheral wall, right behind Shion.

With his sturdy 3m tall build, it was Demon Lord Dagruel.

She had met him once during Walpurgis, but the King's Haki he is exuding now was incomparable to when she met him in the past.

「You, when did you!?」

「Fumu. I have arrived here, just moments earlier. Could it be, that you didn't see me arrive?

If that's the case, this won't even be a fight. It's starting to feel like a joke trying to take this seriously.」

「This can’t be! I'm not believing this!!」

Shion drew her sword as she shouted.

“Impossible”. Shion was trying to calm herself down by telling herself "He must be bluffing.".

There was no way she was going to accept the fact that a giant just moved to such close proximity of herself without her even managing to see it happen.

Accepting this fact, was almost equal to accepting her defeat.

Shion activates her Unique Skill『Chef』, and using it's matter altering properties, she boosts her own stats.

With her body which has high immortal properties, Shion manages to contain the power which surpasses the limits of what normal beings can handle.

Having reached the output range of an ultimate skill, Shion unleashes a single attack with everything she had.

Shion was planning to defeat Dagruel with this very attack.

「This is bad! The anti-monster barrier on this peripheral wall is going to get blown away with that attack!」

Gadra shouted, as he gets the elite guard to retreat.

Even as she was confirming what was happening at the corner of her vision, Shion went ahead with her slash unto Dagruel.

Dagruel didn't even move.

And, at the very moment Shion's blade was about to make contact with his head――

「HOW NAIVE!!」

He roared.

With enough fighting spirit to shake his surroundings, that pressure alone stopped Shion's swing.

Because of his incredibly dense fighting spirit, Shion's attack didn't even manage to so much as touch Dagruel's skin.

He was every bit of the monster the rumors made him out to be.

「Wha-!?」

Shion's eyes were wide open due to how surprised she was, and she stopped moving for a brief moment.

And, Dagruel wasn't so kind as to miss out on such a critical opening.

「It looks like it's still too early, for someone of your caliber to stand before me.」

With that as his final words for her, he moved towards Shion at speeds she could not perceive and swung his fist down on her.

The peripheral wall crumbles, to the might of his violence.

What happened to Shion, who took a direct hit, was obvious....

This was not something that could be called a "fight".

This was what could be seen as, an absolute being making use of his strength to sweep away an annoyance.

But, at that moment――

「Looks like you're the one who is naive!」

With the sweet scent of roses, a red streak of light flashes and makes contact with Dagruel's head.

From there, descended a silver haired girl.

Wearing a jet black dress, with gold and silver heterochromic eyes which show her shining resolve.

Demon Lord Ruminas.

This was the very moment the ruler of these lands joined the battle.

「Hmph. People like you, usually show openings at the moment of triumph.

As it was a problem for me to break through your defenses, I was observing the situation and letting it pan out waiting for my opportunity.

Looks like you were careless, Dagruel.

Don't think too badly of me, and take a little nap there for the moment.」

As she has said herself, Ruminas has been observing the situation from the very beginning.

She understood that her chances of victory were low, if she were to face Dagruel head on.

Ruminas properly understood the limit of her own abilities, so she didn't think her actions were underhanded.

To fight the battle which she knew she could win. That was her way of life.

She unleashed her most devastating attack, on the careless Dagruel.

As Ruminas was someone who had access to an ability which controlled life and death, it was an attack that had the full intention of slaying her foe.

Which was also why――

「Fumu. So it's Ruminas, huh. And you are right, that I had been careless.

But, could you really say that has been a problem? Did that attack actually damage me?」

Those words caused her to freeze up.

Ruminas was a knowledgeable being, she properly understood what those preposterous words meant.

Which was that Dagruel was unharmed. This event, manages to prove a single fact. That――

「Are you all done now? Now then, it's my turn next.

Brace yourselves! Or it will be over in an instant!!」

As they have not been able to defeat him even with Ruminas' attack, it was a fact that Ruminas' forces would be unable to attain the victory.

A period of despair was beginning.

On these lands, the absolute tyranny of Demon Lord Dagruel was about to sweep across the battlefield.

* * *

[1] Kishin means Fierce God/Oni God, a term for wrathful deities

[2] Akujin (悪神) with Kanji of Evil and God/Deity.





Chapter 208: Vs Dagruel Part 4


The battle between Albert and Grasword grew more intense.

Because each of the commanders were fighting, the chain of command ceased in it’s functioning, as such, the troops fell into disorder.

However, such a matter was a trifling issue for the commanders in question――

Both of them had recognized the other as a worthy opponent and were enjoying the battle.

「Kakakakakaka! Quite the skill you have there, you amazed me.

To have a chance to cross swords with a person like you, it is a great honor as a warrior!」

「This is not by my skill.

Only by these, the equipment which was given to me by my master Rimuru, that have granted me such strength.

If it was with my former equipment, I would already be defeated without being able to so much as endure the pressure of your sword.」

Albert calmly turned aside Grasword’s praise.

It was true, however it was only by Albert’s ability that the power of the God grade equipment was drawn out.

「Ha! No need to be humble. Amongst the Giants, there are only a few who can fight me.

Although we were going to do a pincer attack on Demon Lord Ruminas’ army with the angels ――the situation is now beyond our control.

However, defeating one of the enemy generals is also an important duty. Since there is no lack of opponents!!

Yet…… still, my younger brother Fenn really picked the short straw.

Even though he was this precious opportunity where he can rampage as much as he wants, he received a weak magician as his opponent.

Certainly knowledge is wonderful, as a person that man may have a favorable impression, however……

Because we have『Magic Nullity』, a magician is utterly useless.」

He exclaimed so whilst brandishing his Great Sword.

He planned to make Albert, who was worried about his master, become agitated by his words. A small mistake would lead to death. It was an excellent tactic to induce unrest to the mind of his opponent.

On the other hand, Albert, without changing his expression――

「It seems you are clearly misunderstanding something.

Certainly, I, as the guard of Adalman-sama, am the one in charge of the vanguard.

However, I would like to ask you to not forget this――

Adalman-sama, as one of the 12 Guardian Lords of Rimuru-sama, is far stronger than me!

You understand what that means, right?」

He said that and denied Grasword’s words.

Grasword muttered “Ho?”, and raised one of his eyebrows.

Then he suddenly raise his sword over his head without speaking further.

His strategy to provoke his opponent seemed to have failed, then, in that case he will just beat him from the front. Grasword decided on such a plain and simple tactic.

「Fufufu, is that so? In that case it’s good that Fenn will truly enjoy his battle.

Oh well. Then I shall accomplish my duty!」

And so the intense sword fight restarted.

Their clash reached the climax, before long the two payed no attention to their surroundings, focusing their minds only on their swords.

Being thrown to the ground, Adalman felt that his consciousness was about to disappear for an instant.

He could understand exactly what had occurred. He was able to see the moment the enemy had jumped, matching the timing of the activation of his magic.

Adalman prioritized the incantation of the great magic in order to overturn the situation of the battle.

Even though he could invoke the magic without the chant, it was limited to the image of what he had experienced before.

As for the great magic that he was about to use, He considered that chanting was necessary in order to invoke it successfully, once he had ascertained the situation.

This reasoning came about because he wanted to use his recovered energy effectively. Especially since, after he had invoked the great magic at the beginning, he had kept on invoking spells one after the other.

That was why he thought that it wouldn’t be amusing if the magic incantation that he had been working on, was interrupted part-way, so he focused his concentration on the invocation of said spell.

He had decided such only because he was confident with his defenses against physical attacks, yet......

The enemy’s ability seemed to have surpassed what Adalman had expected.

His multiple barriers were all broken through, hardly even one of his defensive measures showed any effect. If not for that one defensive measure, there was a possibility that Adalman would have received a fatal blow at that moment.

Though, it’s kind of strange to say that he, who is already dead, would receive a fatal wound again.

(How!? For him to penetrate my magic barriers as if he was ignoring them, does that mean that this guy’s ability is actually『Magic Nullity』!?)

Adalman had arrived to the correct answer instantly.

It was fortunate that what Gadra had hinted at before came into his mind.

If that’s the case, he was correct in preparing a defensive measure other than magic.

(Oh well. After all, this magic will have exhausted my magic power.

Whether it’s『Magic Nullity』or anything else, it already doesn’t matter! Rather it’s convenient for me.)

Though he can’t be said to be unharmed, his plan had succeeded.

The great magic that Adalman had chanted activated without any problems.

The invoked magic was called Immortal Legion.[1]

One of the ultimate magics that have a wide area of effect.

Just like the word “Legion” in the spell name suggests, it was the highest level forbidden spell of Undead Magic which uses and turns the dead into soldiers.

The magic transforms and turns the dead in this battle, regardless whether they were allies or enemies, into soldiers faithful to his command.

Giants have a high regeneration power and don’t die easily.

Because superficial injuries would be restored by themselves, it was necessary to destroy them completely.

Therefore there was the need to wait for corpses to build up in the battlefield…… Watching the state of the battlefield, Adalman had decided that it was the time to use the spell.

For that reason he had concentrated in order to chant the magic.

The bodies of the giants scattered on the ground were combined by the huge magic formation that appeared in the sky and on the ground into several lumps of flesh.

Then limbs appeared from the lumps of flesh, and 4m tall giants were born.

Death Giants, that were one size larger than the Death Knights.

Their fighting power greatly surpassed the power they had whilst alive. Not only from their body’s own properties, they also had enormous energy as the souls of the death giants gathered as one.

Originally, they would lose their regeneration ability when they become zombie, but this trait is kept as is.

They were reborn as monsters with fighting power Over A rank which surpasses even the Death Knights.

Though, since there were many bodies which weren’t completely usable, the number of the created Death Giants were only about 1.000, but it was plenty sufficient.

The created Death Giants attacked the other giants who were their former comrades.

Even though Adalman’s magic power had run out after using Healing Rain, he already stood up as if there was no problem.

Once he had glanced around for an instant and made sure that the Death Giant had begun to rampage, he turned his eyes to Fenn who was trampling upon his army.

「Wenti, are you okay?」

「Yes, I have been careless――」

Wenti who quietly turned into her human form, answered Adalman’s question.

Although it was true that she had received severe damage, her recovery finished at the same time she transformed herself into human form.

It was only usable once a day, but the super recovery is activated due to the change of her body constitution.

「No, no, you’re not careless, it’s just that that small stature giant is strong.

You’re being alright is more important.

From what I see, that giant has a body with unbelievably dense energy.

Looks like he has holy attribute, magic won’t work on him.

Had we not change our attribute into holy attribute, we would have been purified.」

Adalman spoke of the facts plainly.

Like a magician, Adalman’s eyes, which looked at Fenn, were like those of a researcher.

(Even so―― That giant is too strong)

Combat Speed, destructive power, and defense power.

Looking from many aspects, he‘s top class, if you only see the amount of his energy, he’s equal to a True Dragon.

Even if Adalman sent Giant Skeletons (Big Skeleton Knight) against him, they would only be smashed up.

「Good grief. It seems that it’s time for my long trained body.」

「Ha?」

At Adalman’s confusing words, the Death Dragon Wenti, who had pledged her loyalty to Adalman, let out a questioning voice.

Not to mention body, Adalman doesn’t even have flesh. He can only be the so-called ‘skeleton’.

Answering Wenti’s question,

「It seems that I haven’t told you about it. When I took the position of ‘great priest’, my job was different.

Originally, I was a high-ranking class of priest and martial artist which was called Holy Fist Monk[2].

Because there was Albert, who is an excellent vanguard, I didn’t need to perform close range combat.

When I fought against you before, I didn’t think that it would be effective against you who had no human form, so there were no opportunities to show my skills, you see.」

「E, well. But that…… you don’t say, you intend to fight against that giant barehanded?」

「What, is there a problem?」

“Errr, aren’t there various problems though?”

Or so Wenti thought, but she couldn’t say it strongly.

She was his long time acquaintance, but she had never seen Adalman’s figure as that of someone who had trained his body.

“Well, is there any meaning to train as a skeleton?” so, she was troubled whether to even ask about it.

「No, there’s……」

Wenti couldn’t answer.

(For Adalman-sama who seems to be an intellectual, unexpectedly――）

She stopped thinking further about it and turned her eyes towards the rampaging Fenn.

「All right. Then, I will tell you the strategy.

As magic doesn’t work, hit with physical attacks. It’s just that.

Even your breath, which could cause magic essence diversion, would be treated as magic.

Therefore, you and me, who have no means with which to attack, our compatibility with him is horrible.

So, here’s a suggestion.」

Saying so, Adalman began to talk about his plan, it was something outside of Wenti’s imagination.

However, Wenti, who believes in Adalman, agreed without any hesitation.

「I leave the rest to you, Adalman-sama. May fortune be with you!」

So she replied with that answer as she relaxed her body.

The plan that Adalman proposed was, assimilation with possession.

Originally, Adalman, as a ghost, is more like a spiritual lifeform.

It could be said that his current state is merely him possessing his dead body (skeleton). The reason is because he needs a temporary body in order to have influence in the physical world.

Therefore, he can easily perform possession. If Wenti doesn’t resist him, it would certainly succeed.

The problem was, it was unknown whether they could separate or not.

「Be relieved. Even if I possess you, it doesn’t mean your consciousness will disappear.

In the worst case, we’ll ask Rimuru-sama to prepare you a new body!]

And so, Adalman possessed Wenti.

A Death Dragon has a strong body, high magical power, and energy. In addition to that, is Adalman’s own magic power.

The possession succeeded, a young man with black hair, clad in jet-black priest clothes, made his appearance.

「Fumu, it was a success.」

(As expected of Adalman-sama!)

The two became one in mind and body.

With a strong body and possessing enormous magic power, it was the youth figure of “Gehenna Lord” Adalman―― though there were some differences such as the hair color being different and etc.

(Fufu, I’m excited after a long time. If it’s in this state, I might have a good fight against Zegion-dono.

I seem to have become an equal with Ultima-jou[3].)

In his skeleton state, he recalled that he couldn’t have an exchange of fists with his friend.

And so, a fearless smile floated on his face as he flew towards the rampaging giant.

He didn’t believe that he could beat the giant as it was now. But he could buy some time.

Besides, though the giant in front of him is an incarnation of violence, it doesn’t seem that he has high skills like the one fighting against Albert.

Although the giant has energy comparable to a True Dragon, he can only rampaging without reason.

For him to aim at Adalaman first may have been because he had reacted towards the one having the highest energy in the army.

(In that case, we might just defeat him if we perform well.)

(It will naturally be possible, if it’s Adalaman-sama!)

Reacting to Wenti’s thought in his mind, though Adalman was slightly surprised, he nodded frankly.

(That’s so, that’s right! Because I am one of Rimuru-sama’s strongest subordinates.)

And so he charged towards Fenn while laughing happily.

The “Seven Celestial Sages” had finished the reconnaissance mission and reported it to Demon Lord Ruminas.

Afterwards, they followed Ruminas who came to the outer district area in order to confront the giants.

And so they would encounter a surprising situation.

There exists a knight who can fight Grasword, who has been called the strongest ‘Sword King’ that ever existed, on equal terms.

The attack of Ruminas, who is their master whom they adore and respect, hadn’t worked against Demon Lord Dagruel.

And the last thing, a person, with a nostalgic face that they remember seeing somewhere, having started a battle against a rampaging giant who was like a berserker, on equal terms.

These three events were things that happened almost at the same time.

「What, what the heck is this!」

「To be fighting evenly against the Sword King, who is that knight?」

「This bad, this is bad! As it is now, Ruminas-sama will lose!!」

「Hey, wait. That person, surely――」

「Adalman, isn’t he Adalman!!」

「Really!? Then, that knight is Albert!!」

「Those two are Demon Lord Rimuru’s subordinates!? What the heck is this joke!?」

Thinking at the same time, the “Seven Celestial Sages” exchanged the information each of them found.

And sharing all of the information at once, they were wrapped in surprise.

Adalman and Albert were famous in the past.

Adalman who was the Great Priest was a talented master of Holy Magic.

Then, Albert was the strongest Holy Knight of the previous generation.

The two were people who had the qualifications to become the Hero. But the Hero’s egg hadn’t dwelled inside either of them.

Normally, they’d become sages. And, as it was, they’d eventually become saints.

If they couldn’t be the Hero, they only became unnecessary people for the “Seven Celestial Sages”. Furthermore, they were both too much of geniuses.

They hadn’t accepted Ruminas’s Mind Rule, as they were affiliated to the church of Ingrasia Kingdom without staying in the Holy Capital.

In other words, according to the “Seven Celestial Sages” the two had been a two-edged sword.

In ability, the two could become strong individuals which could threaten them, or worst, the two could become existences that would even jeopardize their position.

Although the two hadn’t seemed to notice the existence of Demon Lord Ruminas, it was certain that the two had some kind of doubts about it.

Whilst admitting the ability of those two, to they who wouldn’t become their comrades ――

The “Seven Celestial Sages” had manipulated the Pope and ordered for them to do the purification of a large-scale undead disaster.

It was officially announced as an indirect subjugation request, but the two people had strong senses of justice and bit the bait splendidly.

The two willingly went to Great Jura Forest.

And there, the two would perish while bringing down the Dragon Zombie together as the “Seven Celestial Sages” had planned, or it should have been.

「It can’t be, for him to be alive……」

It was the same thought for all of the “Seven Celestial Sages”.

「Well, what should we do? That’s the question.」

「Right now, it’s almost impossible to defeat Adalman and Albert.」

「Besides, in this situation we don’t have such free time as to have internal conflict.」

「That is so……」

「It would be excellent if the two beat both of the giants. If they lose, we won’t be safe.」

「That’s right. We are to only help the princess.」

「I agree. About those two, let’s think about it after they survive.」

The “Seven Celestial Sages” decided on their plan.

Without using any underhanded plans as the situation was a pressing one.

They threw away their wicked thoughts and moved to attack the enemy as according to the initial plan.

They had, in their own ways, began their action in order to help Demon Lord Ruminas who is their respected and adored master.

* * *

[1] 不死者軍団創造 (イモータルレギオン)。Fushisha Gundan Souzou (Imoutaru region) Fushinsha=Immortal, Undead, Gundan=Army, Souzou=creation. Undead Army Creation.

[2] 聖拳導師 Seiken Doushi, Sei=Holy Ken/Kobushi= Fist, Doushi= Monk.

[3] Jou = Miss, lass.





Chapter 209: Sprout of Envy


Guy and Chloe have been locked in combat for 3 consecutive days.

Although neither of them are taking it seriously, fatal attacks are mixed in every so often.

They are probing each other, trying to discern the scope of their opponent's strength.

「Die, Calamity Claw!!」

「Naive.」

Chloe received the attack that Guy released towards her with the Spirit Sword she wielded.

Her Spirit Armament has evolved into a God class weapon. It hasn’t been destroyed, even while she's used it to receive attacks from the “Strongest Demon Lord” Guy.

Not just that, she makes use of the sword's capabilities to repel Guy's attacks.

Chloe moves in for a counterattack.

But, strength escapes from Chloe's body.

「Gofu!!」(TN: it's a coughing/choking sound)

She began coughing up blood, and blood started flowing from her eyes and nose.

The previous attack was supposed to have been perfectly parried. But, that was only what it looked like on the surface.

An attack invisible to the naked eye made contact with Chloe, and was attempting to take her life――

「Die, Calamity Claw!!」

Without any change in expression, Chloe evaded the attack with large exaggerated movements.

Then, she took stance with her sword pointing towards Guy, like nothing had happened.

Her face, which should have been bloodied after receiving Guy's attack, was now back to her normal pretty face as though nothing ever happened.

It was a mysterious phenomenon, as though showing Guy's earlier attack hadn’t happened――

「Ahhahahahaha! As expected of the hero!! Not shabby at all.

I'm pretty amazed you managed to avoid this attack.」

「――Right.」

「You'd probably be dying right about now, if you received that attack instead.」

Chloe gave a mild response, in return to Guy's honest praise.

She didn't give much of a response, to the many other taunts that came after. That was because, she knew what he said was all true...

Which was the reason, for how complicated she felt on the inside.

The attack that Guy used――Calamity Claw――, was an attack that carried an intense poison property.

But it wasn't something on the level of a "poison", it was an attack that infected the target with an infectious virus, which also corrodes the mind, starting from the point of contact.

In fact, Chloe has... Really "died" once to this attack.

Although her absolute defense automatically blocks incoming attacks, it doesn't stop the virus which spread to her from her sword.

As such, Chloe met her demise from the virus that was spread unto her from receiving Guy's attack.

Using Ultimate Skill『Space-Time King (Yog-Sothoth)』, she successfully evades the attack, after "remembering" the memory of dying once in the future.

After experiencing the event once, she returns to the past.

In other words, "remembering" a memory from the future.

To the opponent facing her, it’d simply look like Chloe made the "lucky" choice of evading the attack, but the truth is far from that.

With great confidence, Chloe was making the best choices in defense she could choose.

But, even though she is totally evading Guy's attacks by making use of her ability to "remember" future events, Chloe had no margin for making mistakes.

Compared to Veldora, one of the strongest existences, whom she had battled in the past, she needs to take all of Guy's attacks seriously.

Even though there was no intent of taking the fight seriously from either side, attacks that are lethal get mixed in nonchalantly, it wasn't a situation where she could be complacent.

Intricately cunning, Guy released attacks that meticulously attempted to set up his opponent in layer upon layers of traps.

But his intentions have been fairly obvious, as he has been using attacks that could be recovered from, even if the attacks were able to outright "kill" Chloe.

He was planning to get Rimuru to owe him one, from releasing Chloe from her curse.

But, Chloe knew, that such a feat was impossible.

The reason was that Chloe "remembered", in one of the instances where she died, Guy tried to undo the curse but regretfully mumbled「So it failed」.

This proved that he curse that Yuuki cast on her wasn't something that could be so easily removed.

So Chloe moved according to what she was ordered to do, which is to keep Guy occupied.

And from that, she understood just how nonsensically strong Guy is.

Hes seen through all of Chloe's attacks.

Even though neither of them are taking this fight seriously, Chloe has already "died" 3 times.

It wasn't caused by any single unavoidable attack, but was more of a series of moves which ended up leading to her death.

It looked as though she was being given choices, but in fact, the whole fight has been moving in whichever direction that Guy wanted.

There was once, where she "died" due to her own carelessness.

She made the choice to try and evade an attack by stopping time, but ended up getting her heart pierced.

This simply means, that Guy can move normally even when time is stopped.

After "remembering" that result, Chloe has forgone with the usage of time stopping abilities. As all it would do was let her opponent know she can stop time.

Guy has not made use of time stopping in his attacks.

If he did that, Chloe would also be able to move―― which meant that knowledge of her being a space time type ability user would be made known to Guy.

But Guy wouldn't make such a simple attack.

On this point, he was an opponent which was very different when compared to Veldora.

Having absolute confidence in his skills, he wasn't one who would use such ability driven attacks.

Which was why, Chloe was embarrassed at the fact that she made such a mistake herself.

When one releases an attack, one needs to take into account the possibility of the attack being guarded, so there was a need to chain attacks to the point of a finishing blow; this turn of events got Chloe to reaffirm this need.

This was something she was supposed to have understood, from her long journey.

Chloe was reflecting on her own actions, as she didn't notice she has gotten negligent, because she had attained an ability which was all too powerful.

And once again, she confronts Guy.

If they both went at this seriously, the situation would probably be a whole lot more different than it is now.

Guy wouldn't have the chance to play around comparatively, and Chloe had the confidence to defeat Guy with her full power Absolute Blade Flash.

But, if it was an all out brawl against Guy without the use of any abilities, there was almost no doubt that Chloe would be defeated.

That was just how powerful Ultimate Skill 『Space-Time King (Yog-Sothoth)』 was.

Which was also why it wasn't a good thing, that she has been so reliant on it up till now.

Through this battle with Guy, Chloe was brought back to the basics, she returned to the moment with her honest feelings and renewed focus.

Guy squinted at the appalling results.

He has yet to meet such a formidable foe, ever since his encounter with "White Ice Dragon[1]" Velzard.

He prided himself to have become even stronger than before, but looks like this still wasn't enough.

Chloe never fell for Guy's traps. Another supposedly fatal attack whiffs, his many feints mixed into his attacks were all seen through.

That's damn impressive thought Guy.

Though neither of them are taking this seriously, would he be able to win if he did? Even if he asks this question it's not like he has the answer to it would be his honest thought.

What this means, is that he has to acknowledge it.

The fact that "The True Hero" Chloe O’bell, is an existence that was equal to Guy Crimson.

(What strength!)

Guy let out a content snicker.

Here he was thinking of defeating Chloe and removing the curse that was plaguing her, as a card he can play against Demon Lord Rimuru, but things aren't going as planned.

Chloe, was an even stronger being than Guy has assumed her to be.

For Guy, he was already at the point of "A Farce? No shit dude!".

Against Chloe's ultra first class sword arm, Guy was unarmed.

At this point, this was more of an insult than anything, so Guy drew his sword whilst thinking of such thoughts.

「Take pride in the fact, that you have managed to make me draw my sword.」

As he said that to Chloe, he pulls a sword out of another dimension.

Demon Sword "Earth”[2] has been yielded to Milim.

To replace that, he created Demon Sword "World"[3].

It was the strongest sword in existence, forged from the hardest physical element known as the "Star Heart".

Compared to Milim's sword, this sword has been maintained constantly, and it gave off a rainbow colored luster.

The demon sword was pulsing, as it was gripped in Guy's hand.

Suppressing the waves emanating from the sword, he took a stance facing Chloe.

He had the intention of enjoying a pure duel of only swordplay.

He was confident in his chances of victory, against Rudra or Velzard.

But, as he faced Chloe, the strongest hero, he had no such confidence in being victorious.

This was what it really meant, to be on equal terms.

Although he has been treating Leon and Velzard as though he would a friend, deep inside he knew that neither of them could be called equal to himself.

That was why, he was elated.

(This is much more than I could have ever hoped for, "Hero" Chloe!!)

With tensions as high as that one time when he took on "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava, Guy confronts Chloe.

There was someone observing the battle between the two of them.

It was "White Ice Dragon" Velzard.

Seeing that Guy is enjoying himself, she bit her lip.

That which was swirling within her innermost thoughts, was a searing blaze.

Anger? No, it's something else. It was Envy.

Velzard has been envious for the longest time, ever since her brother "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava acknowledged Guy.

Staying humorous about the topic, she kept her true thoughts away from Guy.

What was coursing through that heart of hers now, were the contents of a message that she received a few days ago.

There was a special form of telepathic communication limited to the True Dragons, it was a message from her supposedly deceased elder brother Veldanava, that has her bewildered.

――Would you mind destroying Guy, for my sake――

She lets out a sigh, as she thought of the contents.

She has knowledge of the current dispute with Yuuki, and also about the contents of Demon Lord Rimuru's request to Guy.

To think the true identity of Angra Mainyu that resides within Yuuki would be Veldanava....

Velzard was hesitant.

In truth, there was no need for her to hesitate.

Her original purpose, was to observe Guy by getting closer to him.

Except――

She has enjoyed it a little too much, the time which she has spent together with Guy.

The proud Guy.

The foolish Guy.

The kind Guy.

The cruel Guy.

The fearsome Guy.

And, the friend who was acknowledged by her brother, Guy.

She has grown fond of spending time together with him, who has many faces.

But, if her brother is telling her to kill Guy, she....

Also, Guy would most likely, never show her that face of his own volition.

The face he has when he enjoys the battle as much as he is now.

When he fought Velzard in the past, it was as though Guy was an adult taking on a child, taking pains to not cause unto her undue harm.

It was probably since then.

When she began feeling the sprout of envy within her heart.

Towards the man acknowledged by her brother, the Demon Lord known as Guy Crimson.

And――

(Guy, he treats me kindly. But, he never did see me as an equal to himself.)

――That was because, you were too weak.――

(I am strong. I, am of the strongest species, a True Dragon!)

――No, you are weak. Even now, you are still unable to stand beside Guy as equals, am I wrong?――

(That's――)

――Do you want power? If you had more power, you'll be able to stand alongside Guy.――

(But, that is not what I wish for....)

――Are you sure about that? It is because you do not have enough power, that Guy doesn't look at you.――

(If I had power, if I was even more powerful than before, would Guy finally look at me?)

――Certainly. Maybe even more than just that, he might even grant you what you have always wished for.――

(Aah.... Power, I want more power.)

Hearing those words, an evil will somewhere let out a snicker.

――Now then, release that Envy within you.――

The Keyword reverberated in her head.

That's right, this was the Keyword, to releasing the ability that was carved in Velzard's heart.

And thus, the seal on Envy, that "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava set in place, began to unravel.

――After you kill Guy, you can do whatever you desire.――

She has gotten her elder brother's permission.

She now releases her original abilities, and gain new powers.

At that very moment, "White Ice Dragon" Velzard's heart fell under the influence of Velda, and any trace of her sanity were blown away.

Among the few rampaging True Dragons, her strength was second only to "Stellar Dragon King" Veldanava.

Immense energy waves raged about, and began filling the land.

Though Hirari tried to stop Velzard head on, it only resulted in her getting her upper and lower body separated into two from a single strike of Velzard's magic.

The magic was overpowering, it showed how properly controlled the potent energy was.

And――

She awakens.

True to her desires, a goddess of Envy.

All for the sake of killing Guy, to fulfill her greatest desires.

In addition to her own Ultimate Skill『Patience Lord Gabriel』, she obtains Ultimate Skill『Envious Lord Leviathan』as well.

(I, shall be the one to kill Guy!!)

She stays true to her desires, blindly following that one motive.

Chloe and Guy retreated from where they were at the same time.

An incredulously powerful Absolute Frost Wave pierces through the ground where they previously stood, and began breaking down the molecular structure of the ground.

What stood there, was a beautiful woman with glacial white hair and alluring blue diamond eyes.

「Velzard――you.... Oh that's it, seems I forgot about this. So, you have been harboring Envy all this while――」

To Guy's murmur, Velzard showed a slight smile.

「Guy, did you know―― I have, for the longest time――」

And then, the world stopped.

It was now secluded, a world of indefinite suspension.

By the will of one of its rulers, all laws of motion came to a stop.

――All except the few who were unaffected by this Frozen World.

Chloe, Guy and Velzard.

The 3 of them were observing each other, in this world where time does not flow.

A world where even time has stopped flowing.

But, neither Chloe nor Guy have problems moving.

The problem――

Is that for Chloe, there were now 2 enemies.

This turned her already low chance at victory to no chance at all.

Differing from her own ability to stop time, it can be said that Velzard has a near limitless amount of Energy.

That was, the kind of amount she felt emanating from Rimuru when she sparred with him.

Which means, the current time stop is going to last for quite awhile.

Though movement is possible, her ability to "remember" future memories has now been sealed.

Having one of her trump cards, a lifeline ability, sealed is a big blow to her.

She now needs to do whatever she can to survive, until the moment when time is allowed to flow once more.

The situation now isn't one where she can afford the leisure of holding back.

Though Guy isn't a "real" enemy to her, he isn't an ally either.

The biggest problem, is still the fact that Chloe is still bound to her curse, and is unable to make any moves of her own will.

This is the worst possible situation.

Chloe took a careful stance, as she prepared herself for the battle with the 2 of them.

Guy had mixed feelings, being slightly perplexed but also deeply understanding his current predicament.

At the same time he was thinking "Ahh, so that's why Envy took so long to fully sprout.",

(This looks bad. As I have given my word to Rimuru, I had only intended to play around a little....)

Time to think.

Chloe, is under the influence of Velda's curse.

She seems to be valiantly resisting it, but her free will is decisively withheld from her.

That means, co-op with her is out of the question.

And, Velzard is――

(Tch. She's totally being controlled.)

She was giving off the feeling of moving of her own will, but is actually being made to think that is what's happening.

Guy noticed, that it has been a very long time since he felt this much anger flow out from the depths of his heart.

(Unforgivable. To put your filthy hands on what's mine!

That's some balls you got there Velda, to control my cute Velzard!!

If you wanna die that badly, I'll give you just that.)

With an intensely prickly anger, Guy's crimson hair started to bristle up.

He needs to confront Chloe, so as not to outright kill her――but fatal attacks where revival is possible are acceptable――to deal with her.

And at the same time, protect Chloe from Velzard's attacks, and return Velzard to her normal self.

(This looks a little too hard, even for the awesome me――)

He was going 'Tch' in his head, while he prepared himself for the worst.

And, the was the very moment, when Guy confirms that he was going to totally kill Velda.

It was also the moment, where he confirms that Velda ≠ Veldanava.

(That guy, he wouldn't stoop to paltry moves as low as this.

If he was really serious, something like destroying the world, he can do it all by himself.)

Those were Guy's true thoughts.

Which was why, he was able to cut the emotions he had towards Velda without hesitation.

Veldanava has passed on.

And he sharpens his gaze, as he turns his attention to the 2 others he is about to face.

The situation seems to be a 3 way confrontation.

But, Velzard is the one with the biggest advantage.

As she has nothing to worry about, and only needs to advance towards her own goal.

Thus, the showdown in the Frozen World is about to begin.

* * *

[1] 白氷竜 Shirokōri Ryuu

[2] 魔剣"天魔(アース)" Maken “Tenma(Āsu)” when it appears first with Milim before, the author didn’t give it furigana.

[3] 魔剣"世界(ワルド)" Maken “Sekai (Warudo)”.





Chapter 210: Leon’s Feelings


The battle between Leon and Kazaream continued for a full day and night.

He was not simply calling himself Great Demon Lord for nothing, as Kazaream possessed an overwhelming amount of energy incomparable to what he had before.

Even after fighting a lengthy battle, he showed no sign of exhaustion.

Meanwhile, Leon and Mizari were also the same, but even though they were fighting together, they were still toyed with by Kazaream.

The only reason why Leon was able to continue fighting was because Kazaream was going easy on him; Leon noticed this and ground his teeth.

“Will I meet my doom here?” Leon asked himself.

If that were inevitable, then so be it. Until Now, he had lived by crushing the weak.

Of course, when he thought about it as his own turn finally coming up, he could accept it obediently.

...No. Would that really be fine for him?

He spared no sacrifice when it came to his search for Chloe.

He even learned summoning magic himself, and had summoned several people in his selfishness.

One of them was Claude, and another was the burned girl.

Claude vowed his vengeance against Leon, challenging him countless times, yet before they knew it, his attempts at revenge had ceased, and the two came to recognize each other.

Leon believed himself to be selfish and cared not for others’ expectations. That was natural.

He might not have been able to survive in this harsh world otherwise, finding and protecting that girl could be said to be his only reason for living, yet that seemed a dream within a dream.

Therefore, he thought, it can’t be helped that he would be resented, and so he continued to cruelly cut down the weak.

That was Leon’s way of life, the true reason why he couldn’t be a Hero even though he had awakened as a Hero.

A human is a creature who has a hard time understanding another person’s mind. They live without showing anyone their own mind. Therefore, there was no one with the desire to understand Leon’s feelings, even if he wished for it.

A person like Claude is an exception among the exceptions.

Ergo, he thought that for people whom he summoned selfishly had every right to enact revenge against him.

He saw the Silver Knight Alrose fall down from the corner of his eye.

Moderate Clown Troupe is a gathering of hedonists. They fight against anyone by request without any principle.

Kazaream gathered such people, possibly in part due him been warped by defeat in his fight against Leon.

It reached the point where he showed an obstinate obsession for Leon and lined up his subordinates for varied harassment.

The reason why Clayman acted hostile toward Leon could be traced back to Kazaream’s obsession.

Regardless of their appearance, these were once Kazaream’s companions. They wouldn’t be weak.

No one would think that the devil called Footman with a body that fat could be toying around with Alrose and his quick movement.

Alrose’s swordsmanship was top class, but because he’s a master of proper swordsmanship, he’s weak against irregular attacks.

His weakness was seen through in no time and he received a blow.

If he hadn’t gained the power of the Demon Duke class, he would be dead because of the blow just now.

Thanks to the fact that he became a half spiritual lifeform, even if he received injuries to the extent of having a part of his body blown off, it would recover in an instant. But, he might not able to continue this for a long time.

It’s clear that Footman surpassed him in ability.

The combination of Yellow Knight Kizna and White Knight Maetel fought well against the girl-like devil called Tear.

So, it may be said that they’re putting up a good fight. Because they are still alive.

In ability, Tear surpasses the two overwhelmingly. If Tear fought them individually, she could have reaped their lives immediately.

The pair was somehow still alive thanks to the demon’s power they gained and their combination.

Maetel can’t master the demon’s power In the first place.

As she was a user of Holy Magic, her affinity with the demonic attribute was terrible.

Various applications were possible depending on the usage method, but unfortunately she didn’t have enough experience.

Thanks to the defensive power of Kizna, they feel like they can get over Tear’s attack somehow by being devoted to a defensive fight.

It seemed that it was a matter of time before it be broken.

And the biggest problem was Laplace.

He’s strong, too strong.

He’s undoubtedly the strongest class.

Although he doesn’t seem to possess any Ultimate Skill, it won’t be weird if he will master the ability once he acquired it.

He’s still having some leeway even when the strongest knight among Leon’s subordinate, the Black Knight Claude and the Red Knight be his opponent at the same time.

「Hah. Give up, that feint is obvious.」

「Whoops, danger danger. That juist now almost hit me. But, bad luck!」

「Oh, oh my? Maybe, it already ended?」

He cracks jokes with such feeling, doing an easy attack while provoking Claude and Fran repeatedly.

As one would expect, the two people didn’t get provoked.

But, as Laplace’s aim was to make fun of the two, there’s no sign that he would stop his provocation.

Even if it didn’t disturb the two’s feelings nor hindering the two’s thoughts, Laplace’s disturbing words seem to show an effect.

In addition to it, Laplace’s attack is not out of the ordinary, but the damage seems to be gradually accumulated, it could be perceived from the movement of Claude and Fran which gradually became duller.

With an opponent as troublesome as the devil Laplace, Leon should be the one to fight such a powerful enemy.

It might be said that the situation was very bad.

Putting such a situation in his view, Leon continues asking himself.

Claude came to follow Leon, the number of his companions also begun to increase, and before he noticed, Leon became a Demon Lord.

He united the oppressed demi-humans, small and weak demon race[1] and created a place for them to live in peace inside the Great Jura Forest.

This was because taking control of a domain by force was easy to establish a new country,

His purpose was to gather information.

He only wanted people who could investigate information to become his hands and feet.

He protects them with his strength and they work for Leon to realize his wish.

On such give and take relationship, a subordinate-superior relationship was run.

He built a castle on the territory of the Demon Lords and based in there. And then he sent his subordinates to various places and collected information about Chloe.

It was at that time that he repulsed Kazaream. If he thinks about it, that was the start of their connection.

The situation won’t be like this if he dealt the decisive blow properly at that time.

It was the same when he fought Yuuki, Leon ridiculed his naïveness.

He discovered a new continent afterwards and spent his time to build the current El Dorado. When he found Chloe, he wanted to prepare a country where she’ll be able to live in peace.

Therefore, it was necessary to protect the people who lived in the country.

Leon gradually came to think about the people who follow him and the people under his protection, not just about himself.

He can’t jeopardize the country which he created with so much effort.

For such reason, he decided to appropriate Kazaream’s castle inside the Great Jura Forest as his cover.

He can’t help but to use it as his first castle was destroyed in his battle with Kazaream, but unexpectedly it wasn’t bad.

It was really suitable as a test site where he test out various magic, Leon performed various experiments in this castle.

Because the Great Jura Forest became a sanctuary where people who feared Veldora won’t dare to enter, it was helpful to avert the other demon lord’s eyes from him.

And, it was in this castle where he did his last summon.

The girl who summoned to answer Leon’s request was suffering major burns and dying.

He was able to save her life with recovery magic. However, she will only die because she was too young to have safely crossed the word boundary and her magic essence went amok.

Then it would be better for him to let her die this way, but it might be better to make her suffering prolonged. Thinking so, Leon takes an interest in the girl.

But,

「elp, please help……」

The girl said so, Leon saw the strong Will to not give up in her eyes and extended his hand to the girl.

And then he noticed her high compatibility to flame and recalled the existence of the high-ranking spirit that’s Ifrit.

There’s perhaps a possibility of compatibility, but if it fails Ifrit will disappear too.

But――

Because he only took it from Ramiris in a fit of anger before, it won’t be painful to lose it.

The girl survived splendidly.

Then, against himself, who summoned her into this world without permission, the girl has the right for revenge.

If the girl named Shizue Izawa was going to kill him, he would accept it directly from the front.

At the time the strongest and the famous Hero attacked, it was for such reason that he left without hesitating.

As he might be defeated by the Hero.

But, the Hero will surely save the girl who is a former human. He had such prediction.

After all, unlike the failure the likes of him, who was only strong, she was called as the “True Hero”, the strongest title in the history.

If he thought about it, if he had met the Hero there, he might have been able to realize that she was Chloe.

But, it didn’t happen.

Ironically, one came from the other side, while the other one missed the other by running away.

(What am I really trying to do…..)

Leon blows out a sigh.

Kazaream’s attack is harsh without cutting any corners. It would be naïve for him to think that he can deal with it while he’s in deep thoughts.

However, even so……

「Leon-oniichan, you had searched for me this whole time right.

Ehehe. You see, I’ve always want to meet you too.]

He was finally able to meet her the other day.

With Chloe, whom he searched all this time.

She seemed to be fine. But, because of the curse, she doesn’t seem to be able to act freely currently.

Still,

「You see, Rimuru-Sensei had promised me that he would surely save me.

I believe in Sensei.

The Sensei who received Shizu-Sensei, Shizu-San’s feelings and saved us!」

Chloe said so with straight eyes.

The girl whom Leon saved whimsically seemed to follow a strange fate and ended up as Chloe’s teacher.

On the contrary, she met Demon Lord Rimuru and led him to Chloe.

It will be an unbelievable story to say that all of it is by coincidence.

If he didn’t save Shizue Izawa, perhaps Chloe would be dead due to the magic essence rampage.

If you think about it so, then all the things that he has done all this time wasn’t for vain or so he thinks.

No, he might only want to think so.

However, even so――

He was able to meet with Chloe again in this way. Then it was enough.

(Therefore, have I been satisfied with it? To the extent I accepted my death?)

Chloe has someone named Rimuru who she can rely on.

Even if he’s gone, he can entrust her at ease.

But, is he fine with that?

He’s conscious that he never did anything in his life that he can be proud of, but Leon thought that he can’t afford to left everything to Chloe and ended up doing nothing.

Besides, he can’t give up if the Demon Lord Rimuru that Chloe believed in was killed.

(I don’t think that guy will be killed so easily though......)

He cannot help but to say that he’s still naïve by having such thoughts.

In the first place, he couldn’t leave his important Chloe to such worthless guy.

(Ffu. I still have a long way to go. It’s not in my character to easily give up.)

Leon, who was blown off and thrown to the ground, calmly stood up.

His eyes are calm, as his hesitation is cleared up, his body overflowed with energy.

Leon remembered the meaning to fight and regained his unbroken will.

Looking at Leon, who stood up, Kazaream knit her eyebrows.

He snickered as he would torment him after he completely broke Leon’s pride.

Apparently, Leon’s mind didn’t seem to be broken yet

「Hey hey, did you get scared of dying suddenly?

You who can’t match me, you won’t able to do anything even if you stood up!」

Kazaream speaks in sickening woman’s tone in spite of her body which already turned into a stubborn man.

However, it didn’t look like his sex has changed; it can be said that the only change is that his body had been optimized.

After all, his voice still remains that of a female elf.

Leon stares at Kazaream while thinking that his voice is unpleasant.

His Ultimate Skill『Purity Lord Metatron』is the ultimate power of holy attribute.

But, Kazaream’s Ultimate Skill『Dominion Lord Melchizedek』is a ultimate power with both attributes of holy and demonic.

Therefore, all Leon’s attacks are counterbalanced and he’ll only suffer damage from the power which exceed his.

It’s not about affinity or anything, only that his ability is completely inferior to Kazaream’s ability.

For example, he might be able to seal him if he used Triangle Pyramid.

But, even if he honestly tries to seal her, it was bound to be avoided.

Moreover, there’s a possibility that even his strongest sealing technique may be broken in the worst case. After all, it’s an absolute sealing barrier against demonic attribute, but Kazaream also have the holy attribute.

This side might receive a fatal attack in the gap when he tries it carelessly.

(She’s a troublesome opponent.)

Leon was thinking about the means to fight Kazaream while handling her attacks calmly.

「Leon-sama, do you have a good plan?」

Mizari asked.

「I have none. You’re the same too, aren’t you? All demonic attributed attacks would be nullified won’t they?」

Mizari was in the same situation as Leon, all her attacks were counterbalanced and she received damage from the excess energy.

She seemed to begin to do some makeshift attacks, but everything was pinned down by Kazaream’s power.

Naturally, all magic was nullified. That’s natural, since magic doesn’t work against Ultimate Skill.

「Yes. It’s very troublesome as he has the ability with both attribute of holy and demonic.

Moreover, it’s not just that.

Kazaream’s energy when converted into magic essence, seems to be more than 3 times than mine.」

It was a hopeless number.

Right now, Mizari is equal to Leon, as she has become an awakened Demon Lord class. Her energy also greatly increases.

But, Kazaream has a three times more energy compared to Mizari.

Comparing it with himself, Leon estimated that Kazaream’s energy[2] to be a little less than 3 times of his.

Spiritual power to handle the energy of pure light. That source becomes the aggregate amount of the holy aura which become energy but―― even in that energy, Kazaream is above those people.

As in the performance of the ability and the quantity of energy.

That doesn’t mean that he has 6 times more power than them if holy and magic combined.

He was simply changing the energy with his ability.

That’s why, he’s more troublesome. In a word, it means he completely put the ability under control.

Just like the name, Dominion Lord Melchizedek.

「Hoohohoho. It’s useless, useless. You two can’t beat me.

That’s right, beg for your life. And then lick my shoes.

If you do so, I may spare your life.」

A distorted smile floated as Kazaream suggests, but it’s useless to hear it.

After all, he didn’t intend to really spare their life and only want to satisfy his desire to want to see their ungraceful appearance.

Mostly because of such warped desire, he’s going easy on them.

It was foolish, but Kazaream made that grudge his reason to live.

In Leon’s view, he can see Footman tormenting Alrose.

If things keep going this way, it’d be dangerous.

But, he didn’t have any room to help him.

Although he made his mind to fight until the bitter end, the situation remains at its worst.

At that time――

「Bufuou!!」

Raising a scream, Footman was blown away

“Who is that!?” Without any time to even think so,

「Are we late?」

「No, looks like we barely made it in time.」

Such conversation was heard.

Two people were standing still without letting out any presence could be seen.

“Who are they!?” such is Leon’s question,

「Nice to meet you, I’m Benimaru.

The number one subordinate, the faithful servant of the Great Demon Lord Rimuru-sama.

The one who bear the title of “Flare Lord”.

I wonder who should I kill?」

A red-haired, handsome man declares while sprouting a refreshing smile.

And,

「Faithful? I’m certain that you are the most insincere one though……

You’re overshadowed next by Diablo or Zegion you know?」

A blue-haired, handsome man standing next to Benimaru while letting out such tsukkomi.

Receiving Leon’s gaze,

「I’m not a person worthy to introduce myself.

I will only say that I’m the faithful shadow of the Great Demon Lord Rimuru-sama.

Well, don’t worry about it.

When I kill you all, there won’t be any chance for us to meet anymore.」

He declared so while having a fearless smile.

「Hey, you…… don’t tattle about it okay? Never spread the rumor about it, okay!?」

「Stupid, don’t underestimate Diablo’s intelligence network.

Even if I don’t say it, that demon will somehow hear about it.

Put that aside, don’t get carried away and thinking you can rampage around since it’s been a while.」

Although the two are joking around, they’re not relaxing their guard at all.

Obviously indicating that they’re not an ordinary person.

(Benimaru and also Rimuru’s shadow? To make even such people as his subordinates.)

And from their behavior, Leon realized it immediately without any doubt.

The hearsay that “the Demon Lord Rimuru is dead” is to deceive the enemy.

Similarly, Kazaream seemed to realize it too.

「Don’t be joking? Demon Lord Rimuru is dead.

Such small fry introducing himself as a Great Demon Lord is so presumptuous!!」

He shouted in a loud voice.

But, that shout made the two angry.

Benimaru lose his refreshing smile and his face becomes expressionless.

The other person, Souei who introduced himself as the Great Demon Lord’s shadow is expressionless by nature, but cold light flickered in his eyes.

The two shout at the same time.

「「I will kill you!!」」

So.

And the situation of the war enters a new phase.

* * *

[1] It’s not the same demon like Diablo, Diablo is akuma, here the kanji is Mazoku.

[2] It’s written as amount of holy spirit here.





Chapter 211: Calculation that Goes Amiss


Kazaream has not noticed that he has thoroughly stepped onto a landmine.

Now that he has attained power and significant growth, the thought that the majin before Kazaream was a being greater than himself never crossed his mind, not even til the very end.

Footman was lightly slugged by Benimaru, and he was launched all the way to the end of the hall.

And, he lay there not moving one bit.

「Footman, stop playing games. We're gonna massacre all of them.

Get up quickly, and get on with killing Leon's weakling followers!」

Even though Kazaream gave him orders, Footman showed no sign of moving.

「Oi, Footman. What are you playing at? Hurry up and――」

Kazaream went and had a look at Footman in a fit of anger, only to lose all words shortly after.

Footman lay sprawled on the ground showing the white of his eyes along with a bleeding nose, as though the entire ruckus he has been causing was but a lie.

After crashing through a wall and bouncing a few times, his neck was twisted in an impossible angle.

Both his upper and lower front teeth were broken. It is no coincidence, that the teeth caved-in in the shape of a fist.

Some sections of space were fixed too, making said sections unable to regenerate.

Turning his attention to Benimaru, Kazaream clicked his tongue in another fit of anger.

In the hall which turned silent in an instant, one being fleetingly approached Footman.

It was Laplace.

He walked as he ignored Claude and Fran who assumed wary stances with their swords, Laplace stopped beside Footman.

And,

「Nee-san, this looks bad. Our boy Footman, is down and out from thae blow.

Well, he is barely alive though, that Nii-san there probs had nae intention of killing him.」

Laplace said with a 'Oh well' kind of tone, as he lightly shrugged his shoulders.

「What's that? You mean to say Footman was taken out in one hit!?」

Tear the Teardrop shouted out in surprise.

Hearing that her fellow brethren, who was easily tougher than herself, was downed in a single attack, was a way too unreal topic.

「Tear, this ain't gud. Fall back. It's nat a good idea to take those onii-sans lightly.

From my perspective, ye ain't gonna cut it. It would most likely take me ‘n’ our captain, to be able to deal with them somehow....

There's also that pretty demon jou-chan with Demon Lord Leon, th’ odds are stacked against us now.

What's the plan, Nee-san?」

With an easy going tone, Laplace gave Kazaream his analysis of the current situation.

He was hinting at 'If we're gonna retreat, now would be the time'.

Kazaream snorts,

「Laplace, no need to cower that much.

Leon is already in tatters.

Guy's minion too, is at most a demon lord class weakling.

Sure demon nobles are pretty capable among the upper tier demons, but she ain't any better than Tear who is demon lord class herself.

We only need to be wary of those two.

You and me are more than enough to deal with them.」

He impertinently declares.

To his unshaken confidence, Laplace has nothing more to say, and simply shrugs.

Kazaream was totally ignoring the fact, that Footman who was demon lord class himself, was out of commission from a single attack.

Kazaream thought, the one he needed to be wary of was only Benimaru who stands before him, and he can let Laplace deal with the inferior Souei.

The truth was,

「It is a fact, that we haven't even showed what we are really capable of....」

Laplace affirms Kazaream's words.

As per Kazaream's orders to overwhelm Leon's forces, it's a fact that they have been slowly bashing down on them.

But Laplace was still considering retreating, even after taking all that into account.

Laplace's intuition sensitively picked up the changes in the situation, and was sounding a warning alarm.

As if to prove Laplace'a intuition was true, Mizari coolly stood back up.

All the damage she took earlier, regenerated in an instant.

All her external injuries disappeared, and her new outfit looked more dreadful than before.

Gaining an impressive presence, she stays as expressionless as before, but gives off an imposing feeling.

「――Nee-san, that jou-chan's existential values[1] have rocketed up.

They're called awakened demon lords aye? Though she is inferior to Nee-san, Tear ain't able to handle that....」

Just as Laplace analyzed it, Mizari's Energy levels swelled up to the level of an awakened demon lord.

More like, her magic power that has been restrained up til now have been released, that kind of feeling.

「That's right.

I, with the help of Demon Lord Rimuru, have evolved to the level of the awakened demon lords.

With the impression that real battle experience would help me master this power most effectively, I took the liberty of having Kazaream-sama as my practice opponent.

That being said, it looks like Leon-sama did notice, the fact that I have been holding back――」

Mizari took glances at Leon as she said that.

Leon nods with a bitter looking face,

「Of course I did. As if a measly demon noble could maintain a barrier powerful enough to withstand my attacks.

How would I not notice that you were restraining your output and planning to do something.

Who would have thought that your plan, was to depend on the reinforcements from Demon Lord Rimuru.

So, does Guy really trust Rimuru? Does he think he is the key to ending this battle?」

「――about that.

It's not like considerations from someone like me would affect Guy-sama's intentions, but personally, I have come to the conclusion that believing Demon Lord Rimuru is the correct course of action.

That, was what was decided at Walpurgis too.」

To Leon's question, Mizari stuttered for a moment, before she answered.

Though her answer was the truth, Leon felt he was pressured by those words, as he never did fully trust Rimuru even though they talked of cooperation.

At the same time, Mizari who is a demon, couldn't hide her own surprise at herself for speaking of trusting any demon lord other than Guy.

As one of the few absolute beings that were crowned in ages past, Mizari was one of the capable few who surpassed the ex-demon lords; as she understood her own true nature, she felt the surprise excessively.

Mizari never broke her courteous tone towards any other person, but turns into a cold-hearted slaughterer the moment she is given orders.

That was her identity, as the great demon who heads Guy's minions.

「So, the number of weaklings have increased, and one of you insects got a little power-up, did you really think you could stand up against me?

No doubt Leon over there is mostly half dead, even if Mizari there did get a boost in power, she's not even close to half of me. I don't see where the problem is.」

With a fearless smile, Kazaream cuts into Leon and Mizari's conversation.

To Kazaream, he is already looking down on his opponent as an awakened demon lord who is inferior to himself.

With a cold gaze towards Kazaream,

「Then, allow me to give an additional explanation.

A normal demon lord class being has [EP:200,000〜400,000], and that's the lowest to the highest.

Similarly, a demon noble is [EP:200,000〜400,000] too and that is distinguished by the baron to the duke classes.

Certainly, Leon-sama's followers have evolved and attained power, but they sit at the viscount class of [EP: below 250,000] at most.

Kazaream-sama's fellow brethren too, with the exception of Laplace, are at the higher end of the demon lord class at [EP: below 400,000].

Neither are even remotely close, to be called beings that have power surpassing demon lords.

The demon lords of the current Octagram, with the exception of one person, are all of the Million class at [EP:1,000,000〜].

From what I have just mentioned, the phrase "surpassing a demon lord" is quite the excessive term.

Now then, with all of that in mind, and though this might sound rude, the battle between Leon-sama's followers and the members of the Moderate Clown Troupe, is naught but child's play.

I have come to the conclusion, that it is at a level that can be ignored.

The order I have received from Guy-sama, is to obtain victory.

To that end, I have maintained this barrier and awaited the reinforcements from Demon Lord Rimuru-sama.

This was the best course of action I have taken in order to decisively defeat Kazaream-sama, a plan that ignores everything besides the Million class.

So, that meant that Kazaream-sama's victory condition would be to defeat me before reinforcements arrived, that and nothing else.

From my analysis as I bought time earlier, the main ability that Kazaream-sama uses is『Auto-reflection』.

You stack damage onto your opponent, by neutralizing your opponent's attack with the same attack with a roughly 20% increase in output.

If this was done by a being that had overwhelming amounts of Energy, it would be an incredibly efficient method.

It's also troublesome, that you wield both Holy and Demonic attributes.

As long as you have more Energy, you most likely will never be defeated.

But, for you to continue neutralizing attacks, it means you have no other choice but to consume Energy.

The 20% increase in consumption seems to apply equally, whether it is one of Leon-sama's attacks, or one of my held back attacks.

The reasoning behind waiting for reinforcements, would it be clearer to say that my aim was to gather enough power to overwhelm what Kazaream-sama can neutralize?

Leon-sama along with Benimaru-sama and Souei-sama would most likely be able to deal with Kazaream-sama, after some depletion from having to face me at full power.

Victory is ours this time, Kazaream-sama.」[2]

「Hey hey, ojou-chan. What do ye mean by 'with the exception of me'?」

「――not to be rude, but I was unable to discern how much Energy you have.

That means, you are either equal to or above me, that is my conclusion.」

「Ye give me too much credit.」

Thinning his eyes[3], Laplace gave off a sharp gaze unbefitting of his casual attitude.

Towards Mizari who did not underestimate him, he gave a "good grief[4]" impression.

Souei showed a bitter face as his true identity was revealed by someone else, but did not voice his complaint.

The group of people who were 'tossed aside' in this conversation, namely Leon's knights Claude and co. and Tear, were unable to voice their words of rejection in the face of Mizari's aura.

Because they understood what was said were undeniable facts.

But, even after hearing Mizari's explanation and feeling her aura, Kazaream's composure was not broken at all.

「Fufun. I knew all along, that you were hiding your true power!!

Don't be giving such arrogant speeches, being a weakling who cannot fight without resorting to such stopgap measures!!

Even if all you worms came at me together, you still wouldn't come close to the great me.

The fact that none of you can beat me doesn't cha~~~nge!!

Let me show you weaklings, what real despair and fear is!!!」

As he shouted, he released all the power he has held back that stopped him from outright killing Leon.

In addition to the pressure that distorted space within the barrier, an ominous aura now dominated the field.

The aura Mizari was releasing, was quashed in an instant.

By an overwhelming Energy, one which could be said to surpass awakened demon lords.

There were no lies in Kazaream's words, as the storm of his tyranny vastly exceeds Mizari's calculations.

「Wha-!! It can't be.... To think, he had that much――」

What just happened was effective enough to cause the composed Mizari to waver, and Mizari's expression changed.

Kazaream was overwhelming, so overwhelming that she couldn't keep her composure.

She herself had Energy in the Million class. Leon too.

Even so, she still felt so overwhelmed by Kazaream.

The estimate that there is almost 3 times the amount of Energy that she just told Leon earlier, felt like an understatement.

「This is more than what was anticipated. I had estimated it to be 3 times or more than me, but this――」

A blow from Kazaream made its way to Mizari's abdomen, to interrupt their conversation.

Kazaream's fist pierced through Mizari, breaking her arms which she crossed to protect herself, as though crushing fragile rotten twigs.

「Hahhaーーーー! Aren't you misunderstanding something, just because I have been holding back on killing you?

That's just naive, you weakliiiings! I, this Kazaream-sama, have gained the greatest power ever!!!」

Kazaream laughs boisterously.

「Nee-san, that's some absurd stuff ye'r pullin’ out there. Fine by me, guess I'll need to prepare for th’ worst too.」

He took a rainbow orb out, as he said that.

That, was a Spirit Jewel. It was an orb that housed Energy equal to the souls of 10000 humans.

Laplace breaks the orb, and replenishes his Energy.

This didn't cause him to awaken, he did it to prepare himself to fully support Kazaream.

「You lot have been sneakily thinking of many things, but all of it was for naught. After all, this is but the fate of beings that do not wield enough power! 」

Kazaream laughs haughtily.

Lamenting, Mizari says,

「At this rate, accomplishing my orders would be....

My apologies, looks like my outlook was too naive.

At the least, I will attempt to cause mutual destruction with an Extreme Anti-Demon Elimination attack, do take care of matters afterward――」

Putting her existence in the line, to shave off as much of Kazaream's power as possible.

Leaving future matters to Leon and Benimaru and co. , those were Mizari's intentions.

But――

「You're called Mizari right? Like what that drag[5] said, no need to overthink things too much.

You called for reinforcements, we answered the call and made it in time.

That's all that matters, right?」

Walking past beside of Mizari who was knocked down, Benimaru took the point.

And,

「Souei, you deal with the Clown over there. I'll be the one to kill that drag.」

He indifferently declares, paying no heed to the situation whatsoever.

「I guess I can accept that. I'll give in, but be sure to finish the job.

He did insult Rimuru-sama nonetheless.」

「Don't worry 'bout that. It's not like there's any worthwhile information to obtain, so there's no reason to let him live am I right?」

「True that.

You being you, you may have forgotten about this, but seems like that fellow is Clayman's master.

That means――」

「So he's the source who was behind that Gelmudo guy, right? I know that alright.」

Benimaru and Souei went on with their seemingly frivolous conversation in such a manner.

「J-just what are you people talking about――」

「Hey you two over there, are you meaning to say, you are gonna take on that monster Kazaream all by yourself!?」

Mizari and Leon spoke out at the same time.

Mizari hastily regenerates and returns to the frontlines in combat form, showing her stance to take on the challenge once more.

Leon does so too, with his pride as a demon lord on the line, in an effort to return the favor against Kazaream.

Despite that, Benimaru and Souei were talking with the intention to do this themselves.

「Aaahn? I just said it didn't I. I'm going to『Kill』.

Starting now I'll be wiping the floor with that shitty drag, you injured fellows just sit back and watch.」

「You heard him. I'll be dealing with the Clown over there.

Leon-dono and Mizari-dono, I'll be trusting you two to keep a look out for the half dead fatty, and to make sure that Teardrop girl doesn't bother us.」

「But....」

「Enough. You two won't understand unless I tell you that you are only going to hold us back?」

This last line from Benimaru sealed the deal.

Ignoring Souei's "You really should fix how you speak to others.", Benimaru draws his blade.

One of Kurobee's greatest works, with a fully crimson blade, it was Benimaru's personal katana "Guren".

Having been reforged countless times, the original steel used to forge the katana has become something else altogether.

This katana which Benimaru wields as though it is a part of himself, has become a "Wazamono[6]" which is comparable to Gods class weapons.

Benimaru's thoroughly refined aura thinly wraps around the katana's blade.

Which resulted in the crimson blade getting an exquisitely decorated gleam.

Kazaream laughs.

「Heh weakling. Can't do anything without a weapon?

Fine with me.

I'm willing to bet, that dull thing ain't going to do much of anything to me!」

「Fuーーーn[7].」

One instance.

Benimaru's body blurred with a red flash.

Leaving behind a flash of light in that moment, Benimaru appears behind Kazaream.

At the time every other person noticed he has moved, the blurred body disappears.

「Hup, you can have this back. Try not to drop it next time.」

Benimaru throws something at Kazaream as he said that.

It was an arm.

The arm of a women from the elbow onward.

「Gyaiiiii!!」

Kazaream lets out a scream.

He has finally noticed, that his arm was cut off.

「Y-you, you bastard!! Why, why is there pain!?」

Kazaream tosses the question at Benimaru.

It's kind of dumb to ask your enemy about such things, but it looks like he's not accepting what just happened.

For Kazaream who is a spiritual entity, feeling pain shouldn't be something relevant to him.

「Tch. Are you really that dumb?

I'll tell you since you look like you still don't understand, pain is a warning signal.

It works the same way even for spiritual entities.

Your body felt something dangerous, so it is sounding an alarm.

You should properly control that kinda stuff before getting into a battle.」

Benimaru gave a detailed explanation as though mocking Kazaream.

In fact, during the time when he trained with Diablo in the labyrinth, he got the same explanation after something similar happened.

Benimaru has of his own accord accepted that as Diablo's way of getting back at him, after his loss against Benimaru in the tournament.

But, that is something unrelated to what is happening now.

It's definitely not because he was upset that it happened to him too, and is venting his frustration.

「Haah? Warning signal? What bullshit is that.

As if the awesome me, would feel danger from you!」

Kazaream turns the arm into Energy and absorbs it, then regenerates his arm from the elbow out.

He has long forgotten about his declaration, the one where he said Benimaru won't be able to harm him in any way.

「Death. I shall definitely bring death unto you!」

As he shouted, Kazaream turns into an ultra dense mass of Energy, as he assaults Benimaru.

Benimaru receives the attack, and similarly he himself turns into a flaming mass of Energy[8].

Thus, a battle between beings who have surpassed mortal limits begins.

* * *

[1] Existential values = energy btw in this world.

[2] Sushi: like wtf, this is the longest amount of dialogue from one person i have seen yet.

[3] Sushi: think Ichimaru gin from bleach

[4] Sushi: google yare yare lol

[5] Okama=transvestite

[6] Wazamono means the swords which cut well, "sharp swords".

[7] Sushi: this is benimaru breathing out

[8] Guro: Benimaru is Logia user!! XD





Chapter 212: Foolish Kazaream


Souei and Laplace squared off against each other, grasping for each other’s openings.

They fell into a deadlock after several bouts of offense and defense in the blink of an eye.

All of Laplace’s unseen knives that were thrown towards Souei in the beginning had pierced Souei’s body.

Laplace thought that he had killed Souei with his surprise attack, but it was no more than a parallel existence that Souei had created.

Souei is being cautious.

Against the enemy that he seen for the first time, he must not act like challenging him carelessly.

Regardless of whether or not he will lose or win and whether or not the enemy is superior or inferior, Souei didn’t let his guard down.

「Is this how you fight? With such strength, even if you fight fair and square you would be quite good.」

「Hahaha, I’ll receive th’ praise, but I think I juist want to enjoys ‘n’ win.

Still…… you’re verry troublesome, Nii-san[1].

Even though I act because I culd see a certain vision of I killing ye, t’was just an imitation.

Just like what my intuition says, to withdraw is th’ correct answer.」

Laplace prepared several knives in his hand while shaking his head in disappointment.

And, from his mouth comes an enjoying smile.

Just like his title as Wonder Clown, Laplace is enjoying fighting as something to live for.

He pursued the presence of the Souei’s main body while killing all of the created mirror images.

He analyze the magic power wave that Souei releases and might be said that he memorized it.

「Oh, how skillful. Carelessly intercepting it is difficult heh.」

One of the clones exploded at the same time as it repelled Laplace’s knife.

It seemed to be a bomb which disguised as a knife.

And in addition to that, it’s spirit bomb. Having all of 7 attributes, it’s an object that contains the Omnipotent attribute to counter the Demonic and the Holy attributes.

「Hehehe. Since Nee-san’s attribute is th’ Omnipotent attribute, I have receive a bit o’ it.

To be frank, isn’t it impossible for ye to defeat Nee-san who have both demonic ‘n’ holy attribute?

Although that Nii-san is also extremely dangerous, but it woull be less embarrassing if ye just be obedient, ye know?」

「Do you really think so?」

「――well, I guess sae? Och well, I wull only force ye to stay here.

I don’t know whither there’s a lot o’ real body or fake ones―― mibbie it’s all real―― a clone user is really troublesome.

You see, even when I don’t know th’ real body, if I surround ye wi’ spirit bomb, even you’d not be able toe do anythin’ richt?」

All of the knives have been already camouflaged by Laplace’s Unique Skill 『Deceiver』.

Or rather, only his word is feigned, all of the knives are spirit bomb.

Without hesitation, he intended to kill Souei.

「FFu. Surround me you say? Such thing will be not significant if I can transfer.」

While Souei says so, he transfers with『Space Control』.

That’s all according to Laplace’s plan.

「Hahahahha! Nii-san, ye don’t seem to be careful.

The Spirit Bombs had been configured to chain explode due to dimensional vibration.

It woull flows all at once into th’ distorted space o’ transfer series skill ‘n’ explode inside it!

If ye receive that explosion, this side wull get entangled too ‘n’ receive damage, so t’was fearful ye know.

Well, th’ cause o’ yer defeat is that ye didn’t notice mah puppet strings which had wrapped ye around.」

Laplace wraps the knife with his puppet strings and let it twined around Souei.

Not only just that, he linked the knife with the other knives, which were flying nearby, and set it to react to the movement of the other clones.

Hypothetically, if Souei didn’t use his transfer ability, there would be no problem even if Souei come charging while ignoring the spirit bombs.

Because even if most of this audience hall got blown away, it would be easy to retrieve his comrade that is Tear and Footman and to escape.

Laplace fiddled with the timing of the explosion as it was not a problem for him.

After all, with his Unique Skill『Seer』, he could see it clearly Souei’s figure being swallowed up by the explosion.

Without hesitation, Laplace begun his attack with conviction that he could surely kill Souei.

Laplace laughs loudly, pleased that his plan would end well.

「Sorry, it’s a bad place for you to be pleased so much, but let’s end this soon.」

Laplace heard a cold voice from his back.

And then, he cannot hide his surprise as a straight sword[2] stuck out from his chest.

Laplace can’t understand what happened.

「This can’t be……」

Could do nothing but to speak such stupid word.

It was simple when the truth was revealed.

Souei from the beginning concealed his main body in the darkness.

It was not his main body which was surrounded by the bombs, it was only one of his parallel existence.

He calculated the position of Leon’s castle with “Eye of the Moon” of his Ultimate Gift『Shadow Moon[3] Lord Tsukuyomi』and carried out a direct transfer to the inside of the barrier.

And then, he concealed his main body with shadow using『Law Manipulation (Shadow)』 and launch a surprise attack with the effect of “One-hit Kill”.

Without any sign of naivety like Benimaru, that’s Souei’s way of fighting.

But――

「Geez. I never think that mah younger brother…… would git so easily killed lik’ this――」

「Younger brother, you say? Mu!?」

In response of the blood thirst, Souei jumped aside from that spot.

With the eyes which foresee everything, he sensed a danger simultaneously with an uncomfortable feeling.

At the same time, the knife which stuck in Laplace’s corpse was scattered by the explosion of the body.

If his evasion was a bit late, Souei would rolled up in the explosion and would not come out unharmed.

「Just kidding~! Did ye really think that I have a younger brother?

To tell you th’ truth, I have a similar ability as ye too.

The truth is, just lik’ you I hud thought to dae a surprise attack, but that won’t be guid, hence I reveal myself.

Well~ it’s been a while. For mah clone to be killed!」

Laplace spouts lies brazenly while preparing his surprise attack.

He narrows his eyes and smiles.

His behavior of making fool of someone is just like him, a hedonist.

Marionette Master Clayman.

Laplace is Clayman’s master. He made a magic doll which modeled after himself and manipulated it with automatic operation.

And, his target――

「Well then, it’s been a long time since I rampaging seriously.

For underestimating me, I’ll show ye a painful experience. It’s time for ye tae be prepared!]

「It’s you who need to be prepared. You need to stop the foolish delusions such as you defeating me, and you should immediately return to the darkness.」

And the two people fought each other and their fight reached a deadlock.

Benimaru and Kazaream had broken through the barrier which Miazari had set up and also the city barrier, the two were now having a battle airspace high above.

Kazaream begins to violently attacking Benimaru taking the advantage of his enormous energy.

The fight between a fellow spiritual lifeform could be said as a struggle to investigated the enemy’s energy. One would win if they deprived the enemy of their power and decreased their existence power.

His Ultimate Skill was means for that, Kazaream made Benimaru consume his energy by effectively releasing his ability.

――No. He was under impression that he did so.

「Well, how’s it!! You can’t counterattack!? What happened with your condescending attitude from before?」

Kazaream who rely fully on his power, concentrated his energy to his fists and hits Benimaru repeatedly.

For Kazaream who been optimized by his Ultimate Skill『Dominion Lord Melchizedek』, he was convinced that the Octagram won’t be his opponent.

In fact even Leon would be just like a baby in front of Kazaream.

He was able to see that Mizari, who had been preaching before, was a worthless existence who could only receive a single blow from him.

That’s right.

In front of his ultimate optimization called『Holy Demonic Unification』, which integrated the power of demon and angel, holy and demonic, he was confident that there was no angel nor demon that could be his equal.

Kazaream thought that there was no reason for him to lose if himself was above in both quantity and the quality of the energy.

In fact, he succeed in offsetting Leon’s holy strike and even Mizari’s demon power equally and adding a counterattack.

Even if Kazaream does nothing, his enemies would destroy themselves on their own.

It was the Counter lapse that Kazaream had devised.

Of course he activated it when he was attacked.

He let the damage accumulate by offsetting the attack while depriving the enemy’s energy by crashing his energy.

He won’t lose unless his enemy surpasses his energy, it was an ability that ensure certain victory.

And, as one of the Four Fiends of the Heavenly Commanders who have the strongest power, Kazaream thought that there was no other existence that’s more superior than himself.

「What happened!! Are you unable to do anything when I get serious?

When you realized about my power, it has already be too late you see.

What a fool. If you didn’t obstruct me, you would have be able to live a little longer.

I want to see Leon’s crying face without any delay, so I will kill you soon.」

Kazaream was about to finish off Benimaru while laughing evilly.

Kazaream was merry because of his strengthened ability, he was completely convinced that no one can oppose him.

Certainly that it’s a strong ability, it might be not weird for Kazaream to think so.

However, it could be said that it was a too foolish act.

Kazaream was convinced that his ability is the strongest and doesn’t have weakness. Therefore, he was too overconfident with his ability.

That’s why, he didn’t notice.

His attacks didn’t do any damage to Benimaru.

「Ora ora ora ora! How’s that how’s that!!」

Moreover Kazaream was getting carried away,

「Shut up!」

The fist that Benimaru threw hit Kazaream’s face.

「Buboaa!!」

Just with that one blow, it had robbed most of Kazaream’s consciousness.

「Bubaa, ha, a, gaa!?」

Kazaream turned his gaze to Benimaru with his eyes opened wide in astonishment.

While looking like he’s pitying Kazaream, Benimaru pointed out the reality.

「Your attacks doesn’t work against me at all you see.」

So he said.

Kazaream couldn’t understand the meaning behind Benimaru’s word

That might be so.

Kazaream was conceited that he had obtained the strongest power; because until just now, he had stood as the strongest.

And yet, that there is an enemy whom his attacks wouldn’t work against is something that he would never deem as possible.

「Do, don’t be joking! Wha, what a stupid thing to say!!

Is, is that so…… I understood! It’s a bluff, you must be bluffing!

Hahaha, what a shrewd guy. I won’t get deceived by such foolish lie!」

He unreasonably interpret the fact on his own.

Then, he condensed his energy with the maximum output in both his hands, and took a stance toward Benimaru.

「You’re finished.

Even if I fall into your tricks, you would be hopeless in front of my absolute power.

How~ unfortunate! A fool won’t understand it.」

Grinning and sprouting a smile, Kazaream regained his composure and felt the reliable power in both of his hands.

「Well then, good bye. If you want to resent, resent your own powerlessness! Arc Depression (Ruler’s Melancholy)!!!

What he had shot out was a dreadful energy wave that could be called as Holy Demonic Wave Cannon which would rapidly exhaust the target’s energy.

Even with speed surpassing dozens of times the speed of sound, it might be impossible to avoid it, and that sure-kill wave was rushing towards Benimaru.

But, there was no change in Benimaru’s expression, with his cherished katana “Guren” in his hand, he calmly took a stance.

「Do you know? Speed is power. In other words――」

Swinging his beloved katana, Benimaru ward off Kazaream’s sure-kill attack and nullified it with his Rebirth Flame.

He could have counterattacked, but he deliberately held back.

Because he was going to kill Kazaream with the next attack.

「Ha? Huh!?」

Kazaream who opened his eyes wide to their limits was astonished.

He witnessed an impossible spectacle in front of his eyes and his mind can’t catch up with it.

「Well, such a dull attack of yours can’t reach me you know.

In other words, it means that your attack can’t effect me.

There’s one thing I can praise you for, you were certainly superior than me only in the total amount of power.

But, if it’s about the quality, I’m overwhelming superior than you.

Just that.

Can you understand it?

Then, die! Prominence Acceleration!!」

Kazaream’s movement stopped as he was too astonished and had entered a panic state, received Benimaru’s special attack.

The black sunlight which took the shape of an Oriental dragon swallowed half of Kazaream’s body while moving as if it has its own will.

The quality was exactly like Benimaru had stated, the nature of the released energy was so terrifying like a Tyrant.

The reason was because the nihility energy that his adored and respected master, the Great Demon Lord Rimuru has.

Some of Rimuru’s subordinates had approached to the nihility nature of Rimuru through the Soul’s Corridor.

Therefore, it wasn’t weird for Benimaru to offsetting Kazaream’s attack which had the holy and demonic attributes.

It was blocked by Benimaru’s energy which superior in quality and the attack was nullified.

Although it can’t be compared with Rimuru the originator, as the original was moving in super high speed and had enhanced energy, it was still a finishing move.

In all aspects, it may be said that Benimaru was skillful.

「Tch. I still can’t control it perfectly yet.」

Benimaru grumbled.

Although he had no complaint about the power, the accuracy didn’t go as he wanted.

The technique was a technique in which Rimuru instructed Benimaru to imitate Cardinal Acceleration which was the ultimate attack of the “Scorch Dragon” Velgrind.

Unlike Velgrind who was a high density spiritual lifeform by nature, it was still premature for Benimaru to master it, seeing that he had just finished evolving.

But, Benimaru’s ability was the Ultimate Skill『Blazing Sun[4] Lord Amaterasu』, with Light and Heat Control (acceleration) as the abilities crux, there were still a lot of things which he could learn from Velgrind’s ability.

Or rather――

(It just my guess, but I think I inherited the ability that Rimuru-sama acquired from Velgrind-sama.)

――Benimaru comprehended.

And―― Zegion, Ranga and the other, might have inherit the ability from Veldora-sama.

As for Diablo,

(That guy seem to inherit a direct ability from Rimuru-sama.)

So, he remembered the opponent he engaged in desperate struggles inside the labyrinth for many times.

Using the labyrinth characteristic where they can’t die, Benimaru and Diablo had performed real combat trainings over and over again.

The result was his complete defeat on every match.

Aside from places the public can watch such as the Tournament, Diablo never holds back against his opponent.

(Although it’s good that I had a glimpse of the end of his strength, that fellow, I’ll beat him someday!)

‘Kufufufufu’. Benimaru felt a bit unpleasant as he remembered Diablo’s loud laugh.

Benimaru knew about it, but recently Diablo seemed to be considerably feigning ignorance in front of Rimuru.

However, if it might be said that, on the contrary, it could thought that he was close with Diablo that he could saw his hidden true self.

While forcibly making himself agreed to it, Benimaru moved his gaze to Kazaream who fell down and went towards him to deliver the final blow.

* * *

[1] Not the brother meaning but for young man, laddie.

[2] 直刀 Chokutou lit. Straight Sword. They’re straight Japanese blade which were used before the invention of Tachi. Tachi have Curve while Chokutou didn’t.

[3] 月影 when the kanji translated separately it becomes Moon Shadow/Shadow Moon. When the kanji is combined it literally translated as Moonlight, Moonbeams, Moon.

[4] 陽炎 separately Sun Flame/Blazing Sun. Combined Heat Haze (Kagerou).

Guro: Toying with Laplace’s accent. Pls Comment whether I should keep it like this in future chapters or not.





Chapter 213: Unjust Ending


A knife glitters, and the straight sword repels it.

An intense offense and defense were unrolled since a while.

Each of them made their feints and schemes in order to advance in the fight advantageously.

High-level psychological warfare was carried out.

While Souei and Laplace were fighting, their fight was interrupted as Kazaream has fallen while being completely scorching together with a roaring sound.

By the impact from when Kazaream was flung against it, the hall floor split open and the fragments scatter around.

As proof that Kazaream’s body was burnt with high temperature, the marble which covered the floor began to melt.

Naturally, Kazaream was not unharmed.

Half of his body was burnt by fire, it became a terrible sight that normally no one would think that he’s alive.

But, Kazaream was alive even in such condition.

「Ah, nee-san!」

Laplace was surprised and ran toward Kazaream in a hurry.

In such panic as no one would imagine from his arrogant attitude.

Even Leon and co who were treating their injury while watching the fight of Souei and Laplace, have their movement stopped as they seen the terrible sight of Kazaream.

Everyone was able to understand from the mere sight of his appearance.

Benimaru won, and Kazaream’s life begun to exhausted.

Spiritual lifeforms were the people who stood at the top of this world with their tenacious vitality.

However, from the moment their mind was broken and acknowledging one’s defeat, their vitality (=energy) quickly decreases and leads to their death.

Kazaream’s situation was exactly that, everyone can see his defeat with their eyes, his energy started to decrease very fast.

Souei didn’t stop paying attention to Laplace while being cautious.

He didn’t think that it was a ruse, if it was a scheme, he judged that it would be dangerous to move carelessly.

Comparing both of them, Laplace and Souei were almost equal.

He would get defeated when he shown a fatal mistake, he was able to understand it from the bout he had a little while ago.

Souei watched Laplace’s behavior carefully.

Benimaru landed without a sound from the sky next to them.

「Did you end it? But, aren’t you overdoing it a little?」

「No, his energy exceeded mine.

There’s no reason to go easy on him.

If I didn’t finished it with my full power, it would be a war of attrition.

If it happen, this side will lose if I make a bad mistake.」

Benimaru answered Souei’s question.

In fact, if you compare the size of the base energy, Kazaream has twice more of Benimaru.

Benimaru borrowed the energy from Rimuru through the Soul’s corridor and barely obtained a power equal to Kazaream.

It was a combat method to borrow power from a higher ranking person that he learned from Diablo.

Naturally, the requirements were hard and of course he couldn’t fully utilize Rimuru’s power in combat.

Besides, it was impossible to borrow it beyond one’s max energy.

That’s because it would be uncontrollable.

Moreover, there are some fine limitations, but it may be said that it’s a forbidden secret art to be able to use abilities beyond one’s power.

Only the top three, Diablo, Zegion and Benimaru were able to do it.

It was the ultimate art that was concealed from the other executives.

(But, the only thing I can’t understand till now, is Diablo’s intention when he taught me this……)

With such question in his mind, Benimaru didn’t change his relaxed attitude with Souei.

Actually, he was able to defend against Kazaream’s holy demonic fusion attack by letting the nihility energy that he borrowed from Rimuru accelerate and cladding himself with it.

If it was only his own power, he was certain that it would be a considerably hard fight.

If it was said whether he would be able to win or not, he think that he might barely win, but Benimaru didn’t think that he want to actually try so.

Anyway, one of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Kazaream was a powerful enemy.

「Well that might be true. Against such monstrous class, it’s unknown what kind of technique he’s hiding.」

「Right so」

Souei didn’t pursuit the matter anymore and nodded slightly.

As Souei understood so, Benimaru begun to walk to deliver the final blow on Kazaream.

The victory is certain, but there’s a possibility for Kazaream to revive if he’s not eliminated in this place.

Since there’s no insurance that he can win the next fight, Benimaru was going to erase him without fail.

But, when Benimaru was going to approach him, he heard Kazaream’s voice muttering.

When he hears the words, Benimaru stops walking.

「Hey, Laplace…… where did I make a mistake?」

He heard Kazaream mutter with eyes which could not see anything towards the empty sky.

Kazaream’s recollection continues.

「In the beginning, I only wanted a place where we could live in happily……

Because the shortcut for it is to become a Demon Lord, I became one――

Then, I guess I had got carried away......」

「Eh, such thing. It was someone else who was getting carried away!」

「That’s right, I remembered it. I felt aggravated by Leon who introduced himself as a Demon Lord in spite of him being a human.

Fussing over such dull matter, I provoked Leon for a fight......

Hahaa, I have awakened a sleeping dragon......

And so I was killed and I bore a grudge against Leon and lived for it all this time......

But, it’ mystery.

Why for such a thing all this time――

We were only living happily......

Laplace, you’re mistaken, you see...... I ...... I, made a mistake......

Again, we happily――――――」

Kazaream’s consciousness sinks to the bottom of the everlasting darkness.

――Ah……That’s right……I must apologize to Clayman too――

It was the last words that come to Kazaream’s mind.

「Nee-san? Kazaream-sama? Hey, it’s not good, being stubborn is ya redeeming feature you know!

If ya give up, it would be the end. It’s a lie, this can’t bae……

I ain’t be deceived, stop bullshiting me! Once again together, we happily――

Do ya think we would let you leave us so easily!? uuauooooooo!!!」

Laplace cried aloud.

He was too defenseless, and it was enough to stop Benimaru’s steps.

「Eh, this…… a lie, Kazaream-sama?」

Tear who feebly sat down, she became absent minded due to her inability to accept the reality.

Silence filled the room like time has stopped――

「Hoohoohooho! Now is the time for my turn right!」

With unnatural movement like a machine, Footman sprang up suddenly.

He hold an ominous round ball in his hands.

When he hold up the ball in his hand over the sky. It occurred.

『Yo, my name is Velda.

It seems like Kazaream was defeated? Or the brainwashing was removed?

Well, either way is good.

Well now, I won’t be speaking for a long time, I need to collect my objective quickly.]

The ball emits light and drawn the figure of the youth―― Velda―― in the air.

The image linked with the form and clearly showed the figure of the boy.

And the image spoke those words out.

Everyone stopped moving hearing the words. Not because they’re not interested with the boy’s talk, it was because they can’t understand his goal and were at lost.

Moreover, a certain intimidating aura can be felt from the boy.

Whether it was the descend of his main body or it was just his body double?

Even Mizari and Leon who were high ranking existences were overwhelmed by the aura they felt from the boy, and they’re not able to act carelessly.

They stand alertly.

「What is it……? Kazaream-sama was brainwashed ye said!?」

It was Laplace who reacted.

「Ye bastard! What do ye think mah comrades are!!」

Laplace showed his anger which was rare to see.

But, his voice didn’t reach Velda. He simply acted indifferently towards his goal without any interest about Laplace.

Velda hold up his right hand towards Kazaream without minding the reaction of the others.

At that moment, a light separates from Kazaream’s burnt body and sucked into Velda’s hand.

「As if I let you do so!」

Souei with a very quick speed threw a stab at Velda, but his stab passes through the image and didn’t activated the effect of one hit kill.

「it’s not an illusion? Illusion with real substance……?」

「This!? Some kind of parallel existence?」

Towards Leon and Mizari’s analysis,

『Ah, you guys better not thinking too much about me. This is just a recording image.

Because I’m talking while expecting you guys’ behavior, there bout to be a slight sense of incongruity.

Well, I have finished collecting my purpose, it’s time for me to disappear.

Oh yeah, I think I should give you all a present for the end――』

Velda said that he’s a recorded image of himself.

It was Benimaru who was the first to notice the abnormality.

Benimaru had sensed beforehand that it was recorded image of Velda, and without being confused he dashed towards the spot of Footman who held the ball.

The ball finished emitting light and started to pulsating, it begun to erode Footman’s body.

「Be careful! That fat guy――」

It simultaneously happened with Benimaru’s warning.

Kazaream’s body emitted light, then a powerful light and destructive power were unleashed to the surroundings.

It made all of the combined holy demonic energy goes amok and caused a condensed explosion.

The magic power swelled to its maximum inside the container and was released instantly.

With a flash, the castle’s hall is filled with heatless destructive lights.

The overwhelming killing power scattered and attacked the people who were alive.

Velda’s intention was when he retrieved the power he gave to Kazaream, he at the same time manipulated the energy inside Kazaream’s body and make him explode.

「Tch!」

There’re few people who were able to react.

Among them, Benimaru evaded all of flashes of the explosion which could be said a difficult feat while observing the surrounding situation.

Souei who was a distant away from Kazaream, in an instant he positioned Footman as his shield and deploy multiple barriers as his defense.

Mizari who didn’t have any change in her expression, invoked barrier magic which wraps her whole body and she was able to nullify half of it. She received damage from the remaining energy, but as a spiritual life form the injury instantly regenerates.

Laplace was directing his anger towards Velda beside Kazaream, but his life was saved due to his foresight power.

He moved to Tear’s location who was not able to react before the moment of the explosion, and he created a barrier while covering Tear. Even so, he bore a serious injury on his back, but he seemed to be able to avoid death barely.

And then, Leon’s subordinates――

All of them seemed to be safe due to the barrier which the Demon Lord Leon created and Leon who shielded them like a shield with his own body.

But, Leon who prioritized protecting his subordinates over his own self, had received tremendous damage and was unable to move after being bathed in the destructive light which he couldn’t nullify.

However, there’s still light of unyielding will shining in Leon’s eyes and he didn’t let Velda go from his sight.

The attack just now was brutal, but there’s no one who died.

Benimaru who perceived the situation let out a relieved sigh, but there’s a small uncomfortable feeling.

He was able to sense that uncomfortable feeling coming from Footman.

(What is this……?)

He has such question but,

『How’s it? Was the fireworks beautiful?

Well now, it’s a present, but I think it’s about time it join too.

I gave that Footman over there Vega’s egg.

Although it’s reproduced body transplanted with Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』, it have the same ability.

If it absorbs the explosion energy of Kazaream just now and acquired the holy demonic energy, I wonder what would happens?

Oh well, whether it succeeds or fails, both are good.

Well then, please enjoy it to the fullest. Bye bye!』

He lost consciousness for only an instant as he understood the meaning of Velda’s words.

The words that were just was a shock.

(Is that Transfer Technique? Did he returned after getting the core inside Kazaream in his hand?)

Benimaru is analyzing, but he was not confident whether it was the correct answer.

He had no time for it, as he has the produced evil monster as the current problem.

He had received the report of its combat ability from when one of the Four Fiends of the Heaven Commanders, Vega was rampaging. It was fiendish monster having a considerable immortal characteristics.

The effective way against such monster is only by annihilating it with overwhelming energy.

However, if such monster got holy demonic attribute, the usable means of attacking would decrease.

It means that monsters which he can’t defeat if he was not skillful enough.

(This is bad. I used Prominence Acceleration in the fight before, I haven’t recovered my energy yet......)

If Benimaru uses the strongest attack he has, he may exterminate it surely. However, even if he borrows Rimuru’s nihility energy, he calmly concluded that it was dangerous as the loss rate of his energy is too large.

In other words, he can’t help but conclude that the war potential is insufficient against the monster―― the current Vega class―― which possess resistance to holy demonic attribute.

It backfired as Benimaru had used his strongest attack against Kazaream.

He could defeat him even if taking a bit of time, but he ended the fight with a swift attack so he could take care of Laplace. That was Benimaru’s decision.

If he was fighting only against Laplace, he would have enough remaining magic power. There’s also Souei here, and so he judge that there’s no problem even if there’re 4 of awakened Demon Lord class.

It may be said that Benimaru’s decision which aim for a quick conclusion was never wrong.

But, he’s just regretting his own hastiness currently.

For the current war potential here, Leon is wounded all over his body and it’s hard to say that Mizari is unharmed.

Although Souei is uninjured, his ability is specialized against an individual. Because he doesn’t have a long range attack, he’s not suitable for erasing Vega.

Above all, it’s uncertain how will Laplace moves, preparation for that is needed.

People below than it are not included in the war potential.

The strategy that can be taken here might be only for him to be the leader and asking Mizari to assist him.

He can’t help but expect that Mizari has means for a wide area attack like Carrera.

In case she didn’t has such means, she only need to buy some time for him to recover his energy.

Velda said everything that he wanted to say, all his traces has suddenly vanished.

As the person itself said, it seemed to be a recorded image beforehand.

What he need to be cautious is only Footman who carried Vega’s egg.

The time needed for Benimaru to finish collecting his thought was only a short time of 1/1000 or less than one second.

But, even if that thinking was just an instant, it was a decisive period.

When Benimaru turned his sight to Footman, it had already happened.

「Hooohoohooho. Did you see, Laplace?

I, Footman the Angry Clown just killed that hateful Leon.

Including Kazaream-sama’s regrets, I will clear myself from this anger now!」

Footman is saying as if he’s the greatest.

Like backing his words, Footman pulls out his thrust out hand from Leon’s chest.

A large amount of blood flowed out.

「「「Le, Leon-sama!!」」」

Leon’s subordinates panicking.

Meanwhile, Leon collapses in slow movement and vomits blood from his mouth in large quantities.

His heart was pierced, and anyone was able to see that it was a fatal injury.

Having his consciousness almost taken by Velda’s attack is one of the cause, Leon who was covered by wounds all over his body, he’s already not be able to deal with Footman’s movement.

Leon who is one of the Octagram was on the verge of being killed now.

In case of Mizari who is a spiritual lifeform, her core would be likely to be able to regenerate as long as it was not destroyed.

However, Leon is a high ranking human who possess holy body.

He was an awakened Hero, which was similar to existence which don’t have lifespan but―― certainly it was depending on the physical body.

If he evolves to be a spiritual lifeform and become a demi god, the matter might have been different.

Footman continues laughing loudly.

「Are ye a fool……

Didn’t ye hear Nee-san’s last words……」

Laplace tsukkomi to Footman although he’s serious.

However, it didn’t enter Footman’s ear.

Footman has already lived in his delusion, his reason and his mind, everything already eaten away by Vega’s egg.

「What’s this, Footman. Ye too has already broken――」

Laplace frustratingly muttered.

His eyes clearly see the future where Footman breaks.

Vega’s power continues eroding him, Footman’s anger, mind and even memory are consumed to nothing.

In that case, the only thing left is merely an incarnation of destruction.

「I ain’t going to forgive ye, Velda!!!」

Laplace swore for a revenge with anger in his heart.

「Tear, go away for a moment. I will start to be serious, after a long time.」

「Eh, but…… Footman……?」

「Footman is been controlled. By that bastard guy, Velda.

Therefore, I should quickly end it.」

「――Understood. Don’t act rashly!」

「By the way, are ye keeping anything from Velda?」

「I don’t have anything…… Probably, because I stick to Kazaream-sama all the time.

Laplace, don’t leave me alone please……?」

「Hahaha, leave it to me. I’m actually stronger than Kazaream-sama ye know?」

「Yes. I knew.」

Laplace turned his sight to Footman while saying “what did ye know”.

His eyes already swallowed all feelings and all the unrest in his heart disappears.

The Devil, Laplace staggeringly stood up.

And then, he walks carefreely to Benimaru’s side,

「Say, let’s have a temporary truce.」

So he suggested that brazenly.

Benimaru accepted the suggestion.

There’s possibility that’s a lie and a trap, but he was willing to do it including it.

Since Leon who he expected for the biggest attack has fell, he would use any usable hands that can be used.

Above all, Souei can be added to the war potential as Laplace’s alertness is dispelled.

Souei didn’t oppose it, he investigate Laplace’s movement with his clone. Both parties were engaged it together.

They did a strategy meeting while restraining Footman’s rampage.

He was worried about Leon’s condition, but he gives priority to defeat Footman currently.

「If I’m not mistaken, that Vega guy suck up magic essence from the ground right?」

「As long as he’s in contact with the ground, he could reproduce endless.」

To Benimaru and Souei’s converstation,

「Please don’t worry.

This castle is isolated from the world by a spherical isolation barrier even from the ground.

Even the hole made by Benimaru-sama and Kazaream-sama a while ago, it's already been completely restored」

Mizari answers.

It seems to have worked without a flaw.

However, Benimaru expects that there’s no means for long range attack.

Naturally Mizari can use Nuclear Strike Magic, but he judges that a simple magic is not effective.

「Then, you Clown. Do you have any big move or something?

Because his regenerative power is too high, he can recover immediately even if I cut him down you know?」

「Call me Laplace.

For the answer of the question…… I’m sorry.

I’m too, like that Niisan over there, specialized in anti individual.」

「What, you can’t use it …… Didn’t you boast yourself stronger than Kazaream just a while ago!?」

「What a stupid thing to say! If it’s about underhanded trick like Seraphim absorption or Awakened Demon Lord Transformation, I can’t use it, that kind of talk.

Even that such underhanded tricks, even no matter how many I am, I can’t win.

Therefore, I have 10 spirit bombs left, if I let them explode in chains――」

Laplace shrewdly shown the bomb from his pocket for an instant.

‘Oh?’ so Benimaru nod.

The four people were holding a meeting while evading the attacks that the highly nimble Footman launched.

The power was sublime, but they were saved because the attack speed was slow.

It was good currently, but there was possibility that they won’t be able to deal with the speed later on. It will be a suicidal act to prolong this.

「Okay, his current energy is not so big as he just have taken the remains of Kazaream.

If we want to defeat him, now is the time!

Besides, if we spend a lot of time his body will complete adjust to Vega’s power.」

「――That’s right. His attack speed gradually increases.

Since the attack has holy demonic attribute, it will be impossible to completely defend against if you receive it.」

In fact, if there’s no one who can put barrier of both holy and demonic, either attribute would passes through.

It will be nullified if Foootman become able to master it like Kazaream even if there was barrier against both attributes.

「Mizari, I entrust you to maintain the barrier with all your effort. Even in the worst case, don’t let this guy replenish his power more than this!

Souei and Laplace, you two please set the bomb. I left the competition signal to Souei.

Because I will blast everything at the same time as the signal, you two must not fail to get out in time!」

The four people have begun to move at once under Benimaru’s command.

It was an impromptu plan, but they shows a wonderful cooperation, with Laplace and Souei’s strings, Footman is fastened.

As 10 spirit bombs floats in Footman’s surroundings, Souei gave a signal.

「Right now!」

At the same time, Benimaru multiplied the barrier meticulously that he deploys.

He thoroughly probe the surroundings and made sure that there was no other Footman’s fragments.

On top of that, he enclosed it so that there was no room for Footman to create a clone.

「Take this, Hell Prominence!!!」

Flames of hell sweep over inside the barrier.

At the same time, the spirit bombs explode and caused a chain explosion inside the barrier.

It was originally an attack of holy demonic attribute that could be defended against.

Yes, originally……

「It’s, it’s lie right!? That Footman, he ate the explosion energy!!!」

The energy of the union of holy and demonic attribute was too compatible with Footman who obtained Kazaream’s attribute.

Even while his body is burnt, as his body were regenerated by his super recovery ability, his lost energy was replenished. Footman didn’t keep his original form anymore and his size was enlarged into three meters, becoming an incarnation of violence.

「Why do you use something like explosions of holy demonic attribute!」

「How cruel! Aren’t ye the one who agreed to it!」

Although Benimaru and Laplace was quarreling and screaming, that was an act to lighten the atmosphere even a bit.

It might be said that the situation was the worst.

As the current attack was not working, the only way left is to wait until Benimaru’s energy to be restored; it was such a pessimistic plan.

It was unknown whether it would succeed, it was also clear that Footman would became able to master Vega’s power if they’re buying time for it.

The current Footman rage recklessly as he lost his ego.

He will kill all the living people in this place completely.

The only point that can be said as saving grace was his egoless attack which was means of survival for Benimaru and co.

「It can’t be helped…… it will be a war of attrition, I guess we only have to do it.」(Benimaru)

「That’s right, there’s no other way.」(Souei)

「I shall accompany you.」(Mizari)

「No helping it. Prioritize yerself to survive above all else.」(Laplace)

The four people were prepared for it.

But, the overwhelming determination and touching emotion of the four people was destroyed in the next moment.

「Kufufufufu. So, this is what said that ‘you are never careful enough in the final stage’, Benimaru-dono.」 (Highlight stealing Demon)

No one knew when he arrived, an evil demon suddenly appeared behind Footman and gripped his head.

And just like that, he flung it against the ground.

The demon turn around and shrugged his shoulder like he was showing his disappointment.

「Against such small fry of this level, what are you guys playing around?」(Rimuru’s Demon Butler)

With a sarcastic smile, he said those words.





Chapter 214: The Closed World


I let out a sigh, as I looked at Diablo, who was going "Kufufufufu".

He's totally getting carried away. It felt like he was saying 'Thank you very much!'.

That bulky pierrot who was Diablo's opponent――I think Footman was his name――I can't help but feel sorry for him.

He's pretty much insane now, having only the motive to kill every other moving thing in his immediate vicinity, but it's not like I'm actually worried about him.

The one who I need to worry about, was Leon who was now collapsed before me.

I walked over to Leon's side, and placed my hand onto his chest.

Leon's subordinates were looking at me all surprised, but I put a finger on my lip, as a sign for them to keep quiet.

Now wasn't the time for a vocal dispute.

I took out a Full Potion from my chest pocket (which was in fact my『Imaginary Space』) , and I used it to close up the gaping hole in Leon's chest.

But, the potion only did that much. Leon had yet to wake up, even though his body had been repaired.

But, there was no need to panic.

This was still, the closed off world inside of Mizari's barrier.

You could say, that Leon was really lucky. Just because, if I had not come he would have been in real danger.

In the first place, if I were to give a reason as to why we are here――

I'm letting Velda assume that I'm dead, as I observed everything happening in the world while lurking in the shadows.

The mini Moss clones stealthily dispersed by Diablo, were greatly convenient. They provided some of the best spy information, as always.

My observation magic, and Moss' spy intel.

Understanding what was happening anywhere was easy peasy, no matter where I chose to hide.

Well, transferring the information into the alternate dimension I was hiding in took some work, but I got Ciel to do this so this problem was solved.

Using some magic theory I totally didn't understand, she created a comfortable space for where we did our spying.

As expected of sensei. She's almighty as always.

We collected all sorts of information in that space, and as I was looking through it all with Diablo...

Velda's presence was detected, in Leon's territory.

《There is a very high chance, that it is not his main body. But, the chance to gain some much needed intel is also there――》

I see.

If it's sensei's words, it must be true.

And that, was pretty much the gist of why I'm here now.

Well, it's not like the situations in the other locations can be ignored, but this war ends when Velda is defeated, so what I will prioritize was pretty obvious.

Over at Guy's place, his battle with Chloe was growing in intensity but there were no big changes just yet.

Ruminas' side was also on a pinch, but there's Adalman and Albert, along with Shion too. They'd be able to hold out for awhile.

It would have been the best if I could defeat Velda when he appeared here, but that's just wishful thinking.

It looks like Velda's objective, was to recover the power that he had given to Kazaream.

He gave his projection physical mass, which meant he linked a portion of his actual body as part of the projection's data with an ability similar to『Parallel Existence』.

Parallel existence, was an ability that let the user control clones of himself, but needed Energy to be divided for each copy.

What he did, was that he only overlapped his consciousness with the projection data so as to allow him to recover the power as data, that sounds about right.

『Parallel Existence』which there is always a 'main body', or『Multiple Existence』in which every copy is a 'main body'.

Which one is more of a pain to deal with, depends on the person using the ability.

But, in terms of ability classing,『Multiple Existence』 is definitely one of the highest tier abilities without a doubt.

Even now, as Ciel-sensei is analyzing it right now, I can say that with confidence.

But I digressed.

The moment I arrived, was right when Velda's『Multiple Existence』copy had finished recovering the power from Kazaream.

I had just missed him.

Nothing I can do about that. By the time I teleported over after detecting him, Velda had already finished what he came here for.

Information was delivered at the moment of cognition. That was one of the annoying things about『Multiple Existence』.

It's impossible to overpower that transfer speed, unless you use some ability to stop time.

To quote Ciel-sensei, the speed at which data was transferred, was practically faster than the speed of light.

It was word for word, "at the same time".

So, there wasn't anything we could have done to prevent Velda from slipping through our fingers this time.

In any case, this was but a portion of him as data so it's not like we could have given him a finishing blow anyways, so I was not going to lose sleep over this.

The real problem happened after that.

Mizari repaired the hole in the barrier that Benimaru and Kazaream's battle opened.

That was likely as attempt to cut off Velda's data body, but that was impossible even with the reaction speed of a demon.

Rather you could say it was a valiant attempt, with the situation being what it was.

Me and Diablo snuck in through the hole too, but now we're stuck inside too.

For us who were painstakingly avoiding getting found by Velda, breaking the barrier to leave was a no go. We'd definitely be found out if we did that.

This was a slightly embarrassing situation, so me and Diablo were completely hiding our presence and observing the others instead.

So, we sat back for awhile, and Leon collapsed soon after that.

It looked like it would be a "death confirmed!" if this went on as is, so I decided to lend a hand and made my appearance.

That was after getting the green light from Ciel, after confirming no data could be transferred in or out of Mizari's wonderful barrier.

If, there was any chance at all that I would get found by Velda, I would have left Leon to his own fate.

Don't think too badly of me, the important thing now is defeating Velda. This may seem cold but this was just me setting my priorities straight.

But, this was good luck for Leon, as our current location was completely shut out from the outside world.

I immediately strengthened Mizari's barrier, in preparation for making my appearance.

――and here we are again, as I started treating Leon.

At a glance, his soul seemed intact, but his Core had taken damage.

It was the source of power, that an awakened hero attained. If this was damaged, they became unable to properly control their powers.

That was what was reported, after Ciel sensei did a calm analysis.

Fumu fumu, what should I do now.

But, the remainder are making a ruckus which is a problem.

Benimaru seemed to be very drained after his bout with Kazaream, and couldn’tt defeat that blob in a single attack as he was now.

As expected he understood that he shouldn't waste energy in attacks that don't get him results, so there's no sign of him trying to do such things.

Souei and that devil Laplace too, lack the firepower to cause any decisive damage.

Mizari was putting all her effort into her barrier, which is the right decision.

They looked to be stalling until Benimaru recovered his energy, but that wouldn't give me much peace of mind to carry on with treatment.

I kinda felt bad for Benimaru, but I judged that this is time for Diablo to make his appearance.

「Alright! Can't help it huh. Go for it, Diablo-san!」

The moment I gave my order, Diablo who was standing by sprung into action.

「Kufufufufu. Leave it to me, my master!」

He gleefully and grandly makes his appearance, grabs Footman by the head and slams him into the ground.

That was quite the outset, were my thoughts when I saw what happened.

The rest who were shocked, and Diablo with his smug face.

From there on, the situation was expected to become one sided.

I focused on treating Leon, and when I snuck a peek at what was happening――

「Kufufufufu. What's wrong? Is that all that your power amounts to?」

It had turned into a situation where I wanted to say "Just what kind of a villain are you!".

Well, was it because I also gave him orders in a somewhat villainous tone? Nah, that's *probably* not it.

Diablo diced Footman up with the claws on both of his hands, showing the difference in power between them. Naturally, the parts that were cut up slowly dwindled away.

Diablo was chopping him up at a pace that overpowers his regeneration.

Huge flashes of light and impacts happened every once in awhile, was the barrier going to hold out like this?

I'm worried, even though I did strengthen the barrier.

(Hey hey, is this going to be okay? Has Diablo forgotten that we should be trying to stay off of Velda's radar?)

《It is judged to be under control. On that point, Diablo has his bases covered.》

Ciel confidently replies.

Oh I see it now, I didn't notice when, but Diablo had used his『Temptation Lord Azazel』and activated『Temptation World』.

As expected of Diablo, his combat style was as shrewd as ever.

Diablo wouldn't be committing the same mistakes that Benimaru had done, huh.

(Hmm, looks like it won't be a problem. Don't think I'll need to worry, and just leave that to Diablo...)

《It'll be fine. It doesn't seem like he will fail to divest Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』.》

Eh!?

You meant that part!? I was not worrying about that!!

Without me knowing yet again, the main prerequisite became stealing the enemy's ability.

I'd just let you guys do that.

I have went beyond being shocked, and just half heartedly went back to doing Leon's treatment.

As I moved on with Leon's treatment, I overheard Benimaru and co.'s conversation.

「...ya know, I've been thinking... But that demon, ain't he just plain nonsense?

How is he――he's just brute forcing his way through, but how is he not showing any signs of fatigue?」

「Ahh, right. He's just that kind of person...」

「As expected of Diablo-sama... Looks like I, still have a long way to go.」

「Don't go thinking of him as the standard. That's not a battle style that we can learn from, that's why he's just boldly showing his hand.

It's suicidal to even think of trying what he's doing.」

To Laplace's question, Benimaru tosses a reply back.

Mizari simply gave her honest feedback, while Souei calmly analyzes and gives a warning.

I don't think there was a need to explain in such detail to someone who was only a temporary ally, but maybe Souei was slightly shaken up from the situation.

It's not like that can be mimicked easily anyway, so he probably didn't care all too much.

He was surprised enough by the appalling spectacle to have lost all words for a while, but seems like he had calmed down enough.

From the previous pinch they were in, the situation probably felt like a joke to him now.

Accepting the facts that have just happened must have been troubling for him.

「Kufufufufu. Oh my apologies. I seem to have put in a little too much force, I seem to have ripped an arm off.」

His enemy cowered as though being trampled by the strong, as the demon chuckled.

This was all too one sided to even call it a fight, even the spectators felt uncomfortable as they watched on.

Diablo was so overpowered, it looked like he was playing around.

But, contrary to his tone, Diablo was making use of extremely high level skills and was progressing his battle calculatingly.

Destroying parts as he went on, he slowly sapped Footman's energy.

The claws that his hands were clad in, was the Energy of『Turn Null』in a super compressed form.

He was using the Energy he borrowed from me in a focused style. Such a feat was only possible, with his exceptional battle sense.

Firstly, from what could be deduced by looking at the remains of the battlefield――of course Ciel sensei was the one doing it――, the Energy that Benimaru had borrowed from me, he released all of it in one instant.

Controlling these vicious void energies then dumping it on the enemy, this certainly works against most beings.

Most would probably be destroyed without being able to resist.

But, there was always a price to pay.

You would have to use a massive chunk of your own Energy, and become unable to continue with a prolonged battle like how Benimaru is right now.

It's great to keep as an ace in the hole, but it wasn't something to be used carelessly.

On that point, Diablo's method of using it is more reliable.

His special training to kill time in the past two days, certainly bore fruit.

It was a method of circulating Energy thought up by Ciel sensei, while we were hiding in subspace.

Aptly named, the "Torus Secret Art".

That's just an awesome name for it, but essentially, it's just using any space control type ability to create a situation to prevent energy from dispersing, then absorbing back the energy that was used.

To quote an existing example, when Diablo was in his『Temptation World』, he was able to recycle his own energy constantly.

This logic was as hard to understand as magic, but Diablo was able to understand Ciel's words.

Let's say, there was your energy and the energy of another being, in a closed off world.

Your aim would be to neutralize the opposition――or, mutual dispersion was okay too――, but strictly speaking, the idea was to seclude one of the energies and release the other one from that closed world.

Then, you absorbed back whichever one that was your energy.

The opposition's released energy was then used to maintain the 'world' that was created for this purpose.

By using this cycle, it became possible to one sidedly weaken your opponent.

Honestly, I couldn't understand any of that stuff, but Diablo managed to pull it off.

Even now, the spectators were probably thinking that he was brute forcing his way, but the truth was far from that.

Looking at their reactions, the few who actually understood what was going on, were probably only Benimaru and Mizari.

Well, saying that they understood felt like a stretch. It's more that, they didn't fully understand the inner workings, but could tell that something's up.

It's probably a good idea to teach Benimaru about this afterwards, but would he be able to understand this?

I have Ciel with me, so there's no problems even if *I* don't understand this.

Mm, the only support I could give him would be to get around that with fighting spirit or something.

As expected even if this was a closed off world(within a barrier), it's not exactly able to withstood the full powered single instance burst of void energies, so some extent of adjustment was required.

If you were to ask who could do this right after hearing the theory, Diablo was most likely the only one who was able to.

As I watched Diablo's battle in the distance, Leon's injuries fully healed without me noticing.

In the midst of it, I dumped all the work onto Ciel!

That's how much my motivation amounts to.

If it he was a bishoujo things would obviously be different, I could care less about guys, much less an Ikemen.

It was honestly, "motivation, dropped!".

That was why while in the middle of it,

《To fully resurrect, there is a need to turn him from his current state, to that which is similar to Hero Chloe's Almighty state and manage the flow of his holy aura, for that――》

(I'll leave that to you!)

And so, I let Ciel do all the work without any intent to listen to all the explanations.

It was mostly into one ear and out the other, but I think it was some stuff about his Hero Core being damaged, so a substitute is needed.

Reviving him normally would cause a drop in his combat abilities, so I chose to heal Leon without causing that to happen.

What's with all the permissions she's asking me for.

So I just diverted all that away with a "Ciel sensei is cautious as always!"

But, when I looked at the revived Leon, I was half suspicious of my own eyes.

Huh? Isn't it like, he got strengthened a little too much... I almost shouted out "C-Ciel sensei, just what did you do!!".

An analysis shows, that he has become a Demi-God.

Before this Leon had generous amounts of holy aura inside of him, now he has become the very holy aura that used to be within him.

Simply said, he has become a spiritual entity.

He didn’t have a Core now, so to adjust the flow of Ki, he was remodeled to work without the need of a core.

I see... That's not it!

Though he wasn't hostile to us, why did you go and power up this fellow who wasn't exactly an ally!

......Well, I was the one who diverted the information away.

Doesn't make sense for me to complain now.

Good grief, it's all good if we don't antagonize him.

In addition, the change was kinda forcefully done, so it's gonna take awhile for him to become able to fully utilize his new powers.

So we just need to finish up Velda, before it comes to that point.

Well, things will work out somehow. I won't be letting this bother me.

As i mused over such things, Leon began to regain consciousness.

He slightly opened his eyes, looking at me. And,

「Shizu, huh... Heh, have you come to get your revenge on me?」

Somehow, he seemed to be going on with some half asleep nonsense.

「If I were to be destroyed by you, then I shall accept. Now, do your worst.」

Leon prattled on.

It looks like, he is mistaking me for Shizu-san.

That's mighty annoying.

So,

「Fwha-!」

I threw Leon, whom I was cradling. (TN: no homo)

Why should I care so much, for someone who has fully recovered.

「――! Is that you, Rimuru?」

「Ahh, finally woke up? You better thank me, worship me too!」

「I... I see, so you are the one who revived me――」

I swirled my hair up and nodded.

I practiced this secretly, a pose where I (supposedly) look awesome.

「Many thanks, Demon Lord Rimuru.」

「Umu. Thank me more!」

He's properly thanking me, guess I have nothing to worry about for the time being.

As Leon and I were doing our short skit, Leon's followers in unison,

「「「Leon-sama!! Thank heavens, you are alright!!!」」」

So, they all came over as they said that.

Some were even bawling, but none of them were unscathed.

I have already done so much, I'll just add this in as a bonus.

I take out one Full Potion for each person, and break them on each individual.

「What are you-!?」

The surprised ones said that, but then they noticed their injuries disappearing almost instantly.

This is even more effective than magic, can't help that they'd be surprised.

Right when all their injuries are healed,

「「「Demon Lord Rimuru-sama, this great favor you have given us, shall not be forgotten!!!」」」

All of Leon's followers got down on their knees, and lowered their heads to me.

Mmm, this kind of stuff doesn't really mean much to me.

I feel slightly embarrassed, so I'm hoping they would stop with this formal stuff.

Now that Leon has revived, and with his followers making a big fuss over this, naturally Benimaru and co. have noticed me as well.

「「Rimuru-sama!」」

Benimaru and Souei came rushing over.

「So you really were alright!」

「See, what'd I say? There was nothing to worry about!」

「Isn't that, what Zegion said...」

「I'll have none of that. I believed from the very beginning!」

As expected, they panicked somewhat when news of my destruction reached them.

Zegion noticed almost immediately――he was totally unfazed too――that my divine protection has not disappeared, which helped calm everyone down.

「Uh, sup. You guys doing okay? I was thinking of getting Velda to lower his guard with this.

Additionally, the plan was to smoke out any rebels too.」

I tried to smooth my way out with this explanation.

But, this was more than enough apparently.

「So that really was the plan, huh.」

「As expected of Rimuru-sama. Now then how should we(your followers) go about with this?」

Benimaru looked convinced, while Souei inquired for details with the intention to take action immediately.

Now just hold your horses.

There's still somebody smacking Footman around, let's not forget about him.

With my appearance, you guys are feeling either too relieved or too enthusiastic.

「Hold on a sec, we got to end the battle here first. Diablo, you all good there?」

I had been found by them anyway, no need for me to be reserved now.

I decided to defeat Footman as soon as possible.

「Kufufufufu. The preparations are mostly complete, Rimuru-sama.」

「Alright.」

I nodded, and walked towards Footman.

「Dangit, damnnnnn! Just what, what the fuck is going on!!

Y-you insects! To do this, to me the great Footman-samaaaa!!」

To Footman who couldn’t even tell what's left or right now, Diablo delivered one final attack onto him.

「You're being noisy, shut your trap.」

As he said that.

Footman became unable to speak, as his lower jaw was blown away.

Eww that looked nasty. I'll do this quickly.

「I shan't cause anymore suffering unto you. You too, shall find peace within me.」

And I devoured him, after saying that.

Due to Diablo's work of weakening him, consumption of Footman was completed pretty much instantly.

It went so easily to the point where he didn't even have the chance for a final struggle.

And just as Ciel planned, I also successfully obtained Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi・Dahaka』.

「Kufufufufu. As expected of Rimuru-sama, that was splendidly done!」

「Oh no, this was all you Diablo, you helped weaken him a bunch. And also, good work there Benimaru and Souei.」

「「「Yes!」」」

The 3 of them kneeled, and acknowledged my commendations.

Them doing this every time feels kinda inconvenient to me, but formalities are important to them.

And so, the present threat disappears all too easily.

Later,

「This is hard to take in so suddenly, but seriously, just what the heck are those two...

Well, we can put the demon aside, but that Demon Lord is way too unbelievable...

Anyone who would actually pick a fight with him, can only be foolhardy or downright insane.

This puts the nail in the coffin. I'm now sure Kazaream-sama was definitely brainwashed in some way.」

「I think so too.

Kazaream-sama had always been cautious, he'd never antagonize that kind of monster.

He would even go out of his way to sneakily push for an alliance in the shadows, that much would be certain.」

「I know right? He was the devious type who wouldn't think twice over this kinda stuff.」

The two of them were really letting it all out as though they have realized something important.

One of them, the devil Laplace, was a dangerous fellow who is at least equal to Souei.

It might not be a good idea to leave them be.

If that's the case,

「So anyways, you two there. Come work for me, 'kay!」

I'll just make that decision for them.

「Wait a-! What are you deciding on your own――」

「Kufufufufu. Are there, *any* problems with that?」

「Eh, ah... You know――」

Laplace looked like he wanted to object, but is at a loss for words before Diablo's "smile".

He ended up fiddling with his fingers.

I was rooting for the girl beside him(you can do it!), but she could only quietly say, "This is impossible for me~".

This made me feel kinda sorry for them.

「Err, well... You say you're hiring us, so does that mean we can expect to get paid?」

「Hoon, salary!」

「Ah! No, that's not what I meant...」

「Hooh? Then, mind if I ask what you really meant?」

「Errr, that's uhh...」

Salary, huh.

Come to think of it, back at Tempest it's mostly been something like a material reward system, we don't actually have a salary system.

I did want to think about it some time back but it got forgotten with all the stuff that's happened. I'll need to discuss with Myourmiles about this.

「Hey, those little details can be discussed at a later time. So, what are your choices then?」

「Understood! Then I shall be in uhh, your care!」

「Ah, me too!」

Laplace and Tear, these two devils are now in my custody.

There's no salary just yet, so it kinda looks like they were threatened into being hired, but you lose if you think too deeply about this sort of thing.

There's also Diablo who won(threatened) them over with his "smile".

After all that, we had a little conference, together with the revived Leon.

Firstly, for them to keep quiet about me as I'm in hiding.

It's obvious, but the alliance will be called off the moment information about me is spread out. This essentially means I'll let their country be destroyed if that happens.

This got most of them pale in the face and they nodded in agreement, no worries here for me.

Me and Diablo are going to go back into hiding after this, so it's important we don't let Velda notice anything.

As for Leon's country, they will still continue to battle with the forces which were led by Kazaream.

They should be able to at least manage this much. I went and fully healed all the key appointment holders, and the opposition leader has been dealt with too.

Benimaru will be returning to Tempest to lead our side again.

Souei will be supporting Benimaru.

As for Laplace and Tear, I ordered them to stay in Leon's country and help with the defense. They'll help bolster the country that they originally attacked――but the losses weren't as great as initially thought to be――as reinforcements.

It's not like there won't be any lingering hatred at all, but I ordered them to keep that stuff to the minimum.

I pushed the gratitude they have for me into Leon's face too, to get him to forgive them.

It's awfully selfish of me to do this, but that's how I roll.

I got them to promise to cooperate, though it was limited to this time only, but this is good enough for now.

What comes afterwards, can be decided when this great war has been won, and that we survive.

Also, though I feel slightly bad for Leon and co., this is also meant to be a test for Laplace and co. . I didn't want to divide Tempest's forces anymore than it already is, so it's a win-win condition for me.

I want them to work hard, and focus on the defense of the countries.

Just in case, I get Souei to keep an eye on them.

Whether I decide to fully trust Laplace and co. or not, will depend on Souei's report after everything is over.

At the bare least, there won't be problems if they don't betray me during the duration of the great war.

There's also the thing about Velda brainwashing Kazaream――it's probably his Thought Guidance――which Laplace is pretty mad about, so I don't think he's going to betray me at this point in time.

So our plan of action is more or less decided as so, though the agreement from the others have mostly been forcefully smoothed over by me.

And thus, the ruckus in Leon's country, came to its eventful end.





Chapter 215: Time Accelerated


Inside the stopped time, three people were facing each other in a three-way standoff.

Guy’s sword flickered but was repelled by Chloe’s katana.

Chloe then sent out a slash with a flowing movement which was repelled by the ice wall that appeared in front of Velzard.

The ice wall broke and burst, becoming bullets of ice which poured over Guy and Chloe, but the two people ward all of them off with the weapons they hold in their hands without difficulty.

Neither strategy nor psychological warfare had any meaning, it’s a world ruled by absolute power.

In that situation, the three demonstrated their power, no one conceded even for one step.

It was a contest of equal balance.

‘Well, what should I do?’

Guy thought.

Even in the world where the time stopped, Chloe could move calmly.

In a world where normal eyesight didn’t have any meaning as even the light particles have stopped.

In this world where time stopped, the reactions from the energy released is used to perceive the situation.

Whether it’s Heroes or Devils, since they were bound by the world’s rule, it’s impossible for them to act.

However, Chloe had transcended that restriction.

In other words ――

(This person, was a spiritual lifeform too, that’s it)

It meant this.

Even in the lowest level, she should had become a Demi God.

A person who reached the domain of God while being in a mortal body.

But, in this case, it’s convenient. As even Guy would withdraw from fighting against Velzard while protecting Chloe who couldn’t move.

Afterall, inside the world where time stopped, even defensive power became zero.

Explaining it easily, all of the connections between the inherent energy that a substance has became cut off.

In other words, the motion of all substances stops. Everything even the link between substances and molecular motion.

Because it was stopped, when an external force is applied, it will collapse easily.

Even if it’s a lump of steel, even if it’s the worlds hardest material, it can be destroyed even by the impact of a gentle breeze.

Of course, the same applied even to superior arms. If it’s lower than Legend class, they have no meaning.

Defending a target in such a state, the difficulty is too high even for Guy.

Fortunately, Chloe doesn’t seem to have any problem in the stopped world. It’s dangerous to think so even though she’s an enemy, but in this case he appreciated it.

He put his worry for Chloe aside for the time being.

The current problem was what he should do in this situation.

Stopping Velzard’s rampage, and defeating Velda. Those became his ultimate goal.

His fight with Chloe is an act, Guy’s main purpose is to get out from this place. But it’s impossible for Chloe to ignore Guy due to the effect of the curse.

A very troublesome situation.

Even so, for Guy fighting against two people at the same time is not impossible.

After all, Guy’s ability that is Ultimate Skill『Prideful Lord Lucider』is the strongest ability.

The essence of this ability is complete replication of ability that he saw once.

It’s one of the reasons why Guy was expecting that birth of the other Demon Lords’ skill.

In order for him to be the strongest being, he observe various Ultimate Skill and taking them as his.

In order words, as Guy is analyzing Chloe and Velzard’s ability, it’s not impossible for him to nullify them.

However, for that――

(First of all, they didn’t use their ability.

I know Velzard’s『Patience Lord Gabriel』, but what kind of ability is『Envious Lord Leviathan』?

Beside, that Chloe girl―― Rimuru gave a high praise for her, yet she has only shown her swordsmanship till now......)

――that’s right, it’s important for him to see the ability of the two to analyze it.

Even so Guy believed in his own strength.

He faced the two while getting fed up without being careless.

‘Ara, it’s a bother.’

Velzard felt unpleasantness as Chloe was able to move in the stopped time like it’s natural.

She intended to stop the time, get rid of Chloe and enjoy a fight with Guy in this world with just the two of them.

And yet, Chloe whom she looked down upon as an inferior human was able to act in the stopped world where only those who had transcend as supreme being can exist in it, it’s an unexpected event for Velzard.

Moreover, Chloe was able to fight her and Guy evenly, it became a very unpleasant situation.

(Despite being an awakened Hero, she’s more than I expected.)

Velzard stopped looking down on Chloe.

She recognized her as an enemy which she should defeat.

In the first place, Guy was strong.

Even if Velzard tried to defeat him seriously, she knew that victory would be extremely difficult.

Guy could understand the essence of an ability from just a glimpse with his gifted observation eyes.

Therefore, all of Velzard’s abilities were naturally exposed, it would be impossible to win if she only depends on Ultimate Skill『Patience Lord Gabriel』.

But ――

Right now, she had obtained Ultimate Skill『Envious Lord Leviathan』, she able to see the victory.

In that case, she concluded that she need to postpone the elimination of the obstacle that’s Chloe.

If she exposed her skills poorly, her chance for victory might disappear.

She postponed the elimination, but, it’s troublesome if she’s disturbed.

She thought so, and released an ability towards Chloe.

It’s necessary to use『Envious Lord Leviathan』 to deal the finishing blow without it being known by Guy. Therefore, she was using『Patience Lord Gabriel』 right now.

『Patience Lord Gabriel』’s ability is absolute defense power. Its essence is『Fixation』.

With inherent ability to stop things, it was a very compatible ability with her.

Freezing the moisture in the atmosphere, creating an ice wall is also its ability.

It was possible even if she didn’t freeze only the water molecules particularly and with other molecules mixed, but the result of her valuing the beautiful appearance was only a wall of ice.

Thus ――

「You are a hindrance. Please be obedient and stay there! Air Wall (Atmospheric Prison Wall)l!!」

Velzard just solidified the atmosphere around Chloe and formed a prison which couldn’t be destroyed instantly.

Naturally, for those who could move in this stopped time, they didn’t need to breath anymore. Chloe didn’t die because of this attack, but Velzard had no problem whether she could break free from the prison or not.

Velzard only wanted her combat with Guy not be disturbed.

But――

‘Kiiiiiiiiin!’ such clear sound could be heard, the atmospheric prison was cut opened.

The atmosphere in the stopped world shook, with the sound of impact accompanying a slash attack.

It was already beyond the level of a sword technique.

Velzard was astonished in the truest meaning.

(That’s right―― Hero Chloe, you are also standing in the same dimension as me and Guy, you couldn’t be underestimated.)

A powerful person who’s supported with experiences and didn’t rely on her ability.

And like herself, she realized that Chloe hadn’t yet shown all of her cards.

Velzard glared at Chloe with hatred.

(Then, like with Guy, I will seriously fight against her seriously.)

An enemy whom she should defeat. Also, an equal like her too.

Velzard accepted the fact and finally became serious.

Chloe perceived Velzard’s attack and shown a hesitation for a moment.

Should I withdraw from the current combat and fight the winner? So she thought.

But, unfortunately it was not permitted. Her body spontaneously reacted without being able to go against the order to fight Guy.

With her ability, the Absolute Severance of Ultimate Skill『Hope Lord Sariel』.

Velzard’s ability of absolute fixation was offset by Chloe’s Absolute Severance, its shape is cut by Chloe’s sword technique.

In this case, Chloe’s power seemed to surpass it, but it was equal in ability.

Rather for Chloe, it’s an undesirable development because she would expose her skills.

“Always hold a trump card!” such was Rimuru’s teaching that she follow.

It’s a dependable ability, but it’s preferable to use it at the decisive moment. She was warned strictly that when she showed it too many times, countermeasures would be made.

In fact, even in the stopped world where she had an absolute confidence, Rimuru shown her his quick adaptation.

If it was real combat, there might be a possibility that she would lose some of her mind composure.

And, she wasn’t surprised at people on the level like Guy and Velzard to be able to exist in the stopped world like it was natural because of that experience.

As for Velzard, she possess energy incomparable to Chloe, as she could stop time for a long time.

The duration of time that Chloe could stop is only around several seconds. However, Velzard can easily stop time for more than several minutes without a problem.

(Obviously, she’s a higher existence than me――）

Chloe recognized the difference in ability clearly.

Thus, she prudently waited for the chance.

Because she believed that Rimuru would defeat Velda as long as she bought time here.

But, a small doubt appeared inside Chloe.

(It’s strange, why did Velzard start by confining me?

My action can’t go against the order to fight against Guy. If her aim is to defeat Guy, it should be natural to cooperate together......

She have a connection with Velda, is she not informed about me? Is it something like that?

I don’t think that Velzard ignores Velda’s words either.

If that’s so...... Velda didn’t tell anything about me? Such a thing......?)

She thought that Velda’s action was too unnatural based on what she guessed from Velzard’s action.

(――Right now I must concentrate on the fight!)

Chloe forgot the thought.

She thought about focusing herself to her katana and sharpened her senses.

Guy and Velzard.

In front of those two overwhelming higher existences, worrying about something would lead her directly to death.

Since the『Memory Retrieval』of her Ultimate Skill『Space-Time Lord Yog-Sothoth』had been sealed off, she needed to face them with other abilities.

Time stop didn’t have a meaning either.

Because in the stopped world, you couldn’t stop time any further.

Even if you added a stopped world inside a stopped world, there’s no effect. It would only lengthen the duration of the stopped time.

Since her trump card was sealed off, she couldn’t say that she going easy anymore.

Chloe made up her mind to stand in this place with all of her power.

When the three people determined their resolution to fight ――

A crimson meteor pierced “White Ice Palace” which was Guy’s castle.

Inside the stopped world, with an abnormal speed, the castle was destroyed in front of the three people.

The person who destroyed the castle which was reinforced by Velzard’s Concept Fixation, stands calmly.

With messy azure colored hair and Cardinal Aura clad to its body.

The ruler of beautiful scarlet manifested in the stopped world.

“Scorch Dragon” Velgrind joined the fight.

「Long time no see, Nee-san. By the way, the guy who killed my partner seems to meddle with Nee-san too.」

「Ah, Velgrind. You seem to be very lively.

It’s regrettable about Rudra. But, he’s human after all. You don’t need to care about it forever.

It seems you’re worrying about me, but I’m all right.

Because I’m sure that Velda is the reincarnation of Nii-san ――」

Both of their eyes intersected.

Colors of anger appeared in Velgrind’s eyes as Rudra was spoken ill of, aura surged out increasingly from her body

「Guy, I shall take Nee-san as my opponent.

You Chloe, Demon Lord Rimuru seemed to be worried about you, do your best to survive.

If you die, that Demon Lord would go on a rampage, you see. If it’s Guy, he would become a great opponent.

Also Nee-san, for your mind to be caught by that imposter, how pathetic.

I will make you come to your senses.」

Velzard’s presence was dyed with anger too.

The mind of both dragon sisters swelled and both moved at the same time.

Both of them clashed.

By the shock wave of the rising destruction, a part of the “White Ice Palace” scattered into pieces.

Two beautiful dragons emerged in that place.

White and red.

The stopped world was dyed in color by the vivid hue.

And the essence of the red dragon’s ability was――『Acceleration』――!!

Both of the ability to stop and ability to accelerate clashed and neutralized each other’s power.

When Velzard’s ability was offset, the stopped time regained its flow once again.

The world which was stopped had begun to move again.

At the center of the north continent, the fight between the strongest species raised its curtain.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

For now, I transferred from Leon’s castle to the hidden subspace.

As planned, Benimaru and the other would play their roles.

In order to deceive Velda’s eyes, the barrier was left active.

He would think that the battle is still continuing on the inside. Well, there’dl be no problem even if it’s exposed.

As long as he didn’t notice my existence, all would be fine.

Leon and co will be all right for a while, I restarted the observation of the other places.

The situation in the capital of Ingrassia Kingdom became quite serious, but it’s not critical enough for me to get involved.

However, a problem is still a problem, I ordered Diablo’s subordinates to move and resolve the problem.

「Please leave it to me, Rimuru-sama!」

Diablo bowed to me reverently and put the order into practice.

Although, he just ordered Moss to moved the subordinates. Probably it will be Venom or someone nearby.

Diablo himself didn’t seem to have any desire to move from my side. Oh well, it’s fine.

With such feeling, I continued my observation.

《The world movement has stopped. Someone seems to have invoked『Suspended World』――》



Ciel informed a warning.

「Kufufufufu. This scale of the『Suspended World』 is not just several seconds. Perhaps――」

「Is it Velda or Velzard?」

《Velda in the present situation didn’t have a reason to stop time. Most likely, it’s Velzard――》

Hmm, that might be so.

Even if Guy had the ability to stop time, it wouldn’t be strange, but he has no reason to use it.

Chloe would not stop time for a long time like this. Or rather, it’s meaningless.

Because if the opponent could move inside the stopped world, it would just wasted energy. There’s no meaning for stopping time for a long time if she couldn’t find some kind of superiority in it.

Anyway……

「By making that ‘it’s natural’ face, so you can move in that world too, Diablo.」

「Kufufufufu. Of course, Rimuru-sama. It might be still impossible for Benimaru, if it’s Zegion possibly――」

‘Ho, hohou……’

Even though I was able to do this just the other day.

While I didn’t realize it, my subordinates seemed to display a surprising growth.

「What shall I do? Shall I go and help Chloe-jou?」

Then, I was pondering. Even if he went there, transferring would be dangerous.

It’s also difficult to grasp the situation inside the stopped world. Because light stopped inside too, my surveillance magic was also useless.

Transferring there without understanding the situation would be suicidal.

Naturally the reports from Moss had also stopped.

Although moving inside might be possible, it was impossible to contact each other.

If it became so, flying there was the quickest way but it would take one hour.

When I was thinking so――

《Ah, there’s a movement. Velgrind seems to have entered the war.》

Ciel who observed the situation told me that.

Immediately after that, the stopped time began to flow.

Apparently, Velgrind seemed to have neutralized the stopped world.

「Rimuru-sama, it’s seems to be one of Velzard-sama’s ability after all.

Just now, a report came from Moss.」

「How’s the situation?」

「Velgrind-sama has started a combat with Velzard-sama.

Both in Dragon Mode, it seems to be a real fight.

Kufufufufu. Like this, even for someone like me, it’s a dangerous situation.」

I see, a full power battle, wasn’t it.

That’s extremely dangerous. A wise man stays away from danger.

As for Guy and Chloe, they would be able to continue their act safely while leaving the combat area skillfully.

「Alright, then continue the observation.」

「As you wished.」

《Then, let’s begins the creation of monitoring system that can be used even in『Suspended World』.》

Ah, yes. If it’s possible……

Oh well, if it’s Ciel-sensei, everything was possible.

At that time, situation of various places were once again projected by the surveillance magic, a surprising spectacle was shown.

Dagruel had shown his fangs.

Shion was knocked down by one blow.

Ruminas had recovered, but if things keep going as it is, defeat is clear.

I stood up hurriedly but,

《There’s no problem. Please do not interfere.》

I was calmed down by Ciel’s calm voice.

Certainly.

My friend whom I trusted the most, I remembered to turn to her for assistance.

On a closer look, she seemed to have done something secretly as I didn’t notice.

「But, will it be really all right?」

《It will be all right…… (probably) ――》

My friend whom I trusted the most.

It seems the confidence from Ciel-sensei was also tremendous. ‘Probably’, I felt that this was the first time I heard this word from her.

Even while being uneasy for some reason, I canceled my urge to go to help for a moment.

Until Velda is caught, it will be useless if I didn’t hide myself.

Besides, if it’s not in stopped world, even in the worst case, I could go to help with transfer.

I decided that I would wait here and believe in them.

「In the worst case, Diablo, you will go to help her.」

「Please leave it to me. However, I think that would be unnecessary.」

I hoped so.

While worrying, I gazed at the projected scene.





Chapter 216: Vs Dagruel Part 5


‘This might be impossible――’

That’s the honest impression of the Demon Lord Ruminas Valentine.

Her plan was to kill Dagruel using her strongest technique in the first attack, but it had no effect.

With Death’s Blessing, the life and death reversing technique, Dagruel should have died.

However, the result was that the instant death effect was nullified, and Ruminas’ secret technique was defeated.

At that time, Ruminas was able to partly foresee that thing would proceed this way.

The one on one fight between Albert and Grasword continued.

Both of them didn’t even take a step back, it seemingly an even fight. However, when the fight between the two was observed with Ultimate Skill『Lustful Lord Asmosdeus』, the situation shows a different outlook.

Against Grasword who’s a mass of energy, Albert was distributing energy into every important point of his body.

The decrease of their vitality was insignificant, but the difference in the aggregate amount gave hint of the outcome of the battle.

In other words, before Albert finished to cut down Grasword, the outcome will be decided.

Albert’s defeat, that was the situation would be.

However, no one could criticize Albert. Rather, with his wonderful skill, he was fighting evenly against the sword king.

If the difference of the energy was not taken into consideration and only the sword techniques matters, it can be said that Alberto’s superior.

However, even so, the situation didn’t change.

The way things are going right now, Albert’s defeat was just a matter of time.

On the other side, the battle between Adalman and Fenn also growing intense.

The young man with black hair who wears the jet black colored priest clothes against the skinny, small giant who wielding Gleipnir.

Adalman had possessed and combined with the Death Dragon Wenti, and his energy has increased greatly.

However, even so, the difference was obvious as Fenn who is in front of Adalman can rival a True Dragon.

For Ruminas who can see vitality in numerical form, the differences were despair inducing.

Against Fenn who’s called both the Fighting God and Fist God, for Adalman to be able to survive this far was a miracle.

In the flurry of throwing, punching, and joint locks, it was obvious that physical strike was the main constituent.

Joint locks were meaningless, since for a spiritual life form, physical damage would completely recovered in an instant.

He just barely able to modify the technique to perform a throwing technique to deal and blow away the opponent. However, in the end, that technique was for defending, Adalman couldn’t expect Fenn to be damaged by the throw.

In other words, he just stalling for time.

After Adalman understands his own disadvantage, he was fighting with the objective of exhausting the enemy by a long period of combat and not aiming for victory.

However even so, he was concentrating so hard like he was treading on thin ice.

In Ruminas’ sight, she could see Adalman’s appearance who ward off Fenn’s attack by casting away all of his defense and manipulated his energy to concentrated on a point.

In order to cover the difference of the energy density, Adalman was fighting by concentrating all of his power on one point.

It was already such ability that could be called as a miracle.

However, it won’t continue more longer, Ruminas thought that it wouldn’t take a long time for Adalman to lose.

And then, Shion.

The woman who fighting against Dagruel and standing up many times in front of him.

Her appearance reminded Ruminas of the Hero Chloe who saved her in the past.

Blood flows out from her head without any sign of stopping. Even the wound in her whole body, bore new wounds after recovering.

Shion’s attack couldn’t touch Dagruel, she was mortally injured due to Dagruel’s counterattack.

Even so, Shion stood up, she kept challenging Dagruel over and over.

「Ah, Nee-san! Please stop it already!」

「Shion-sama! You can’t win against our pops――」

「It, it’s dangerous. As it is right now, Shion-sama will……」

Even Dagruel’s sons were flustered at first.

However, would they broke through their hesitation mid-battle and,

「Uooooooooo! Pops!! We will be your opponents!」

「There’s no other way. I’m prepared for it!」

「I’ll do it! And then, I’ll get praised!」

Exactly as stated in their determination, they went to face Dagruel.

And right now, they were barely alive bearing serious injury, lying on the ground while being powerless to stand up.

Those three were strong as majins. That’s why they were alive.

However, that’s all. In front of Dagruel’s absolute strength, it was all useless.

(This is impossible right. There’s no reason that we can win. Even I only able to go this far huh―)

To Ruminas’s ear who reached the stage of resignation partly,

「Princess, the preparation for the retreat was complete ――」

Such whispered voice was heard.

The “Seven Celestial Sages” who command the raid seems to have advanced the preparation for a concealed transfer secretly.

They have judged that there’s no chance for victory in this war and likely to have made their safety a priority.

Certainly――

That’s right, certainly, if she was the Ruminas from before, she would withdrew without any hesitation.

Such thing as going to war with no chance of winning was nonsense.

The country can be rebuild, it wasn’t something she need to be concerned with.

Ruminas and her kin has eternal life, there’s no reason for them to fight betting their life on it.

However ――

(Will I be really fine? Will it be a correct action for me to withdraw from this place?)

Ruminas hesitated.

Shion was barely being able to stand up because Ruminas’ support.

She used an ability increasing skill, so even a near death serious injury would recover immediately......

Improving Shion’s regeneration power to the utmost limit was also one of Ruminas’ ability.

If Ruminas withdrew now, it meant Shion would die immediately.

(Abandoning the front and running away alone by myself? Such a thing, such an ungraceful action, I’ll never accept it!

I’m the proud “Queen of Nightmare”, you know!!)

And so, Ruminas steeled herself.

「I won’t. I won’t retreat. If by any chance I get killed here, go select the next master from the seven lords.

I’m one of the proud Octagram.

Such thing as running away ungracefully is not fitting for me. Don’t you think so?」

She said so and sprouted a beautiful smile.

An alluring smile which didn’t suit the face of a young girl.

The “Seven Celestial Sages” who heard it have their eyes wide opened with surprise instantly.

Their master who attached so much importance to life, surprised them with such boast.

However ――at the same time, they were deeply aware.

That’s right, it didn’t suit Demon Lord Ruminas Valentine who called as the Queen of the Night to be running away.

Because she’s the vampire princess who always acted gracefully and reigned nobly.

「I’ll not obey such order.」

「Yes.」

「At the time of your ruin, we’ll also follow.」

The “Seven Celestial Sages” disobeyed Ruminas’ order for the first time.

Although she was surprised by it, it wasn’t unpleasant feelings which perplexed Ruminas.

Far from it, it was instead pleasant feelings.

「Fuu, you fools. Then, strengthen the barrier quickly! Hurry up, you blockheads!!」

Ruminas cheerfully ordered them.

『As your will! Then, the city defense will――』

「I see. Change the barrier’s attribute using the Holy Demonic Inversion technique.

Don’t allow those angels invading the Holy City! As long as we buys some time, Demon Lord Rimuru will send reinforcement!」

「――Princess, do you believe in Demon Lord Rimuru……?」

「Humph! I don’t believe in him. However――

There are people who believe in their master while fighting. Don’t you think that the act is worth believing in?」

As she said so, the “Seven Celestial Sages” shifted their focus on the battlefield.

How the Demon Lord Rimuru’s subordinates were fighting couldn't be assessed as just stalling for time.

In this situation, even they’re betting their life to buy time, despite it practically having no meaning at all.

It may be reasonable for their own country, but they had devoted their own life in order to defend the territory of an allied country.

Their action was a strong proof of them believing that their master would never abandon them.

「Indeed…… ‘Believing’――Such word, we have forgot about it for a long time.」

「Well then, we will start the strategy.」

「May fortune with you, Princess!」

Bowing all together, the “Seven Celestial Sages” left.

‘Will it be really alright?’ so Ruminas hesitated.

But, she didn’t regret.

In front of her, Shion stood up once more.

No matter how she was wounded, she rises up many times.

‘That’s right, I, I should do the only thing I can do!’ and so, at the moment Ruminas tried to support Shion again――

「Good grief, I have become the opponent because I feel the sign of awakening, but it’s disappointing.

Or…… because there’s a person who defends you, you can be at ease?

If that’s the case, first I’ll deal with your recovery means. That way, you might grow a bit.」

She heard Dagruel’s muttering voice.

It took a moment for her to realize the meaning of it.

「St, stop it!」

Shion shouted in panic, but she received Dagruel’s blow and became silent.

She didn’t seem to be dead, but it was very unlikely for her to move.

Glancing at her, Dagruel turned around and began to walk towards Ruminas.

Ruminas prepared herself.

「Very well, Dagruel. I shall become your next opponent!」

Ruminas put herself on guard towards Dagruel.

The words she said for herself, she felt funny in her mind.

Far from being an opponent, to Dagruel someone like Ruminas was equal to garbage, so she thought.

「Fumu. As expected, Ruminas. The pride of a Demon Lord is not just for show heh.」

To Dagruel’s words, she laughed thinly.

Such thing as pride, she didn’t think about it at all. However, Ruminas just thought that she didn’t want to betray Shion.

(It’s strange. Unlike with Chloe, I haven’t associate with her for a long time.

Fighting against Dagruel even though there’s no chance for me to win.

Why didn’t I run away?

――Did I also believe? That someone would come to help.

Such thing, such convenient thing, would not happen.)

She pondered and understood.

Suddenly, the image of that selfish and carefree black dragon crossed in her mind.

A smile floats naturally on her mouth.

Her appearance make Dagruel felt strange, but he ignored it without saying anything ――

「Well then, HERE I GO!」

At the same time as him shouting, his fist was thrust out towards Ruminas.

Her soul was frozen in fear. However, Ruminas didn’t run away.

Evasion was impossible.

Recognized that, Ruminas mocked herself.

(――it’s so different. Struggling till the end. I’m like a different person……)

But, there was no dissatisfaction, instead, she puffed her chest proudly.

At least at the end she has her pride as a Demon Lord, and she can boast as she challenged a strong person without running away.

At least, in her final moments, with her hand, that hateful arrogant evil dragon――

Ruminas’ mind then stopped for a moment.

It occurred immediately before Dagruel’s fist reached Ruminas.

The time had stopped because of Velzard.

Right now, currently.

Something happened before Dagruel’s fist reach Ruminas.

――The powerful fist in front of her eyes.

And then, a palm of someone with tanned skin received it.

Dagruel’s attack which had an overwhelming power was obstructed by a man who suddenly appeared in front of Ruminas.

Then,

「Kuahahaha! I, have arrived[1]!」

While laughing loudly, the man shouted in loud voice.

However, time was currently stopped, the man’s voice didn’t reach anyone.

With the exception of Dagruel.

No, it reached Ruminas actually.

(Did he come here!!?)

However, Ruminas was conscious but her body can’t move.

In such confusing situation, Veldora’s voice reached Ruminas――

(What’s this, I can’t speak!? Has time stopped......? But who did it?)

She was flustered because she shouted instinctively, but Ruminas noticed that she couldn’t speak.

And so, trying to grasp the situation, finally she realized that currently the world’s movement had stopped.

(What a carefree guy! Even when the world stopped, for him to be able to move like it’s natural――)

It was surprising as Ruminas continuously thought.

At the same time, it became very ridiculous. The tension that strained her before death had loosened, she felt a sense of relief filled her heart for some reason.

(Impossible. For me to feel relieved just because Veldora have came――that can’t be possible!)

She threw away such feelings which crossed in her mind and focus on the current situation.

There was no light, she couldn’t understand anything inside the stopped world.

However, Ruminas’ super perception began to perceive the situation faintly.

Only Veldora and Dagruel who calmly moving.

She listened carefully to the conversation of those two,

「What…. the…!? Even though I have make my entrance coolly with a lot of trouble….. for the world to be stopped?!」

「Oh, it’s Veldora. It was a miraculous timing, but you have my condolences.

Even though I said that, I’m not the one who do it, okay?」

「Unuuu, I know. The one who can do thing like this is probably my aneue[2].

As for the length, enough to stop time for two seconds, that person has the useless habit of stopping time for a long time.」

「Oh well, there’s no meaning to stop time for a long time. If there’s someone else who can move inside the stopped world, stopping time doesn’t have any meaning.」

「That’s right. I have advised her several times, but she doesn’t listen to me. Oh well, it’s fine as I don’t really care anyway. She messed around such as stopping time when it was punishment time…… oh well, forget it.

There’s another thing to discus――」

「Uh, what?」

「Umu. To match the timing when the time moving again, I want to redo my arrival.

So, as I decided to be cool, it’s necessary to make Ruminas impressed you know」

「……can I hear the reason?」

「Kuahahahaha! What, it’s simple y’know. I till now have done various thing

Therefore, Ruminas considerably resents me.

If I make her indebted to me while displaying how cool I’m, she would forget everything, that’s the plan.

Kukukuku. For that reason, I was hiding myself from sight.

I don’t know when you might go berserk so I was a bit worried here.

Yet…..

Even though I had made my entry so cool with a lot of trouble, it was ruined because of my aneue.

That’s the reason. Can I ask you for that?」

‘Haaーーーー’, Ruminas seemed to hear Dagruel’s tired sigh.

And then, Ruminas also felt the same.

(This rotten lizard, I’ll strangle him later!)

Ruminas raged with her face turning red.

If she could move now, she’d gifted him a kick without a doubt.

‘Perhaps, I’d be able to move because of anger?’ Thinking so, she hated Veldora’s attitude.

Veldora didn’t think that Ruminas can hear him in the stopped world, she deemed it to be his carelessness.

“I’ll teach him a lesson without fail later!” Ruminas sworn so in her mind.

At the time when Dagruel about to answer Veldora’s offer, there was a person who tried to stand up with a staggering movement.

It was Shion.

Her eyes were bloodshot, the open wounds on her whole body haven’t recovered.

However, it was strange that no blood flowing out.

While cladding in a strange atmosphere, Shion completely stood up.

‘Hm?’ so Dagruel gazed at her,

「Shion, huh. You were able to move even in the stopped world……?

Hm,『Envy』seems to have disappear. This is, I see――」

Veldora noticed something and stopped talking.

Then as if to interrupted his word,

「――Ve, Veldora-sama….. th, that person… is my prey. Wo, would you hand over him to me?」

Shion asked Veldora while panting, using her sword as a cane to stand.

Veldora looked at her while squinting his eyes,

「I see, very well. I will lend you a bit of my power. Fight well to your heart’s content,!」

He responded so.

「Th, thank you very much――」

Shion seemed ready to fall, so Veldora supported her.

And, from where Veldora touched Shion, his energy flowed.

「Hu! Although I had said that I would lend it to you, there is no fragment of restraint from you eh. (Perhaps, I should collect it later from Rimuru ……)」

Veldora grumbled, looking worn out while Shion’s complexion improved fast.

The wounds on her body healed, even her clothes, before anyone aware, had become as good as new.

Dagruel raised one of his brow tolerating it, standing silently waiting for Shion’s preparation to complete.

Then――

《Individual: Shion undergo ability evolution, Ultimate Skill『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』was acquired.》

Unchanged by even the stopped world, “The Voice of the World” was heard.

It was the moment when Shion had awoken ultimate power.

「I have kept you waiting. However, as you hoped for, I shall give you some amusement.」

「Fumu. Well then, I shall accept your offer.」

The two nod to the other gladly and once again confront each other.

In the stopped world where it was difficult to perceive the opponent’s presence, the fight between Shion and Dagruel begun.

Meanwhile――

(By any chance, is my turn only……)

Veldora was anxious about such thing, there was no one who noticed it.

* * *

[1] Momotaros’ reference. Den-O

[2] Elder sister (formal).





Chapter 217: Vs Dagruel Part 6


Shion's innermost thoughts were swirling in fury.

She was angry at having been toyed with by Dagruel, as though she stood no chance whatsoever.

Her rage, as she watched her Elite Guard fall one after another

Her feelings of powerlessness and dismay, and her yearning towards the strong— she acknowledges all of these emotions, except envy which has swelled up, and restrains her remaining emotions.

This was unlike her past rampaging self, who simply faced her opposition with all her hatred, seeing them only as her enemy, she was now observing with her soul.

Is it good or is it bad. That itself, is not the point.

What really important is whether she can suppress it or not.

These swirling emotions within her, were but a hindrance to Shion.

But, the thorn of envy which was supposed to have disappeared, interferes with her thoughts regardless, as though stabbing at her heart.

Shion has always thought of being the number one most important existence to Demon Lord Rimuru. But, that is simply self conceit. But it was also because she understood this emotion all too well, that it was so difficult to extinguish her envy towards other beings that were stronger than herself or showed greater promise.

But even so――

Shion has put into practice, the act of accepting things for what they are.

As per Rimuru's words, it is the concept of seeing the true nature of everything with your soul.

As a result, though it didn't cause any drastic changes, Shion's true nature underwent a placid change.

She now fully understands her own strength that is not swayed by her emotions, her own true worth.

With the exception of the thorn of envy, all of Shion's remaining thoughts are now clearly unified.

It was a mental change, not a physical one.

Shion's evolution was occurring in a manner not visible to others.

The battle with Dagruel began.

Her soul understood right after that. Just how unfathomable and overpowering Dagruel really was.

When they first met she never did notice, that hidden under his unassuming appearance, lied a furious raging soul.

It can also be said, that seeing her ideal, the ultimate complete form that she pursued, gave Shion the shivers.

If she was to think about it calmly, the fact that the difference in power between herself and Dagruel was decisive, it was all too obvious that this wasn't a matter where she was able to stand against him or not.

But, even so.

The word "retreat" does not exist in Shion's dictionary.

Rimuru's strategy is flawless. That is how it must be.

What that means, is that so long as there are no further orders, she has no reason to fall back. That, was what Shion thought.

Purely believing in Rimuru, following her orders to the letter.

In a sense, one could say she has stopped thinking. But, to Shion, Rimuru's orders are absolute and is the only thing that mattered to her.

(That Person, won't blindly give orders without some form of insurance elsewhere. Then, until further orders are given, all I need is to do what I was ordered to.)

This was why, Shion shows no fear in the face of death, and holds the lines with the resolve of not retreating.

Ruminas' cooperation was mostly unexpected.

The prideful vampire princess, vehemently hated putting herself at risk.

With as much wisdom she had, she more than understood how impossible victory is at this point.

Shion thought, that Ruminas should have already fled from this battlefield, if she already knew that much.

(This is really unexpected. If I was alone, I should have been taken out of the picture long ago.

Demon Lord Ruminas, is my impression of her mistaken...

Hmm, maybe that's also――)

Such idle thoughts surfaced briefly, but Shion quickly shoved that to the back of her head.

Shion doesn't have the elbowroom for such thoughts, she fully understood that.

At any rate, now that she has crossed swords with him, she could tell, that Dagruel still has something up his sleeves.

If he were to really get serious, she would be swallowed up by that power all too easily, that was what it felt like to Shion.

If so, her objective would be to resist as much as she possibly could, so as to properly understand the true essence of that power.

With that firm resolve, Shion has continuously took to the challenge in an almost reckless manner.

Against Dagruel, whose essence was similar to her own.

Shion brandishes her blade, to carve into her own soul the form she pursues, which she sees in Dagruel.

And so, the cycle repeats as Ruminas revives her――

――The World’s Time stopped――

Before Shion's consciousness, lied a world without color.

“Not yet! It's not over yet!!”

She tried to open her mouth with the intention to roar out as such, but Shion's body showed no response.

Her body was stopped where she was, unable to stand up. Rather, she was unable to even open her mouth.

As this happened, the thorn of『Envy』which has been a nuisance to Shion's emotions for the longest time, the root that was lodged in her Core (heart) which caused all her emotional problems, it felt as though it just went and disappeared.

As the same time, "White Frost Dragon" Velzard awakened the Ultimate Skill『Envious Lord Leviathan』, but this was not something Shion knows of, and it wasn't something she would care about either.

The important thing, was that the emotion that was hindering her is gone now, that was all.

(As expected of Rimuru-sama. To have even foresaw this happening!)

This was but Shion jumping to conclusions, but it was the truth to Shion.

Elation and yearning filled Shion's heart, and what felt like an unbelievable amount of power welled out from within.

Pure unbridled violence.

The power to destroy.

Irrelevant to good and evil, the Tyrant's Power.

《Individual: Shion undergo ability evolution, Ultimate Skill『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』was acquired.》

The voice of the world resounded.

Shortly after, Shion's consciousness returned.

She was in the colorless world still, but she has no problems with her cognizance.

In place of sound, an individual's will is transmitted directly. Which meant, that words are not needed.

In this Frozen World, which is governed by its own set of special "rules", Shion started to adapt immediately.

Ultimate Skill『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』, made that possible.

The foundations of her skill evolution were more than sufficient.

(Much appreciated, Rimuru-sama!)

That, was Ciel's handiwork, with her foresight of Shion's evolution.

Even though she has only just obtained Ultimate Skill『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』, it easily became fully optimized, and was "fitted" onto Shion.

For Shion who has constantly been evolving her mental state, controlling this boisterous energy was all too easy.

In fact, it was because this was possible, that she awakened to this ability.

Mind over body.

Thus, with the evolution of her mind, it also triggered Shion's racial awakening.

She is now a Combat Spirit Oni (High Rank Divine Monster Spirit), a being which specializes in physical combat.

A spiritual entity that can infinitely regenerate its physical body. But, has attacks that are capable of destroying the opposition's soul.

Shion has evolved into what can be called the Natural Enemy of Spiritual Lifeforms (Energy Creature)[1].

She makes use of the Energy borrowed from Veldora, to compensate for what she could not make up for herself.

And, once again.... , Shion recreates her own body. Into a body that is optimized and purely made for combat.

She notices at this moment, that she has been unconsciously borrowing power from Veldora.

Her consciousness which felt like it was mostly instinctual and roaming within a fog, now felt refreshed as though under a clear blue sky.

Shion has now fully awakened.

Shion takes her stance, with her beloved katana "True: Hercules’ Edge[2]".

「I have kept you waiting. However, as you hoped for, I shall give you some amusement.」

She speaks to Dagruel, in a polite manner.

In this Frozen World, Dagruel and Shion's true battle begins.

A flash of blades crossing.

That was but a metaphor, as such phenomena do not happen in this world without light.

But, this was the only appropriate way to describe what was happening, as Shion's swings assault Dagruel.

Hardening his body beyond the hardness of diamonds, Dagruel receives the attack with his two arms.

But, due to taking the impact from the katana swung from an overhead stance, both of Dagruel's knees sunk into the ground.

Dagruel opened his eyes wide.

In this Stopped World, the air won’t get vibrated.

As there is no medium now, energy transmissions do not happen.

It is now a situation where one would need to push their way through the molecules with their own bodies.

Which also meant, it is also impossible to gain momentum from kicking off the ground. Impacts generated by the force directly dig into the earth, which results in what just happened to Dagruel at this moment.

The laws of physics do not apply in this Frozen World.

As for the laws of magic, it is impossible to activate almost every known type.

It's obvious, that combat in such special circumstances will differ from the norm.

Dagruel clicks his tongue, releasing excessive amounts of his power, and pushed back Shion's katana. Inversely, this time it was Shion whose legs were caught in the ground.

The two continued exchanges between blade and fist, and slowly both sides naturally grasped the nature of how combat flows.

Dagruel followed his instincts, while Shion learnt from the situations that happened.

The battle intensified.

It wasn't just the appearance that looked intense, the invisible battle between abilities was taken into account too.

Dagruel, had no Ultimate Skill of his own.

His existence alone can be called "Ultimate", as a being who is almost equal to the True Dragons.

His fists alone could cause destruction on levels that warp the laws of physics, the special vibrations caused would interfere with the earth and the atmosphere, resulting in storms of destruction.

But, even such special powers, held no meaning in this Frozen World.

「Shion, I have no clue how long that sister of mine is going to stop time.

What's definite, is that your chance at victory is only possible within this Frozen World, that alone.

When time flows, Dagruel's powers will come into effect. Keep that in mind.」

Veldora's words, were delivered telepathically to Shion.

「My gratitude for the advice. Veldora-sama.」

Shion gave her thanks, but in truth she did not understand the real meaning of those words.

But, on a instinctual level she recognized the danger.

As of now, the destructive vibrations in Dagruel's fists, only affect the area that it hits. That was the reason how Shion is battling on equal footing with Dagruel, as she is responding on that assumption.

But, it was very likely what Veldora's words meant, was that Dagruel's attacks are able to connect in a wider area when time is not stopped, that much can be assumed.

This wasn't anything conclusive unless she took a hit for confirmation, but the danger wasn't hard to imagine.

That's not something anybody would want to test out.

With the intent of a short decisive battle, Shion increased her swinging speed one more level.

Dagruel with his hardened body, repels Shion's katana with his bare hands.

「Hou, having exchanged this many blows with me, not even a chip on that blade.」

Conversely, Dagruel commended Shion's katana which was unblemished.

His praise was not empty, and Shion also felt that he meant what he said.

「Naturally. This beloved katana of mine, was given to me from Rimuru-sama.

I pour my heart and soul into it every day, you can call it another part of my body at this point.」

Just as Shion said, she polishes her katana daily, and it has become accustomed to her aura.

Calling it a part of her body is no exaggeration, as "True: Hercules’ Edge" also evolved into the God class together with Shion's evolution.

It was because of this that it is immune to Dagruel's Weapon Destruction ability, but this should be called good luck for Shion.

And, what was really lucky, would be the similitude of their abilities.

Shion's ability, which could be called the natural enemy of spiritual entities, Minus Break.

Activating the effects through her normal attacks with her katana, she plunders the target's Energy. The effect activates even if the attack is blocked.

In addition, along with the fact that she is capable of converting the energy borrowed from Veldora into her own, she is able to make use of any energy that is plundered.

Though she has an upper limit to her own Energy, she can just use her opponent's Energy to cover for her own losses.

It can be said this ability further exemplified Shion's immortal status.

And finally, as per the name of the Tyrant, being able to control any kind of riotous Energy, is what should be said to be the true worth of Shion's ability.

For Shion to be able to even properly exist before a being such as Dagruel who is a mass of Energy, is precisely thanks to the abilities of the awakened『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』.

In comparison, Dagruel's very existence is a supernatural phenomena.

Hardened Defense・Weapon Destruction・Existence Destruction・Magic Immunity・Neutralize Attribute・Ignore Defense――

These, are but some of the abilities he wield as an Ultimate Living Being.

Under normal circumstances, engaging in melee combat with Dagruel is utterly suicidal.

Transcending physical and magical elements, an existance likened to a God of Destruction. That, was Dagruel.

But, the ability『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』that Shion awakened to, gave Shion the means to stand against Dagruel.

Which meant, the ability is capable of something similar(to Dagruel).

The ability of Unique Skill『Cook』, to "bring a desired result of the user" has evolved――into complete manipulation over the law of causality

This isn't something on the level of Majin Laplace's『Future Vision』, it is an Absolute ability.

It is not prediction, but purposefully causing a result that is intended.

Before Shion evolved, her being able to move when time was stopped, was due to the effects of her Unique Skill『Cook』.

Being able to control the law of causality, meant becoming unrivaled, in a world where time is stopped.

All cause and effect, so long as they are in a world where time does not flow, Shion's will is given the highest priority in such a world.

「――how unbelievable.... For her abilities to be above mine――」

In terms of Max Energy, Dagruel had many more times the amount Shoin had, but Shion was able to stand toe to toe against him because of that fact.

However, even with Shion's new abilities, it is impossible for her to overpower Dagruel.

That, was proof of the similitude between Shion and Dagruel.

If you were to compare their abilities, Shion is superior. But, the two of them are on par with each other if you take the overall power into account.

After a number more exchanges, Dagruel noticed this.

His face turned bitter, as he glared at Shion.

Dagruel has noticed, that his abilities were being nullified. That, was caused by an ability that was similar to Dagruel's true nature.

Which was why they rejected each other, and both sides were nullified.

In this『Suspended World』where all forms of disaster causing supernatural powers are sealed, Shion and Dagruel lacked the power to deal a decisive blow to either side and were locked in an unending brawl.

Attacks which were supposed to ignore defense and cause damage, were being completely evaded so fatal damage is avoided.

Both sides nullified the opposition's attacks, and simply consumed their Energy.

If this went on, in this Frozen World, it looked like a scene which would make one think of a never-ending battle.

But that balance, would be broken in a single moment.

That's right, time started moving once more.

At that exact moment, Dagruel became certain of his victory.

His superpowers which were sealed are now released. What that implied, was that he is now able to unleash those superpowers which gave him the nickname "Earthquake".

Dagruel, releases a massive all range attack onto Shion.

They were equal in the Stopped World due to her abilities, but things are different now that the laws of physics are back in motion.

The number of rules to control exponentially increased, which created many more results from cause and effect.

Complete predictions, and phenomena control has become more difficult to accomplish. That was already a feat, when the opponent was on equal footing.

As per Veldora's warning, Shion's only chance at victory was while the Stopped World was in effect.

The ground quaked, with tremors that made standing up nigh impossible. At the same time, the atmosphere roared as it twisted, and lightning crackled.

All of that, culminated into the attack onto Shion, assaulting her all at once.

With the effect of the absolute ability of Ignore Defense attached, all for the express purpose of taking Shion's life――

Even with Ultimate Skill『Tyrannous Lord Susanoo』, nullifying all of that was impossible.

(The overwhelming difference in Energy, is the biggest wall between you(Shion) and me!)

Dagruel's inner exclamation, did not reach Shion.

All of the attacks had the intent to take the target's life.

And so, Dagruel who had total confidence in his victory――

「Chaotic Fate!![3]」

Opened his eyes in disbelief.

Shion, has moved in for the counterattack.

Shion understood that she was unable to totally defend against the attack, so she discarded defense, and put in everything she had into offence.

(The fool! Do you intend to perish!?)

Toward the blade which was swinging upwards in his direction, Dagruel extended his left hand out to nullify it ―― only to show confusion when that very blade disappeared.

Right after, the burning sensation of pain ―― pain, which he has not felt in a few millennia ―― reached his brain.

Shion's finishing attack slipped through Dagruel's cognizance, and reached his body.

However――

Shion's body too, took the full brunt of the multitude of attacks that were born from Dagruel's superpowers.

Even if Shion's body had gone through evolution, this attack was fatal ―― or, should have been.

「Re:Birth (Resurrection)!!」

A chilling voice, reverberated across the battlefield.

Shion who was doomed to perish, was brought back from the abyss of death, by Demon Lord Ruminas' Ultimate Skill『Lustful Lord Asmodeus』.

If time is flowing, that means support from Ruminas can be counted on too. With that reasoning, it was Shion's strategic victory.

Shion placed her bet on Ruminas reviving her and not retreating.

「Fufufu, thank you very much, Demon Lord Ruminas.」

「You blockhead.... You totally anticipated me giving a helping hand didn't you?」

「Of course, I believed in you. Demon Lord Ruminas.」

「Just call me Ruminas. I too, shall address you as Shion from today onwards. Any complaints?」

「No.... Not at all, Ruminas. I too, shall think of you as a friend from today onwards.」

「Fuhn! Do as you like![4]」

Ruminas' face was flushed scarlet, even though she said that. The same can be said for Shion――

When their two faces met, both averted away as though embarrassed.

The battlefield's tension in their vicinity loosened.

The fighting was still ongoing at the other locations, but with the fall of the head of one side, it affected the morale of both sides in no time at all.

Anxiety could be seen in the Giant Army, which resulted in the defense forces gaining the upper hand.

The one on one battles between Grasword and Albert, Fenn and Adalman restarted, but the giant side lost much of their earlier momentum.

The defeat of their elder brother, has probably affected the both of them too.

And amongst all of that,

「Kuaーーーhahhahhah!」

A certain someone not reading the mood laughed.

It was Veldora.

「Well done! You did splendidly, Shion. Well done indeed. You went above and beyond what I have predicted!」

Veldora laughed pleasantly.

Ruminas glared at the laughing Veldora,

「What, you were around? You stupid Lizard (Evil Dragon)[5]!

And spat her piece.

Veldora was spooked for a moment, he then puffed up his chest as he pulled himself together.

「Of course I am, I was worried for the whole lot of you, so I was watching over everyone!」

He said that as though he wanted to be thanked for it, but there was no change in Ruminas' icy cold attitude to him.

But, it was the truth that he did help out albeit in the shadows.

Fact was, while the『Suspended World』was in effect, the being(s) that were responsible for suppressing Grasword and Fenn ―― his clone that was in charge of Fenn sent out distress calls multiple times, but they were ignored. At that time, much of his Energy was being "borrowed" by Shion, so he didn't have much to spare ―― were none other than Veldora's Parallel Existences.

Despite that, it's not like he can proudly say that now considering the current mood, so Veldora was at a loss for words.

He broke out in cold sweat, before Ruminas' devilish heterochromia gold and silver eyes, words were unable to exit from his mouth.

(Gu, gunuuu.... Why, am I being treated like a villian――)

You couldn't really blame him for getting slightly teary eyed.

「So, what have you come here for? Everything is more or less wrapped up.」

To Ruminas' cold words, Veldora felt like running away.

But, the one who saves Veldora from his predicament, was Dagruel who should have been defeated by Shion.

「Fu,fuhahahahahaha! It has been quite the few millennia, since my knees have made contact with the ground.

More so, the feat of getting blood to flow from me, there have been none except Veldanava himself.

Shion, you, have every right to be proud!」

Dagruel got back up, as he said that.

The blood flowing down from his head, showed no sign of stopping due to the effects of Shion's ability.

Despite that, Dagruel's Aura only increased in vigor.

「Humph. Still standing huh, as expected of Dagruel.

Shion, take a breather where you are.

As I thought, I'm the only one who would be able to be his opponent.」

Veldora advanced, towards where Dagruel was.

And――

「You should revert to your original form. Let us conclude this battle, with everything we got!」

He grandly exclaims.

Dagruel nods,

「Fufufu. Dragon and Titan, let me show you which is greater.

Don't you hold back now, Veldora!

Grasword, Fenn, come to me.

Now is the time, for us to show our real power!!」

He bellows, in response to Veldora.

His body releases an overpowering Aura. In addition to a strange atmosphere.

Utterly oppressed by the pressure, Shion and co. were unable to say anything at all.

Veldora glanced to Shion and co.

「Shion, when the battle begins, you should put everything you have into defense.

Adalman and Albert too, everyone need to pour everything to maintaining the barrier.

Better not lose focus, or all of you will get dragged in and get blown――」

Veldora spoke as though as stating fact, like everything was already decided.

But, to his serious tone, Shion and co, not even Ruminas refuted him.

Veldora continued speaking.

「Dagura, Ryura and Debura ―― Pay attention to what you three are about to witness.

I, am going to kill your father. Watch the battle, and burn everything that happens into your eyes.

What’s about to happen, is a battle of Myths. All of you are witnesses to this battle――」

Veldora subtlety finished speaking.

「「「――h!?」」」

The 3 brothers were dumbfounded unlike their usual selves.

However, they seemed to have understood that something extraordinary is about to happen.

「「「Understood, Veldora-sama!」」」

They nodded in unison, to show their acknowledgment.

With a satisfied look, Veldora turned to face Dagruel.

Over on that side, Dagruel and his brothers have finished their preparations too.

「Seal Open, Trinity (Three in One Body)!!」

With Dagruel's roar, the ancient seal was broken.

The brothers Dagruel, Grasword and Phen, were enveloped in a dazzling light.

This is, the second coming of the Destruction God from the Age of Myths.

Clad in unimaginable amounts of Energy, Ashura[6] of the Titan manifested.

Shion and co. understood immediately in one glance, that Titan is not something any of them can match.

All except the most powerful of beings, a True Dragon, who was before them.

「Kuahahahaha! Is that form are your true visage? Dagruel!

Very well! I shall take you on with everything I have!!」

Veldora transformed into his Dragon Mode.

And so, the battle of Myths, between two supernatural beings begins.

Meanwhile.

(Oh I’m so glad! Here I was worried that I wouldn't get my turn――)

No one would ever guess that this was what Veldora was really thinking of at that moment.

* * *

[1] 精神生命体(エネルギークリーチャー)The author give us how to read the Kanji, the kanji is Seishin Seimeitai, the furigana is Enerugii Kuriichaa. Should I stick with Spiritual Lifeform etc or go with Energy Creature from now?

P.S. I would also changed it from the beginning.

[2] It has kanji of 真 (shin=True) in front of the name.

[3] This also have addition of 真 in the kanji of the attack so 真天地活殺崩誕= True: Apocalypse and Genesis of life and death of universe.

[4] Tsundere vampire…… XD

[5] Oira wa Tokage ja neyo! XD do you guys get it ^_^)/

[6]三面六臂 Sanmenroppi means 3 heads 6 arms, Ashura/Asura.





Chapter 218: Vs Dagruel Part 7


Dagruel, the destruction incarnate and Veldora, the king of the storm.

The similarity of their power was: “lightning”.

Dagruel with his own transcendence ability could freely manipulate the electric tension between the ground and the atmosphere.

Therefore, he could use various attacks with lightning which was the strongest offensive power that the mother nature had. However, Veldora was the same.

Veldora could circulate his own energy and naturally generate lightning.

So, both of them have high lightning resistance. Hence, using lighting strike against each other was insignificant.

Although it wasn’t effective, both of them converted their fighting aura into lightning and fired it against each other.

The result, energy with different natures colliding with each other became a pillar of lighting which flooded the surrounding area.

Dagruel freely manipulated the vibration wave.

If the earth was vibrated, earthquake occurred, if the atmosphere was vibrated, electrical discharge was generated. It was easy to create a vacuum wave when he manipulated the airflow intentionally.

However, it didn’t affect Veldora.

That was a justified matter. After all, Veldora is the incarnation of storm.

Dagruel was well informed about that, there was no need for him to be flustered.

Because both of them were longtime opponents, each of them knew well each other’s character.

However, as his limitation was released and became Trinity, this is the first time Dagruel fought with his original form which was the ‘Battle Form’.

Dagruel was aware that his blood was boiling with excitement.

Now was the time where he’d have a showdown with Veldora who was his longtime fated opponent.

Therefore――

「Fuhahahahaha! As I expected from you, Veldora.

But, I released my true power, I’d be different from before!」

So Dagruel shouted.

Becoming an Ashura, his blind spot has disappeared.

Just like before, magic didn’t affect him.

And――with『Hardening Power』, his body easily surpassed the hardness of diamond, any kind of attacks would be repelled.

For example, even if Dagruel was attacked by a master with the same level as Grasword with a god class weapon, it probably wouldn’t affect him.

To that extent, as the current Dagruel specialized in defensive power.

Invincibility. That was Dagruel’s current state.

「Kuahahahaha! Laughable!」

Veldora laughed down Dagruel’s shout.

And then, he threw Thunderstorm (Lightning Storm Roar) as it was.

The compressed mass of atmosphere draws near Dagruel while releasing electrical discharge.

However, that super-density attack was grabbed by Dagruel with one hand and disappeared.

「It’s useless, Veldora. Didn’t I say that such superficial techniques like this would not affect me.」

Veldora didn’t heed him.

Faster than his main body which shot the Thunderstorm, Veldora’s clone went behind Dagruel’s back.

「The real thing is this! Taste this, Dragon Claw!」

Veldora’s fist, which was thrown at super high speed, was small, unlike the dragon’s large body.

However, the ominous claws that grew on his six fingers possessed『Sundering Power』which could tear apart any kind of material in this world.

Dagurel’s『Hardening Power』and Veldora’s『Sundering Power』collided, resulting in sounds as if the world was creaking.

‘Crash’ ――and so, both have their arm disappeared.

One of Dagruel’s arms which defended against Veldora’s claws disappeared, Veldora’s left hand which accomplished the feat has also disappeared.

It was a draw.

Dagruel still have 5 arms which still intact. Also, the lost arm regenerate in a moment.

The one he was fighting against, Veldora also can produce clones as many as he liked with『Parallel Existence』.

「Tch! As ever, what an absurd strong fellow he’s――」

「The absurd one is you, Veldora. For the current me to be wounded……」

Veldora felt irritated as Dagruel was able to defend from his special attack, likewise Dagruel also felt annoyed as his invincible body was damaged.

Still, both of them were warming up.

Likely enjoying the fight, both of their attacks became more severe.

A half-hearted attack would not affect both of them.

They both knew about this well, but on the other hand they couldn’t bring out a big technique so suddenly.

Since it was not possible to expect the opponent to be careless, it was necessary to made the chance somehow.

“Destruction Deva” and “Storm Dragon”, both were equal.

Like “Kuzushi[1]” in Judo, first of all, securing one's own superiority was important.

It would be sheer stupidity to bring out everything in the beginning of fight.

However ――

Veldora completely disregarded such theory, he began attacking Dagruel at once.

「Kuahahahaha! I’ll keep going! Wing Blade!」

Several of Veldora’s clones approached Dagruel in a super high speed flight.

The wings generated vibration and turned it into a high frequency blade. The vibrations of the 2 pairs of big and small wings created a death end barrier which could tear molecular bond.

Veldora’s large build was covered with death end barrier and became a huge destruction sphere.

Such fiendish destruction sphere was a thing that can only be created by several clones of Veldora.

Everyone attacked Dagruel at the same time.

「Guuh!」

However, Dagruel didn’t panic.

Grasword’s face turned to the front, preparing great swords on both of his hands.

And then, he moved to intercept it while at the same time several of Veldora clones approaching.

The speed of the great sword’s edge which length exceeded 10m easily surpassed the speed of sound.

By each one of Dagruel’s sword flash, the destruction sphere that Veldora’s clones had created was negated.

In other words, that means the clones were destroyed.

Dagrueal didn’t slacken his attacks.

He continued,

「Exploding Chains of the Sealed Destroyer Prison!」

With Fenn’s face facing the front, he tried to capture Veldora using Gleipnir in his hand.

With his『Eyes of Truth』, he discovered the one which have the greatest amount of energy from among the countless clones without any difficulty.

No matter how many Veldora created his clones, it would be useless in front of his『Eyes of Truth』―― or should it have be……

「Unfortunately! That just my clone~!!」

Veldora shouted like making fool of him.

In fact, any individual that get caught by Gleipnir would immediately annihilated and disappear.

Since it was so quick and overdone.

「Ohh…… you, to be able to deceive my eyes…… What kind of trick did you use?」

「Fufufu. Oh Dagruel, even when you unleash your true power, you can’t defeat me.

As there’s no chance for you to win!

Besides, even I have grown stronger. I’d be bothered if you think I’m still the same as the old me!」

Veldora dodged Dagruel’s question.

Properly speaking,『Eyes of Truth』 can’t be deceived.

However, with his『Existence Probability Fluctuation』, it was possible for Veldora to shift himself with his clones momentary.

It was possible by manipulating Parallel Existence and Probability Manipulation at the same time, one of his secret technique.

In addition of those two, it also utilized Space Manipulation or so Rimuru (Ciel) had explained it to him about the ability, but Veldora ignored it.

Even if he didn’t completely understand the fine details, there was no problem because he mastered how to use it instinctively, so Veldora thought.

For such reason, it was true that he can’t give an explanation about it.

On the contrary, in case he understood it, he would be boastfully explaining about it, it could be said that it was good that Veldora didn’t really comprehend it.

Adding another thing for Veldora’s credit, it was not because his comprehensive ability that was lacking, it just that the theory behind it was too difficult.

Even if he was able to understand and mastered it instinctively, it was not possible for him to explain it to other person with words.

Because Dagruel wasn’t expecting Veldora to gave him the answer, he continued his words not caring about it.

「What no chance to win you said? What a nonsense you talked about…… But it seems to be true that you’re different from the old time.

If I can’t see where your main body are, then I shall erase all of your clones at the same time!」

While talking, he created a convenient situation for himself.

It also one of fighting techniques.

Even a strong person of Dagruel’s caliber, wouldn’t ignore such petty tricks

Instead, he thought that obtaining a bit of superiority even by using such petty technique was a big matter.

He calmly activated Space Grasp and the range of his interference wave expanded.

After he confirmed that it wasn’t Veldora’s clone and he wasn’t hiding using『Eyes of Truth』, he cut out the dimension, creating an isolated space.

In this space, there were only Dagruel and Veldora.

Also, all of Veldora’s clones, in order to eliminated them together at the same time.

「Muu!?」

「I got you, Veldora. Eat this! Quasar Break[2]!!」

A great earthquake shook this cut out space.

The inside of the space was filled with super dimensional vibration with Dagruel as its epicenter.

Irreversible, interfering destructive waves were generated and emitting invisible lights. Dagruel consumed 60% of his energy to bring forth absorption light rays.

Dagruel converted his own body into a pseudo-black hole, absorbing and destroying all matters inside the space.

At that time, because of the generated friction which exceeding the isolation space, dazzling light begun to overflow.

No matter what kind of life form, if they receive the interference of this overwhelmingly high energy concentration, it might be impossible for them to preserve their own existence.

Not just disintegrated, they would be swallowed into the black hole and disappear.

However, the majority of the absorbed energy was used by Dagruel to maintained his own existence. It didn’t meant that Dagruel can absorb everything, so as a special attack, it can’t be used continuously.

Dagruel had the conviction on his special attack, and checked the result.

The completely isolated space that Dagruel created closed together when he absorbed the radiated light rays.

However, it seemed that some distortion remained in the dimension, even affecting the real world.

It could be said as a scar of transcendental destruction―― although it would assimilate with the surroundings and returned to normal once time flows.

There should be no one who able to survive that attack……

「Uhhhhhhhh….. tha, that just now is very dangerous you know――」

Dagruel was astonished with his eyes wide opened.

「Im, impossible! You able to survive that!?」

Dagruel shouted due to the rest of the shock.

It was his strongest attack that should eliminate anyone completely.

For Dagruel to be surprised was normal.

In the isolated space, there was no escape. Yet, for Veldora to survive after receiving the direct hit should be impossible.

But, it’s a fact that Veldora survived.

「……Ku, Kuha, Kuahahahaha!

So, something like this isn’t a big deal for me!」

When you observe him carefully, Veldora was not unharmed.

His wings were tattered, and his whole body was injured all over. He just pretended to be okay.

In fact, he was not completely evading the attack just now.

Making good use of Ultimate Skill『Chaotic Lord Nyarlathotep』, Veldora thinned his existence probability to the utmost limit, and was barely able to evade the interference wave of the destructive energy. However, several of the clones failed in evasion, they were all annihilated.

It’s a terrifying technique, and if Veldora was even a bit late, Veldora would be definitely destroyed.

Veldora integrated all of his remaining clones and checked the current situation.

His remaining energy currently was at 50%, he included the amount that was lost to Shion.

(I consumed a lot. However, it’s all according to the calculation!)

Dgaruel and Veldora were almost even.

Veldora had about 30% of his energy taken by Shion before the fight began.

Therefore, to overturn the disadvantageous situation, it was necessary to make Dagruel wasted his.

The current situation of the amount of their remaining energy are, Veldora at 50% against Dagruel with 40%. A reversal.

However, it was good because he succeeded in the gamble, the probability of his survival was very small against the attack.

Veldora gambled that he could evade it with Ultimate Skill『Chaotic Lord Nyarlathotep』.

Veldrora had won the gamble.

…… In the first place, even if he lose the gamble, he act with the prediction that there was no doubt that he could be regenerated by Rimuru.

(If I know that it’s possible for me to regenerate, I’m not going to be scared of any dangerous battle! Kuahahaha!)

Veldora laughed loudly with his true feelings that can’t be let out.

This was exactly the reason why Veldora said Dagruel had no chance to win against him.

「You, do you know? If you make one mistake, you could be annihilated and won’t be able to regenerated!?

Why you don’t focus on defense? Without doing any risky gamble, if you focused yourself on defense with all of your power, you could avoided getting annihilated……

Even I didn’t think that I can deliver the final blow on you who become unable to fight.

Why you need to wager your life for Ruminas and humans!?」

「Humph! That aside, Dagruel.

Why do you need to obey Velda’s order? That person is not my older brother!!」

「――That maybe so.

But, his aura, was without doubt, Veldanava-sama’s.

That’s enough. I lived to serve that Person.」

「Laughable! For you to work hard for an impostor, you’re not worthy of the reputation of Destruction God!」

「Shut up, Veldora! I won’t forgive you if you mocked that Person ,even if you’re His younger brother.」

Dagruel boosted his fighting aura.

Then, he turned small from his about 15m large body in a flash.

Dagruel became around 3m in size. However, lightning flashed from his body, super compressed energy could be felt.

「Mu!?」

「Fuhahahaha. It was you who taught me, Veldora.

When you control your anger, further power can be gained――or so」

Veldora recalled those words.

Come to think of it, he had talked with Dagruel about the knowledge of the holy book (manga).

Just from that bit of information, Dagruel had splendidly sublimated it to actual combat level.

Compressing himself, the density of Dagruel’s energy seemed to be tremendous.

Size is power, but he would be at disadvantage with the way things are going. Veldora realized so.

「Good grief, for you to learn to control that far.

As expected from Dagruel. However, I will not be defeated!」

Veldora also compressed his energy and transformed into human form, as a respond to Dagruel.

The unordinary melee fight begun.

Dagruel’s fist sunk into Veldoro’s abdomen.

At the same time, Veldora’s elbow hit Dagruel’s face.

Their fight lasts several hours, neither of them yielding to the other.

A kick for a kick, a fist for a fist.

Each other’s attacks will be countered with the same attack.

Instead of fighting firmly on the ground, the places of their battle were changing one after another.

From the sky to the ground.

And blowing off the surroundings, to the desert.

And again to the sky high.

Sometimes outside the atmosphere.

For both of them who are masses of energy, the battlefield was same whether they go.

With their own body as the launch pad, they driven super compressed energy to the opponent.

And then, splendidly discharging the received energy out of their body, they prevented fatal injury.

It was important to suppress one’s own energy loss while making the opponent waste theirs.

Each of their attacks intersected, properly speaking with the power of their blow, even high class Majin would be blown into oblivion.

Although they were causing large damage on the surroundings, both of them already stopped caring.

A fierce battle that seemed to last forever.

However ――

Veldora continued to wait for the opportunity.

With his training with Zegion and Ultima, and guidance of the strong people in the Labyrinth.

In addition, his combat experience with Veldrind and Rimuru had made Veldora grew stronger by one level.

Close quarters combat was the best combat technique for Veldora.

「I thought that I was a master, but it seem I still have a long way to go……」

「I’ll say it once again, Dagruel. Stop obeying that impostor.」

「You’re so stubborn, Veldora. My loyalty won’t change even if He died!」

「Is that so…… I’m so disappointed, Dagruel. I shall end you with my strongest secret technique!」

Dagruel tensed to Veldora’s words.

However, it was already too late. Veldora had already completed his preparation.

Veldora activated his ability.

That moment, the surroundings are covered with prismatic darkness[3].

Engulfing a vast area that even covered the region of the death desert of Holy Kingdom Ruberios’ territory.

「Fertile Paradox!!」[4]

Veldora muttered in small voice.

Inside the prismatic darkness, a cruel miracle manifested.

* * *

[1] a Japanese term for unbalancing an opponent in the Japanese martial arts. Making the opponent vulnerable to your counterattack, basically action to make you have the superiority, well I don’t really knowledgeable about judo and so, I can’t really explain it.

[2] The kanji, 時空振滅激神覇 literally means Supreme God/Deity’s Extreme Space-Time Destruction Waves or so.

[3] It’s actually Rainbow colored darkness….. umm I can’t imagine it, comment and I will change it.

[4] 豊穣なる神秘の波動 Mysterious Waves which Brings Good Harvest.





Chapter 219: Vs Dagruel Part 8 -Conclusion-


The fight between Veldora and Dagruel brought tremendous destruction to their surroundings.

There’s a person who thought of this as something unpleasant.

That person is Ruminas.

(Damn! That lizard! He’s really, really urgh!! Why he does take things this far――）

She was raging so much, that her body was shaking and trembling little by little.

While having a hard time of restraining it, Ruminas pondered.

The ground was flooded with pillars of lightning, anyone unfortunate enough to be hit by it would immediately carbonize.

Anyone can see clearly that it just a matter of time before damage befalls the inner city area.

The threefold barrier that protected the Holy City has already unable to perform its task.

The large-scale magic essence warding barrier in the border had vanished due to the shock wave created when Dagruel and Veldora clashed.

It was unable to endure it even for a moment and was blown away, but it had valiantly tried to resist.

The anti-monster attack defense barrier which protected the daily lives around the holy capital was in the similar condition.

After all, as the barrier was set with the purpose of preventing monster attack of a certain level and below, it’d rather harsh to expect it to be able to withstand the attacks of “True Dragon” or “Titan” that can be called super life form.

This also was blown away so quickly.

The only one left was just the Evil Purification barrier.

The people who maintain the barrier raised their angry complaints while crying tears of blood.

If one of them lost their focus, it was certain that the barrier would collapse immediately.

That is without exception the “Seven Celestial Sages” who commanded the barrier maintenance.

In adherence to Ruminas’ order, they risked their lives, doing their best to maintain the barrier.

Luckily they changed the barrier to anti-holy attribute using Holy Demonic Inversion, in order to prevent the angel’s invasion.

Veldora aside, Dagruel’s attribute is『Holy』.

Therefore, they managed to succeed in maintaining the barrier.

In the first place, the barrier purpose was to be anti-Veldora, but it had become useless…..

Ruminas let out a sigh sharply as she was watching the battle unfolding in the sky.

A battle of transcendent ability that exceeded even Ruminas’ imagination.

Of course, even if Ruminas attempted to participate in the battle, it would be suicidal.

Even if she wants to complain, there’s no way to voice it.

Therefore, unable to do anything but watching was her current situation.

And so, the battle grew more intense……

Next to Ruminas is Shion who was enthralled by the battle with intense concentration.

That’s natural so Ruminas thought. After all, such battle of myths like this was something that won’t happen even once in 1000 years.

The battle between strong people, it’s an experience where other people could only do nothing but to see it.

Not to mention, such a battle between transcendents, no one has ever seen.

One more thing, the lump of plasma of Thunderstorm that was repelled by Dagruel, came flying and created a crater as it directly hit the inner city area.

(That damn lizard! Did he intend to destroy my country once more!? He really needs to pay attention to his surroundings!!)

Ruminas thinking about such unreasonable thing.

Although she fully aware that it’s an impossible thing, she couldn’t help but to think so.

And so, in the battle between Veldora and Dagruel, they changed into close combat fight by changing to their human form.

No one able to take their eyes off.

The super-class fight will soon approach its end.

At the same time, Veldora mutters something in a small voice, prismatic darkness was created.

(What is this!?)

It spread at a terrific speed and wrapped up the surroundings――

When Ruminas sensed the danger it’s already too late.

Her panic increased, Ruminas’ defensive barrier has no meaning.

Resistance is meaningless, Ruminas’ thought was swallowed by the prismatic darkness.

One of the seven great nobles that served Ruminas, Archduke Gunther Strauss who is the head, confronted a considerable threat.

He was fighting against one of the Executioners.

Furuki Mai who using the Crescent Bow.

Mai’s outward appearance was of a 16 years old high school student, but her fighting power was beyond description.

Gunther is a True Ancestor Vampire who lived since the ancient times who is called archduke.

He’s a strong person who surpassed a simple Demon Lord.

His ability is equaled to Karion who is a former Demon Lord.

And yet, in front of Mai, all he can do is defend.

The seven great nobles and the subordinates under them were assigned with the role to assault Dagruel’s army from the flank as a mobile army.

However, that strategy was prevented by Mai alone.

Because people other than Gunther had been annihilated by Mai’s Stardust Rain.

The vampire’s super regeneration can’t catch up due to the terrifying meteor arrows.

The only one who barely alive was the other great nobles who was always quarreling with him.

While managing to somehow cooperate, they defended against Mai’s attacks but……

That’s a story from a little while ago.

People who receive the direct hit from the arrow become unable to regenerate, they lost the ability to continue fighting.

Currently, the only one who able to move in this place was only Gunther.

「Ah, you’re so tenacious. It would be better if you fall down quickly, you know?」

「Shut up, you lowly human! I will dig my fangs on your neck, and suck your blood dry!!」

Gunther sustained a decrease in vital activity, which stimulated his survival instinct.

Originally, he has no need to suck blood.

In the old times, vampire act to absorbs mana (vitality) through blood, but after evolved, he able to absorbs mana directly from the prana (spirit)

However, right now, his eye color changed, as he perceived Mai as his prey.

Like a cornered beast, Gunther released all restrictions on his body.

To his pride as an Archduke.

He thought that he must not be defeated by a mere lass, Gunther released the taboo.

Commanding his old blood, Gunther returns to his original appearance.

Magic power runs through his whole body, transforming his body, to regain his form as the Emperor of the Night.

To his past form as a Demon Lord before being a subordinate to Demon Lord Ruminas.

However, even so ――

「So you said? That it would be better if I fall down quickly, and so」

It didn’t reach Mai.

Mai acquired Ultimate Skill『Master Weapon』after obtaining the power of Seraphim, and so she possesses combat power of an Awakened Demon Lord (Million Class)[1].

Even among the Executioners, particularly―― Sword, Shield, and Bow, those three people were the highest among all Yuuki’s subordinates.

Arios who mastered the Bastard Sword.

Zero who is an impregnable wall with his Star Shield.

And, Mai who mastered the Crescent Bow.

Those three people were an exception.

Arios was once defeated by Damrada.

That bitter experience seems to have promoted his growth.

He threw away his self-conceit and became able to proceed through fights calmly without looking down on the enemy.

The current Arios is like a different person.

Zero in a few words was a silent man.

However, he will certainly fulfill his given duties.

From the start, he was a person worthy of special mention of his defensive power with his Unique Skill『Unmovable One』, but after awakened with Star Shield, Zero’s defense was a perfect impregnable wall.

And the last Mai is――

With a flowing movement, she nocks her bow and shot her arrow.

From a single arrow of a shot, it splits into many becoming like meteors.

She is a One-man Army.

Exactly, that title was appropriate for her.

Gunther ungracefully lying on the ground with both of his hands and feet pierced by arrows.

「You lowly human――!!」

An arrow lodged into Gunther’s throat, silencing his shout.

It’s done without any technique.

Mai’s strength was too overwhelming.

「Well now. I need to keep it easy and slowly. I won’t leave anyone who obstructs Yuuki-kun alive.」

Mai indifferently nocks an arrow on her bow.

In order to deal the final blow on Gunther――

「We’ll withdraw, this place is dangerous.」

A gigantic figure appeared and stopped Mai’s movement.

Even while Mai is surprised, she’s relieved as she realizes that she knew the person well.

「Zero, what do you mean?」

「There’s no time to explain it in detail. I felt it was dangerous. Will you understand if I say that?」

Only saying that much, Zero started teleportation magic formula without waiting for Mai’s answer.

「Wai, wait a moment!? Aren’t you the commander in this area? Why you――

Impossible….. you intend to leave behind the angels!?」

To Mai’s astonished voice, Zero didn’t answer.

And then――

「Return!」

Zero teleported, bringing Mai along forcibly.

Gunther’s luck is strong, he had narrowly escaped death.

Thanks due to his loss of consciousness, he didn’t notice anything.

Immediately after that, the surroundings were swallowed by prismatic darkness……

Arnaud who was just fighting with the enemy’s commander was left with surprise.

At first, Arnaud leads the holy knight order to intercept the angel army.

At the same time, the Blood Knight led by the nobles also went to intercept the main force of the angel army.

Although they lose in number, due the attribute inversion of the Evil Purification Barrier, the angel’s invasion was prevented.

If it was to intercept the invasion coming from the barrier’s tear, then their disadvantage in number will be gone.

However, when the commander of the angel army went to the front line, the angel’s movement became quite different.

The angels faithfully obey the commander’s order.

They attack like willing to sacrifice themselves and the tearing of the barrier accelerated.

Among them, there also angel who does suicide bomb attack, so the progress of the battle has deteriorated in an instant.

‘Then, the only way is to defeat the commander!’

The holy knight captains thought so and assault the enemy, but the strategy failed.

That man who calls himself Zero was overwhelmingly strong.

He never attacks at all, but he defended against all of Arnaud’s attack with his huge shield.

Arnaud with his result of training in the labyrinth, his strength is almost one step to Saint class now.

Zero defended against all of Arnaud’s attack as if he can completely see everything.

No, it’s like he can read one or two steps without a doubt.

He was clearly an opponent on a different level.

Zero is fighting against Arnaud while commanding the angels.

Arnaud was enraged as he was being looked down upon, but in the end, he has no choice but to admit Zero’s ability.

Zero resisted all of magics and warded off all sword strikes with his shield.

He was like an immovable mountain.

Even the flash sword Arnaud learned directly from Albert didn’t hit Zero as it was prevented by Zero’s big shield.

Moreover, the shield seems to has effects of『Weapon Destruction』and『Attack Reflection』, Arnaud who one-sidedly attacking would be the one who receives damage.

Just as much as he strengthened the aura cladding his sword, the damage would become larger.

It was still good as the sword itself was okay.

With the way things are going, he would be defeated without being able to do anything ―― Arnaud judged so, he decided for a temporary withdrawal.

When he put out the order, Zero ceased commanding the angels.

Zero leave behind the angels and went somewhere, such sudden action left Arnaud bewildered.

As the commander disappears, the angels stopped moving.

Although they carried out an automatic attack, the angel who lost their commander was just a disorderly crowd.

While being confused unable read Zero’s intention, Arnaud issue order to intercept the angel ――

Arnaud also swallowed by the prismatic darkness.

Without being able to understood what happened, Arno parted with his consciousness.

Veldora standing in the center of the prismatic darkness sphere.

In front of him is Dagruel.

「――you, did you change the world with me as the seedbed?」

「Hmph. Rather than changing, the correct answer would be I return it to its origin.

Because Fertile Paradox actually isn’t an attack.

I gave this land my divine protection. Using the corpses as the nourishment, I quicken the growth of nature.

I restored this land where the magic disaster happened before to normal, in order to restore it to soil with good harvests.

By the way, your body will be the core.

It’s impossible to cancel this effect―― After all, it’s because this is a restoration ability.」

「I aware of it. Such a cunning thing and also provoking, you know――」

「Kuaahhahhahha! I’ll accept it as a compliment.

What? You don’t need to worry. Your holy aura will be restored after hundreds of years at the quickest, or at the latest after a thousand years.

Your current state would be restored completely and naturally reborn.

At that time, the normalization of this land might also be completed.」

「Kukukuku. Did you realize the current situation of my country?」

「Hmm. The current situation where the water will be dried up in about several hundreds of years and it will become a land that impossible even for the giants to survive, right?」

「As I expected, you have realized it. Even the true reason of why I mobilized the Chain of Restrain Titan army to invaded Ruminas’ territory――」

「Nope…… I don’t know such a thing. It doesn’t matter to me.

Anyway, I don’t really care whether there’re only dead soldiers and you don’t have young soldier, woman, and children among your subordinates.」

「Fu, fuhahahaha! Do you pretend not knowing?

Veldanava-sama’s order is to protect the heaven gate in this land.

We, the giants had faithfully obeyed that order.

And so, I understood that we would perish in accordance with the order as it is.

Even so, that’s okay. If it’s only me.

But, I couldn’t bear to impose the same fate to those who were born after that Person died.

I’m sorry for Ruminas, but I thought that I have the chance――」

「Hmm. After all, this world is survival of the fittest. No one will blame you.」

「――Why, why did you want to restored this land? Did you do it to save us?」

「Kuahahahaha! Don’t misunderstand it! I just want to prove that I’m stronger than you.

And at the same time, I thought I would enrich this land to mend the mood of Ruminas.

I never think that the range of the effect would also include the death desert area―― It was a miscalculation!」

「Fufu, fuhahahahaha! Even to the end you still pretending like that heh.

Very well, I will not think this as a debt, Veldora!」

「Of course. There’s no lending and borrowing[2] between friends! Let’s fight again. Oh well, I will also win next time though!」

「Shut up, I’m not eager enough to lose to a lizard for that many times!」

Veldora and Dagruel laugh loudly looking at each other faces.

There wasn’t any ill feeling, both of them had a fresh expression.

「Well now, it’s about time the effect of Fertile Paradox spreading.」

「So? How you procured the remaining energy?

It’s unlikely for my remaining energy to be enough to cover all of it.」

「Ah, since the angels are swarming the sky, I used them.

Originally, the technique affects everyone, but I made it so it only affects the opponent with Probability Fluctuations.

Kukuku, convenient isn’t it? There’s no need to select neatly.」

「…………You’re an outrageous guy. No way, even my alive subordinates too――!?」

「Hm? Ah, I leave them alone. If they are hostile after seeing the situation then I’ll wipe them up.

As the angel has no free will, this time I make the condition for the target to be “Those who have hostile intent” and “Things without a will”. Well, I will deal with them properly later.」

“I see……” Dagruel consented so.

If it’s Veldora, he might be able to do anything.

(However, things without a will? That, isn’t that means all of the structures would get destroyed?)

Suddenly, such worry passed inside Dagruel’s mind.

As for the heaven gate, it actually has a will.

Therefore, Dagruel didn’t worry about the condition of the gate, but thinking about the scope of affected area of the prismatic darkness, he confirmed this in a moment and it is clear that all of his territories will be included in the range.

Well, they’re all included because he understood that the purpose is to restore the land.

(Oh well. Structures can be rebuild. I don’t need to worry about it――）

Dagruel renews his feelings.

But at the end,

「Veldora, is it okay if I ask you a request?」

「Hm, what is it?」

「I want to ask you to give my message to my sons and subordinates.」

So he said to Veldora.

Veldora in response,

「Kuahahahaha! You should tell them with your own mouth.

Didn’t I say there’s no lending and borrowing?

If it’s for such thing, you will manage to do it somehow.

Soon, the darkness will disperse.」

Answered so, he was smiling broadly.

The prismatic darkness cleared up.

The place that was a death desert area, a wasteland that spread as far as the eye can see.

That place is now transformed to a land where greenery spread out all over.

Vegetation grows in a terrific vigor, bring forth a fertile soil.

In a flash, a vast woodlands was formed that won’t inferior to Great Jura Forest.

「Umm, didn’t it works a bit too fast?」

Veldora mutters in small voice.

Apparently, the change was more than he intended.

Next to Veldora who grimaced uneasily is Dagruel who did his last speech.

「Hear me! I assign Dagura as my successor.

Ryura, Debra! Help Dagura, exerts your effort for the prosperity of the Giant race!

And, the warriors of the Giant race! You all shall obey Dagura as your king.

You all need to ascertain of what is correct with your own judgment together with the new king.

The fate of the giant race hanging in your judgment.

Running away is not allowed. At the dawn when I returned, if the giant race has perished ――

You guys understand?」

「Ye, yes!! Of course, Father! I’ll risk my own life to fulfilled my duty as the king!!」

「We too will help elder brother, we’ll promise that we will live up to father’s expectations!」

「Of course!」

The three brothers who watching the fight between Veldora and Dagruel to the end were awake at the same time as the darkness disappears.

And, as soon of their awakening giving no time to digest the content of the declaration, they stated the oath.

The reason is that Dagruel emitted air like “Hesitation will not be allowed”.

And so――

『We all present here, in accordance with the new king, shall devote ourselves for the country!!』

With Dagruel’s defeat, the elites of the Chain of Restrain Titan army understood Veldora’s aid, they followed it without raising any objection.

Seeing it with his own eyes, Dagruel nod satisfactorily.

「It’s regrettable that I’m unable to see the end of this great war, but it seems my time is no more.

If it’s you guys, I’ll believe that you all can choose the right way, unlike mine.

I entrust it to you all in my absence! Well then, goodbye――」

Dagruel was sucked into the ground and disappeared with that as his last words.

He falls into a long sleep in this land, in order regenerate his own body.

Thus, the invasion of Dagruel’s army failed.

The angels were sacrificed without one remaining.

The allied forces of Rimuru and Ruminas had succeeded in defending this place.

Thus――

The defense of this territory succeeded, but the city was gone without any trace.

As Dagruel feared, the city that’s inorganic substance was spotlessly destroyed.

Moreover, with the birth of a new Great Forest, it seems that it wouldn’t be easy for the reconstruction of the city.

Of course, that thing is the reason why a certain person was enraged……

「Well, Veldora. What does this mean? Do you have an explanation for me?」

Ruminas asked Veldora with a clear vein popping on her brow which hidden by her beautiful silver hair.

She put a beautiful smile on her face, but her eyes are not laughing at all.

Veldora instantly

(Thi, this is impossible! My perfect plan to lose my infamy!?)

Saving Ruminas from a crisis, moreover, changing Ruminas’ territory into land with good harvests.

It should be a perfect plan.

And yet, there’s an apparent questionable mood.

「Ummmmm…… There is a reason that deeper than the ocean for this…...

I want to explain it, but I’m busy. We will talk about it later!」

Saying so, Veldora soared to the sky.

And at the speed exceeding the speed when he fought Dagruel, he left behind the surface.



「Damn it, he runs away again! I won’t forgive him, THAT IDIOT LIZARD!!」

Ruminas’ angry words didn’t reached Veldora.

* * *

[1] Forgot to mention this when it appears in past chapters, refers to those who have EP: 1m+. EP: Energy Points I think. ¯\_(ツ)_/¯

[2] Can also mean, no debt between friends.





Chapter 220: Royal Capital Disturbance


Hinata felt hopeless when she grasped the current situation,

However, as the supreme leader, such emotion can’t be shown in her expression.

The main church in the Ingrassia Kingdom is filled with the citizens who have taken shelter in it.

Hinata greatly understood that she couldn’t allow anxiety to be seen on her face in front of them.

Just before noon on the second day after Velda’s declaration, each of the countries’ capitals fell into chaos.

The citizens showed various reactions, there were people who ran away for their own lives, people who rioted, and people who welcome the death Velda will bring.

The Holy Knights and trained priests that were dispatched to each country worked hard to suppress the citizens’ confusion and guide them to shelter.

There’s no other word apart from splendid for their ability to suppress the people’s confusion just by one day.

It was a great achievement accomplished under the command of Hinata who is the chairwoman of the Freedom Arbitration Committee with the cooperation of Nicholas who is a cardinal of the Holy Church.

To the confused citizens, she explained that it’s impossible for Demon Lord Rimuru to be defeated which calmed down their anxiety.

The governing body of each country who knows Demon Lord Rimuru showed an immediate settling down, but it can’t earn the trust of the countries which didn’t associate with Rimuru.

Even Hinata understands that it can’t be helped.

Even if she said to believe in Demon Lord, there might be a few people who are convinced.

However, even so, there’s no choice but to believe now.

After all, if the Demon Lord Alliance was defeated, this world will be destroyed by Velda.

Therefore, Hinata didn’t waver.

The things that Hinata can do now are to prevent chaos and suppress the citizens’ anxiety even by a little.

Hinata did her best as the leader of the army to guarantee the citizens’ safety.

But――

Rioters were unavoidable at the end of the world.

In addition to their bad character, they showed up and chose the worst decision at the worst time which became the primary factor that tormented Hinata and co.

Those people mobilized all of the country power and have Hinata and co cornered.

They denounced Hinata as a witch who deceived people’s mind, which fueled the people’s anxiety.

A witch who was charmed by the Demon Lord, the one who leads everyone to ruin―― they loudly exclaimed, the Holy Church of the Ingrassia Kingdom where Hinata is in was surrounded.

The citizens who have taken shelter inside the main church borrowed under the name of the Freedom Arbitration Committee looked at Hinata with their anxious faces.

That might be so.

After all, the one who denounces Hinata……

『My people! That witch had falsely accused me and made me lost my position in the council.

Moreover, she killed my father and brought chaos and sorrow to this country.

If you all are wise, I believe that you’ll understand whose words are correct!』

That’s right―― because it was Elrick himself, the prince of this country.

The figure of the leader of the Guard Knight Order, Reiner can be seen on his side.

The perpetrator who murdered the king and leading the Knight Order without a doubt is Reiner, Hinata thought while letting out a sigh.

He completely forestalled Hinata. He planned everything, even if she said anything right now, all of the evidence must have been destroyed.

The problem above all of it is Prince Elrick is pretty popular among the population.

Prince Elrick with his gentlemanly appearance is pretty popular with the women. His ability aside, he gained the people’s favor due to his sociable appearance.

His blunder in the council was not told to the people.

As it was the royal family’s disgrace, Elrick was just punished with house arrest for 1 year.

Taking a consideration as he is the heir of the kingdom, the house arrest was said to be a form of re-education.

Either way, Tempest has become the major power. What happens to the heir of a country is not Hinata’s concern.

So she thought, he didn’t raise any objection to that punishment, but it seems it had backfired.

His terrible and reckless actions to plan to murder his father and usurp the throne was an unexpected event for Hinata.

(I never thought that he was this foolish ――）

Hinata cursed her own carelessness inside her mind. Hinata feels the naivety that can’t be found in her previous self.

It might be said that it’s Hinata’s mistake that she failed to see that Prince Elrick was this foolish and didn’t execute him that time.

Although there’s no use in regretting it now……

It can’t be said that Holy Church’s grounds is vast.

But, even so, more than 1.000 citizens were taking shelter inside.

The former members of the Freedom Association who lives in the vicinity of the Ingrassia Kingdom have no house in the capital.

Now they were working for the committee, but as they don’t belong to the country, neither land nor house can be owned by them within the kingdom.

Apart from the people who stay in the building borrowed by the committee, most people lived in the city blocks around the capital.

It was Hinata who chose the church as a place to accept those people.

Therefore, Prince Elrick’s speech was not for the people inside the cathedral.

His speech is for the nearby citizens who look at the national army surrounding the church with their trembling eyes.

In response to this unprecedented crisis is the answer to the question of what’s happening in the kingdom for the army to move.

「Those bastards, to smooth over the blunder in the council, what an overbearing way…」

「Moreover, they killed the king and intend to charge Hinata-sama as the culprit――」

To Hinata’s mutter, Nicholas calmly throws his interjections.

It seemed Elrick intends to take advantage of this chaos to make all of his mistakes and crimes forgotten.

The annoying thing is, Elrick as the prince of this kingdom is popular.

Which one will the people believe? That’s clear as day.

「It’s because Hinata-sama can’t be said to have a good reputation……」

Fritz crack a joke, the Holy Knight Leader Leonard makes a small consent.

The two of them are the only Holy Knights left in here.

Everyone else is either dispatched to various places or assigned to the duty of defending of the Holy Capital under Arnaud, the vice-captain’s command.

In contrast to the capital that is a safe ground, there was no room to spare for additional war forces.

Although there are dozens of apprentice soldier, many of which are boys, it’s unlikely for them to be war forces.

As for the adventurers, they are guarding the refugees gathering around in each country under Hinata’s order.

There were only 4 people among Hinata and co who can actually fight.

On the other hand, the opponent is a country’s army.

Soldiers and knights, the Ingrassia Kingdom which is a large rich country boasted of

a considerable number of knights commanded by Reiner seems to have surrounded the church.

Even a regular soldier is troublesome, and Hinata and co can’t move carelessly since there are knights.

There are two Holy Knights here, but it will be difficult to protect the citizens who have taken shelter.

The refugees were just like a hostage to Hinata and co.

「Then, what will we do? It’s a matter of time before those guys break in as things are.

If it’s just us, we can break through and escape, but we will let the citizens die.

Is it impossible to protect the citizens?」

「If this is going to happen, it would be better if we moved to the Holy City……」

「No, it’s hard over there too.

The opponents over there are the angel army and Chain of Restraint Titan Army of Demon Lord Dagruel, the war seems to have intensified.

A little while ago, not only the telepathy got cut off, the gate also stopped working.

I’m certain that there’s some kind of emergency happened there.」

To Leonard and Nicholas’s information, Hinata knits her eyebrows.

In the worst case, it was planned to escape to the Holy City, but that escape path seems to have been closed.

However, there probably won’t be enough time to transfer everyone.

「What did those guys demand?」

「Yes, they said to bring out Hinata-sama from a little while ago.

That guy named Reiner seems wants to display his power.

They said, they dislike that Hinata-sama was called as the strongest.

If you want, should I be their opponent?」

Fritz answered Hinata’s question.

「In this crisis situation, how leisurely――

No way, he seriously said that?

Was Reiner is such a big fool to that extent?」

Hinata tries to laugh it away and stops moving.

And, she timidly asked Fritz

Fritz lets out a sigh and,

「That ‘No way’ indeed……」

He answered while shrugging his shoulders.

According to Fritz’s explanation, it seems Reiner want to wipe out the disgrace of wetting himself due to Shuna’s coercion at the council by all means.

For that reason, he plans to clear his name by defeating Hinata who is called as the strongest holy knight.

「Fool. I already don’t have power as I did before. I already retired you know?」

「It seems to be irrelevant.

For Reiner, he wants to overwhelm Hinata-sama in front of the masses to show off his strength.

In this regard, I could see that his ulterior motive to harass you.」

Fritz reported with his full of contempt appearance.

Nicholas who hears it, was enraged.

「He can’t be forgiven, we need to kill him. That low-life is not qualified to live!」

Immediately, Nicholas who might go to kill was stopped by Leonard from behind.

「Please wait, Cardinal. That’s what the enemy wants!」

Leonard said so and desperately restrained Nicholas.

He’s thinking about measures while waiting for Nicholas to settle down.

There’s not much time left.

「Then? If I get defeated, will the citizens survive?」

「I can’t say anything.

However, although he says defeat, it means death.

Laying the blame for the crime of killing the king is Prince Elrick’s goal.

Reiner and the prince cooperated in this coup d’état because their interests matched.

Showing your defeat is――」

Fritz stopped talking.

It doesn’t need to be said, their plan was a stupid one, and even Hinata was able to understand that.

But, there seems to be no other plan to suppress damage.

At least, if she accepted the duel, the citizens would be out of harm……

She would somehow counterattack.

However, as soon as she done it, Hinata won’t be able to wipe the stigma that accused to her.

As the witch who rebels against the country army.

Right now, as long as she has a chance for excuses, it might be possible to clear her name of that false accusation.

If thing goes well, there might be a possibility for evidence to be found that Prince Elrick and co were the ones who killed the king.

「I don’t have another choice but to go out.

In the meanwhile, strengthen the defense as much as possible.

Put a lot layer of defense barrier, turns the cathedral as an impregnable fortress.

――After all, although it might be just a temporary peace, I’ll be able to buy some time rather than doing nothing.

Don’t expect anything though…… By any chance, that something might occur――」

In this time of emergency where people should think about measures against the angel and Velda, there’re people who did a really foolish action.

Hinata issued her order to the three people while hiding her depressed and desperate mind.

「But, Hinata-sama――」

Nicholas tries to stop Hinata with uneasy expression but,

「Don’t worry. I don’t intend to die.

I’ll struggle as far as I can to buy you all time.

No matter how ungraceful I’ll be, I won’t give up.」

Leaving behind those words, Hinata begins to walk.

――To stands in front of Reiner, sacrificing her body to buy time.

Nicholas and co finished putting up barriers in a rush as Hinata ordered and went outside the church.

What they saw outside was too horrible.

Hinata’s clothes were tattered and torn, black bruises are visible.

It seems she has received violent assault of punches and kicks.

Her fingers also stamped on, it was obvious that they’re broken.

What stands out are her hands and feet.

She was groveling in the ground as her tendons were cut.

Not to mention holding a sword, it’s unlikely that she can stand.

Meanwhile, there’s no wound on her face, it’s what made Hinata’s disastrous condition stand out.

「Hi-hinata-sama!」

Nicholas rushes over to Hinata.

「Hahaha, You’re unable to live up to your claims! What a cheeky bastard, it’s more suitable for you to rolling on the ground!」

With an irritating laugh, Reiner laughs loudly.

「You bastard! Wasn’t it’s a fair and square one on one fight!?」

To Leonard’s words who shouting angry, Reiner laughed to the nose.

「A criminal has no human rights you see. What, we’re merciful.

If she cried and begs for forgiveness, I’d think to delay the day of the death penalty a bit.

Anyway, in the meantime I’ll make you show your gratitude.」

Saying so, Reiner grins and laughs vulgarly.

「I can’t endure it any longer. As I excepted, here and now you bastard will――」

「――Wait…… Fritz………… The match…… is sti-still…… going…………」

Fritz who enraged and pulling out his sword was stopped by Hinata who is dying.

And then, she cast for a small recovery magic and connect the cut tendons.

Hinata stands up while staggering and somehow holding her sword up.

「Hyaahahahahaha! Do you still want to be cut? Are you a Masochist?!

No matter how many times you try, you seem to not able to understand that you won’t be able to win against me.

Alrighty then, I shall cut you over and over again!」

With frenzy bloodshot eyes, Reiner shouted.

Being driven by his sadistic pleasure, his reasoning starts flying.

Normally, it won’t be out of control but, due to pleasures of being able to trample someone who stronger than him, Reiner’s mind was on the verge of abnormality.

Even Reiner was aware that he was inferior to Hinata.

No, it’d be correct that their differences were clearly pointed at the moment of the confrontation.

Even though a lot of the power of Hinata’s soul has gone, the ability etched to her body was still there.

Even with only her swordsmanship, it surpassed Reiner’s slightly.

But ――

Reiner whispered, ‘Don’t resist if you don’t want to be attacked by everyone all at once’, in accordance with such unreasonable order, Hinata was doing exactly as she was told to do.

It was just as Reiner planned.

He makes sure that her face uninjured, such is his purpose to enjoy seeing her beautiful, well-featured face warped by pain.

And then, after beating her up severely, he was waiting for ‘another’ fun.

Just by imagining it, Reiner felt his own blood boiling and brimming with power.

Absolute superiority.

Even if she contacts them now, it would take time for the Holy Knights to return.

Even if they stop guiding the evacuation and return, they won’t be able to return so easily.

Besides, if he felt such presences, he would only need to give the attack order quickly.

Reiner takes along with him 4.000 soldiers of the army and 300 knights of the Guard Knight Order.

There was no chance for defeat.

(He! After I finish tormenting her who made a fool of me, I’ll also make that woman named Shuna――）

At the time Reiner swung his sword downward while having such delusion――

‘Shing!’ such clear sound was heard, Reiner’s sword was stopped.

「Hinata nee-chan! I came to help!!」

It was a Hero with little light.

Following behind him are four children.

And――

Small whispering voices begin to be heard from the people’s mouths that saw the person who appeared in front of them,

「He-hero-sama――?」

「It’s Hero-sama……」

「It’s Hero-sama! Hero-sama has returned!」

「It-it’s Masayuki-sama! Masayuki-sama has returnedーーー!!」

And so, it doesn’t take a long time for it to be a grand chorus.

『MA~SAYUKI, MA~~SAYUKI!!』

Bathed inside the chorus, a young man stands in front of the crowd.

Reiner with his bloodshot eyes glared at that person.

That person stands in front of Reiner.

That’s right! That person for sure is the strongest man in Ingrassia Kingdom.

He’s Hero Masayuki!





Chapter 221: Royal Capital Disturbance -Hero-


‘Why in the world it become like this?’ Currently, that wasn’t what in Masayuki’s mind.

『MA~SAYUKI, MA~~SAYUKI!!』

Masayuki stood inside the people’s cheers.

Then, he tilted his neck diagonally as he was instructed to, and directed his sight downward.

In about 2 seconds, he turned his face to the front slowly and meets the people’s gazes.

Only doing so, the increasing level of people’s excitement can be felt. It was very effective to the extent of being terrifying.

(As expected, it’s as Rimuru-san says……)

That’s right.

Masayuki’s gesture just now was the result of his training under Rimuru’s guidance.

Grasping the people’s minds, the effect of Unique Skill『The Chosen One』has increased due to the calculated gesture instead of solely relying on the skill.

It can’t be helped for Masayuki to trembling with fear as the influence was beyond than what he expected.

He just received a bit acting lesson, but the effect was too overwhelming.

As soon as Masayuki turned his gaze over, the people closed their mouths.

Quietly, like the waves, silence descended to this place.

It was already a sight that he saw so many times.

――Actually, for Masayuki.

Before visiting the Ingrassia Kingdom, he visited several countries around Great Jura Forest and had calmed down similar mayhem.

Before the Great War begins, Masayuki was called by Rimuru and had received a request.

With a carefree tone, Rimuru asked him「Please persuade the people in each country so they will not cause a riot.」.

「No no, it’s impossible for me!」

「What are you saying, Masayuki-kun. You can do it. No, only you can do it!」

After such conversation, he was coaxed with「Don’t worry, don’t worry! If it’s you, you can do anything as you please!」.

After that, he received a bit acting lesson, from the pose before the speech and the movement of his eyes during the speech―― everything was drawn in detail in the memo given to him.

Also,

「Kufufufufu. As expected from Masayuki-dono, it’s splendid.

You seem to better than a demon at grasping people’s minds, you have my admiration.」

He gets praised by Diablo, the demon itself.

He was not happy at all, but Masayuki warded off that feeling with a complicated smile.

However, for some reason, Diablo was strangely pleased with Masayuki,

「That’s right. If you are going to many countries, you will need an escort.」

Saying so, Diablo summoned his trusted subordinate named Venom and arranged him to accompany Masayuki.

Thanks to that, his traveling to many countries was shortened due to Transfer Magic.

On the second day, even when Velda declared that Rimuru was defeated, Masayuki was making a speech without worrying about it.

In a small country, in front of the trembling populace, Masayuki was able to clear the people’s anxiety very smoothly.

It was because Rimuru had irresponsibly told him「By some chance, I might die once, I leave the rest to you!」, so this and that.

Venom who was accompanying him too,

「Ah, what hmm…. Even though Diablo-sama is safe, for some reason I can’t contact him.

But, I can’t see that Moss’s presence too, I’m sure that he was doing something stealthily by Diablo-sama’s order.」

Said so and shrugged his shoulders.

There was no sign of him worried at all.

Certainly, if Rimuru was really destroyed, his subordinates would act more recklessly.

Because Masayuki was strangely convinced, he stopped thinking about it deeply.

Speaking of convinced, this also applied to Venom.

For some reason, Masayuki mysteriously gets along with him.

When Diablo introduced Venom to Masayuki for the first time, Venom wore an over the top combat clothes……

「That, can you manage it somehow? I’m supposed to be the Hero though……?」

「Ah, that’s right. Then, I would better if you come with me.」

So, after leaving Rimuru’s place, it has been decided for Venom to change clothes and both of them were going to the Armor shop.

At that time they conversed, but it was a talk about an unexpected thing.

「I guess―― I have a feeling that I lived in the same world as you before.」

So, Venom frankly speaking, Masayuki thinks that he might be a reincarnated person.

And so, he was lectured about various clothes.

He asked the craftsman and got the clothes finished with the illustration that Masayuki had drawn.

It was a bit of Punk fashion, but strangely it looks good on Venom.

Because Venom’s hair is like a Mohawk, it seems to be his rule to not wear a helmet.

He was like a biker gang from somewhere, so Masayuki wanted to tsukkomi, but compared to how he first dressed, Masayuki thinks this one is better.

Because he’s a demon, he doesn’t need any kind of armor, but appearance was important.

「Hey hey, aren’t you have a good sense on this. Can I trouble you for it from now on?」

「Ah, I’m glad if you liked it.」

His illustration that makes Venom bring out a delinquent like atmosphere is mixed with a bit of joke, but it seems that it becomes his best favorite.

It seems that he felt like he worn such clothes in his former life.

That became the impetus of how Venom and Masayuki became friends.

His appearance was better―― when compared to his previous demonic appearance―― and so, Masayuki introduced Venom to his five companions.

「Oh. Have you also been charmed by Masayuki-sama’s greatness?」

「Well, of course. After all, Masayuki is a cool and wonderful person.」

「It’s because he is exuding the aura of a Hero. Oh well, pleased to be with you from now on!」

His companions say such thing unanimously.

As for Masayuki, he seems to want to say,「Before, rather than charmed by me, people would go away though――」

There was no one who noticed such feelings from Masayuki among his companions.

Every time, they believed Masayuki like a god.

Still, recently, they gradually become friendlier and frank little by little.

According to Rimuru,「Aren’t they come to be able to resist the effect of your Unique Skill?」.

With this impetus, Masayuki wanted everyone to notice the truth soon.

Putting that aside, Masayuki was glad that his companions get along with Venom.

Afterwards, they requested the cooperation of the adventurers of Tempest to prevent disorder, and they scattered to each country before the Great War begins.

Although it was due to Rimuru’s commission, the adventurers joyfully departed to various places due to Masayuki’s request who received an acting lesson.

After that, until now.

Including Venom, the seven of them went around various places.

And now――

Masayuki who wore shining golden armor and his whole body glowed with light was bathed in people’s eyes.

He gradually became accustomed to the feeling of tension, and now he can naturally accept it.

It might be the result of his regular practice following Rimuru’s memo for the acting and stuff.

(What I’m saying, it looks like the timing I aimed……)

Anything but that please, so Masayuki thinks.

Although he has accustomed to tension, Masayuki was still a timid guy.

Such timing like a hero, Masayuki thought that role was not for someone like him.

However, he had no one even if he wanted to complain.

It can’t be helped, he decided to finish this place.

「Everyone, please settle down. Calmly, and please tell me what happened here――」

Masayuki began to talk gently.

(Umm, ‘talk slowly without panicking. Even if you talk bit your tongue or somewhat stuttering, don’t worry cause you can correct it! Wasn’t it)

Masayuki recalled the memo he had read for so many times in his mind, and he thinks there’s no intense gaze coming from the citizens.

Due to Masayuki’s calm words, the people who calmed down regained their calm mind.

In the first place, why did Hinata fight against Reiner?

Although it’s a fact that the king was assassinated, was the criminal really Hinata? Such doubt recurs in the people’s hearts.

And even for Masayuki.

(No, really, in this situation, what on the earth was going on?

Which side is correct or wrong? Which side is the correct one I should ally with?)

He was actually quite perplexed.

He knew about Hinata.

Masayuki reached the point where he’s called as the Hero of the West, but he was frequently compared with Hinata who is the Holy Knight Leader.

He had heard people argued which side is stronger as they please.

Masayuki remembered Rimuru had said 「Masayuki-kun. If you seriously fight her, it’d be better to run away instead.」like it was natural.

She’s such cool-headed and dangerous woman. But, he said that she wouldn’t take a meaningless action.

In contrast to Reiner, when Masayuki received the victory prize of the fighting tournament he participated in the Ingrassia Kingdom, he felt that he was a close aide to the king.

He thinks that he’s probably that person at that time, Masayuki wasn’t sure. Either way, it’s certain that he’s an important figure in the country.

Which side is the correct side he should side with? It was a very difficult problem.

If he interferes unskillfully, the mask of the Hero that he played with great effort would come off.

If it happened, Masayuki was thinking to run away and return to Tempest, but he was anxious that not completing Rimuru’s request would be a problem.

Rimuru aside, he didn’t think that it would end just with Diablo and other uttering sarcasm.

Masayuki wanted to clear this place somehow smoothly. He understood it well that’s related to saving his own skin.

However, the situation changed without caring about Masayuki’s troubles.

「Oh my, oh my, Isn’t it Hero Masayuki-dono? It’s been a while, I’m Reiner.

Do you remember me? It’s Reiner the Leader of Guard Knight Order. Currently I’m――」

Reiner began to say something.

As expected Masayuki’s memory is correct, he was the Knight Leader who standing beside the king.

(Ummm……then, is the correct answer to ally with him maybe? Eh, isn’t it bad if I’m hostile against Hinata though!?)

He didn’t know that Hinata had lost her power―― although she’s still stronger than Masayuki―― Masayuki’s mind is in turmoil.

But, not caring about Masayuki’s problem, the conversation continued.

And then, it began to show a turbulent development.

「Masayuki-sama! Please, please somehow forgive me!! The king, I’m the one who lay my hands on the king――」

Interrupting Reiner’s words, one of the soldiers come running and prostrating in front of Masayuki.

(Eh!? I don’t know what he’s talking about……)

Masayuki wanted to reconfirm it so he’s not moving carelessly.

「Hmm! What are you blabbering about?」

Reiner was angry.

He tries to cut down the soldier, but the children blocked him and disturbed Reiner’s action.

In addition――

「Fu, fuhahahahaha. It’s the end, I’m ruined……」

For some reason, Prince Elrick began to confess his wrongdoing.

With the testimony of the soldier who abode the Prince’s order in order to help his sick family and the confession of the Prince himself, all relevant facts of the case have mostly been confirmed.

This and that is all due to Masayuki’s ability.

Actually, Masayuki, who didn’t realize it yet, has awakened a new ability.

Its name is Unique Skill『Messiah (Savior)』.

It was the result of him following the memo that given to him by Rimuru―― or rather it was Ciel.

The ability of Unique Skill『Messiah』, just as its name implies, was salvation.

It urged the mind of the target of their crime and makes them act to attain salvation. That’s realized mostly in the form of confessing their sin.

This time, only the people who reacted to Masayuki’s words became the target.

That’s triggered when Masayuki asked the explanation of what happened here.

It was a terrifying ability that was convenient for Masayuki eternally.

This ability of Masayuki was naturally able to be resisted by a high ranking person.

Therefore, Reiner was barely affected.

Prior to that, to begin with Reiner was――

「Kehii, kehihihi, kehihaa! I’ll kill youuuuuuuu! I’ll kill you all!!」

His mind was already in abnormal state.

Reiner’s bloated pride was repainted with revenge and hatred when he committed the failure in the council and tasted dread from Shuna.

And now, while raising a strange laughter, Reiner turned his sword towards Masayuki.

(Eh!? He aimed at me!)

In a panic, Masayuki also put his hand on his sword.

Actually, Masayuki’s ability had increased considerably. Training in the labyrinth had raised Masayuki’s strength.

However, even so, Masayuki thought that he’s at disadvantage against his opponent who is the strongest knight of the Ingrassia Kingdom which is one of the large countries.

「How sad, for us to only able to talk through sword――」

He said so while giving him a side glance, as shown in his memo.

Although the people seemed to be impressed by it, Reiner didn’t.

「Die!!」

While shouting, Reiner charged towards Masayuki.

「Masayuki-anchan, finish that guy off!」

「Please show us coolly!」

The children’s cheering was painful to his ear.

(Why on the earth they’re so convinced that I’m strong! Although I’m protecting Hinata, please protect me too!)

He recalled several times that the children who were training in the labyrinth doing training for a special move.

He talked about fantasy special moves such as Eternal Frozen Sword or Evil Annihilation Sword, but it seems that they thought he can really use them.

Although at that time Masayuki was stronger, the children showed an abnormally rapid growth.

Blessed with master class teachers like Hakurou and Agera, they were now slightly stronger than Masayuki.

And yet, they still believed that Masayuki was stronger.

Masayuki who received such respect from the children was unable to step back.

(Damn, damn it! If it comes to this, I feel I’m going to die!)

Masayuki steeled himself.

Reiner was approaching.

And, at the time Reiner’s sword was about to reach Masayuki, a person stood in front of Masayuki.

That person was Hinata.

「Can you leave this guy to me?」

Saying so, Hinata sprouted a beautiful smile towards Masayuki.





Chapter 222: Royal Capital Disturbance -Sudden Change-


Hinata stood up while gazing at Reiner coldly.

There’s no trace of gentleness in her eyes, it was buried completely by the color of contempt.

「Hi-hinata-sama―― Are you alright? Can’t you leave the matter to Masayuki-dono?」

Nicholas called out Hinata, but she didn’t respond.

Masayuki heard Nicholas’ word, but he stiffened as though he was startled

On Hinata’s mouth, there’s a small smile.

It was a frightening smile, reminiscent of the former Hinata.

「No, there’s no problem. That’s right….. There’s no problem. Everything was as expected.」

Rather than answering Nicholas, Hinata muttered instinctively to feel convinced that what she thought is correct.

In fact, it’s true.

Hinata had believed in his guess and went along with it.

That’s right. Hinata had seen everything up to this result.

In a word, everything was as she expected.

Even when she was tormented by Reiner, all were expected events.

Actually, these days Hinata had been attacked by an intense sense of déjà vu.

She could see a scene from a few seconds to a few minutes ahead as if she had experienced it.

She experienced the same thing several times, she was convinced that it was the experience of a bit later in the future.

This time luckily―― although it may not be so―― she was tormented by Reiner, she had been able to see the scene where he cut her limbs and gouged out her eyes.

(As expected, it’s difficult to restore cut limbs; though it’s not amusing if the face was wounded ――)

That’s Hinata’s thought.

Her face which was clean of injury was unnatural, it’s not because Reiner going easy on her, the correct answer was because Hinata had evaded all of the attacks.

As for her limbs, she normally received the attacks, to the extent of her tendons was cut.

She was able to do this and that because she knew the future.

And so, Hinata’s victory condition wasn’t to survive until the truth was exposed to the people, it’s for the people taking shelter in the church to not be harmed.

In case she poorly resisted, the knight under Reiner’s command would start attacking the church, it was one of the possible futures that she saw.

(Is the cause because I’m connected with Chloe’s soul? I don’t think it’s my ability after all.)

With a terrifying accuracy, Hinata sees the fact.

Due to a small connection with Chloe, a fragment of Chloe’s ability had shown memory of the future to Hinata.

However, Hinata was indifferent to such thing.

The important thing is only the reality that led to the best results.

As things going as Hinata planned, Reiner, the subject of scorn is in front of her.

He was the man who tormented her until now, she has no sympathy at the slightest for him.

「Well then. Did you say your name is Reiner?

You wanted to fight me right. Very well, I shall fight you seriously.」

Hinata sprouts a smile full of kindness and look on Reiner

However, her eyes are cold.

「Damn you! I’ll kill you and also that Hero. I’m the strongest, the result is obvious.

I’ll slaughter everyone who knows about the matter!」

Reiner shouted with a mind full of madness.

And then he raised his sword charging towards Hinata.

Without panicking, Hinata raised her rapier.

Unlike the one-sided torment a while ago, there’s no need for her to hold back now.

She evaded the big slash from Reiner’s sword, and without hesitation, she stabbed his foot.

「Gyaaaーーーーー!!」

Reiner screamed.

Due to the intense pain, he recovered a bit of his sense.

(What, what the heck is this pain――)

Reiner was grinding his teeth as he felt an abnormal pain.

He couldn’t conceal his confusion as the skill『Pain Perception Blockade』that he had hadn’t shown its effect.

The damage was not a big deal, but there’s no sign of any injury.

「Ufufufufu. Is it painful? Raise your voice more and entertain me more!」

With an expression of ecstasy, Hinata moistened her lips with her bewitching tongue.

Nicholas and Fritz sent a hot gaze towards current Hinata.

As one would expect, it’s only Leonard who grieved due to it.

「――Hinata-sama…… Your image just improved with a lot of trouble, it’s spoiled now――」

Certainly, her image was spoiled, but her gesture brings forth some wild enthusiastic fans.

That suited Hinata very well.

Because it reminded people that the strong predate the weak.

Hinata started pursuing Reiner without showing any behavior of minding the response of the surroundings.

Afraid of the attack which caused him intense pain even if it just grazed him, Reiner naturally fought defensively.

「You-you bastard! Enchanting the sword with magic is unfair.」

Reiner accuses foulmouthed.

However, Hinata only showing a smile, she didn’t respond to Reiner’s accusation.

Because it’s a fact, she didn’t intend to deny it. Moreover, enchanting her sword with magic was not a bad reason either.

Her sword is a Unique class Magic Sword.

Hinata’s spiritual armaments were transferred to Chloe leaving her with nothing, even if she borrowed a mass-produced type spiritual armament before, she didn’t have enough power to activate it.

At that time, this rapier was sent by Rimuru.

It’s called Phantom Pain (Phantom Rainbow Spirit Sword).

It was a sword with abilities that could be said the upgraded version of the magic sword Hinata used before.

Naturally, it’s possible to use it to cause the opponent to die in the seventh attack like『Dead End Rainbow』.

If it’s the former sword, it was to destroy the spiritual body at the seventh strike.

But, the sword given by Rimuru was frighteningly able to destroy even the astral body.

Originally it’s a legend class weapon, but it has been readjusted so Hinata able to use it.

(The one before can’t be compared with the performance of this one. Even I who lose my power can use it)

While slightly admiring it, Hinata was satisfied with the sword’s ability.

And then she narrowed her eyes and sent a cruel smile towards Reiner.

Right now, she already hit Reiner with five attacks.

It’s possible to kill him immediately in the next two attacks, but she thought it would be not interesting.

And, even in such situation this sword is useful.

「Well, let’s wrap it soon. I’m tired of seeing your unpleasant face.」

Telling Reiner so, Hinata raised her sword.

「Do-don’t underestimate me, you female fox! Th-there’s no way for me to be defeated by the likes of you!」

Reiner shouted with squeaky voice while he swung his sword.

「Don’t think I’ll be so kind and let you live because you’re a woman―― Become mincemeat! Violent Decapitating Slash Wave!」

The power of the high-speed rotation produced by Reiner’s trained body was transmitted through the sword, the target hit by the impact would be pulverized.

Surely, a person who receives it will be turned into pieces of meat, it was the strongest attack Reiner can bring out.

However――

「How naïve. It’s only of this level――」

Reiner’s attack slipped through Hinata who was sneering.

It was Hinata’s afterimage.

Blood rose to Reiner’s head as he fell to the beginner trick that Hinata used.

「Im-impossible!」

「Goodbye. Please die and taste the eternal suffering in these three minutes. Dead End Pain!!」

Reiner unwillingly tasted the true power of Hinata who he underestimated as a weak person.

Coupled with the surprise of his strongest attack missed, he was unable to react to Hinata’s attack.

Hinata’s blow accurately pierced through Reiner’s heart.

(Only this extent! With my『Body Recovery ex』, I can regenerate even a heart――

And then, I will no longer forgive this woman. I’ll kill you, you female fox!)

Reiner admonished himself for being careless and swore to seriously kill Hinata next time.

However ――

(Ha? What, why the pain…... ha?)

Reiner tried to activate his『Body Recovery ex』 to restore the wound he received, but the ability won’t active……

Not just that skill, even the effect of the skill of the body control series such as『Pain Sense Blockade』『Physical Condition Control』had also disappeared.

「Gugiyaooooooーーーーー」

Reiner was gasping and writhing in pain.

For a long time, Reiner didn’t feel pain due to the effect of『Pain Perception Blockade』, but now he felt intense fear and suffering.

That’s one of the abilities of Hinata’s weapon.

『Dead End Pain』 which activate at the time of the 6th attack.

After sealing off the enemy’s abilities, the effect of complete destruction of the spiritual body began after three minutes.

It was a frightening ability which wouldn’t let the enemy fell to madness and kill them while making them feel despair and pain.

The pain of their soul destroyed is not physical pain.

A person who received this attack might felt the three minutes as if it’s an eternity.

「Good night. Have a good dream.」

Hinata spoke gently like putting Reiner to sleep.

And then, Hinata gazes at Reiner who writhing in agony with a satisfied feeling.

(Oh well. The pain that I received, I had returned it back ten thousand times.)

Satisfied, Hinata loses her interest in Reiner.

The pain was not repaid back ten thousand times, but Hinata didn’t really care.

Anyway, the hopeless situation was averted.

That’s most important than anything else.

Rolling on the ground, Reiner was screaming.

However, no one tried to help him.

The soldiers who were instigated by Reiner and the prince were also unable to determine to correct action as they try to understand the situation.

With the appearance of Hero Masayuki who is the hero of the people, the public opinion had gone away from Reiner and co.

The prince’s confession was decisive.

Being the royal family’s guard is the duty of the Guard Knights, but there’s no reason for them to defend a regicide.

In this place, there’s no one who swore their loyalty to Prince Elrick.

At the same time, it’s obvious there’s no righteousness in their leader, Reiner.

「Wh-what we should do now……?」

The knights and soldiers were trembling.

Seeing everyone currently, as the chance has arrived, Masayuki stands up.

「Everyone! Which side is correct, and which side is wrong? I think it’s obvious if you look at this spectacle.

If all of you are wise, all of you will know the correct answer even if I don’t say it――

Please, I want you all to believe in that answer. I also want to believe in everyone!」

Actually, Masayuki still had hesitation.

The development was too fast, he didn’t catch up with the situation.

However, his instinct told him that this is the biggest chance to lead the people opinion.

So as not to be his own opinion, he decided to induce the people with provisional wording.

(It’s perfect. Like this, even if I make a mistake, I won’t be blamed.)

Masayuki was praising himself inside his mind.

「Ooh, Masayuki-sama is trusting us……」

「What have we done!」

「If we must to meet Masayuki-sama’s expectation――」

In response to Masayuki’s words, the knights threw away their sword and kneeled.

Their act shows that they have no hostility against Masayuki.

Seeing the knights like that, relieved mood begins to flow through the people.

And then――

「Hero-sama seem to have straightened out the problem……」

「The prince have the king――」

「But, luckily we have Hero Masayuki-sama!」

「The mastermind is the Knight Leader, Reiner.」

「That’s mean, Hinata-sama is……」

「But, it’s Masayuki-sama who see the truth and save Hinata-sama from the predicament!?」

「As expected from Hero-sama!」

In this way, naturally, Masayuki’s exploits had increased

It spread quickly among the people,

『MA~SAYUKII, MA~~SAYUKII!!』

It didn’t take a long time for it to be the usual grand cheering.

Masayuki raised one hand awkwardly to response the people while having stiff cheeks.

He had teary eyes inside his mind.

However, that was a usual occurrence too.

After waiting for the place to quiet down, Hinata walked to Masayuki.

And then she held out her right hand,

「I have been indebted to you.」

So, she requested a handshake from Masayuki.

Masayuki felt nervous as he looked at Hinata closely due to her beauty.

There were a lot of beautiful women in Tempest, but Hinata’s pretty face had a different peculiar charm from them.

Masayuki trying to respond Hinata’s request and panicky rubbing his hands.

But――

As Masayuki was charmed by Hinata, he tripped by a pebble and like a skilled mime he fallen down on his feet.

As the result…...

He felt a soft sensation on his right hand.

And he felt hair smoothly tickling his cheek……

A sweet smell that made his mind astray stimulates his nose.

(Wh-why it becomes like this……)

To the rest of the event, Masayuki can’t see the reality for a moment.

(Or rather, this feeling on my right hand, it’s like touching a finest quality cushion, it can’t be……)

That’s right.

Masayuki stumbled and just like that he pushed down Hinata.

Carefully, his right hand was groping Hinata’s plump breast.

Even to this extent, he’s a lucky pervert.

However, it was Masayuki who feared that the result will be frightening.

When Masayuki tried to stand up and making an excuse while his face turning pale ――

(Huh? What just now……)

Masayuki realized that something passed over his head.

He felt a shock as if something passed through the back of his head.

(Oh! From where did I get sniped!?)

However, it was somewhat different from Masayuki’s imagination.

Masayuki realized that it was the shockwave that arrived late, not the attack.

In other words, the attack passed with a little difference when Masayuki fell down.

If Masayuki didn’t get tripped by the pebble, his life would be gone.

「Tch. Impossible―― for you to evade my assassination!?」

A person appeared in front of Masayuki and co, raising his astonished voice.

A man who is dressed in black priest outfit, pure white wings sprouted from his back.

He’s the leader of the Executioners, Arios.

Masayuki was confused due to the appearance of an unfamiliar man. He’s not able to catch up with the situation completely.

However, Venom who was guarding Masayuki immediately responds to the situation.

「Well done, as expected from Masayuki. I have been vigilant, but sorry!

I couldn’t grasp any presence of that guy at all. Masayuki, you noticed him well.」

Saying those words, Venom came in front of Masayuki.

Without noticing that Masayuki who heard it was turning pale.

In fact, Venom was always scanning for any presences while guarding Masayuki.

It didn’t mean he let down his vigilant, but he couldn’t catch the enemy’s presence at all. In other words, the man in front of him was a very dangerous person.

「I don’t know what your purpose it, but if you want to lay your hand on Masayuki, I’ll be your opponent. It’s alright, Masayuki?」

「Eh? Ah, yes――」

Masayuki nods instinctively.

In the first place, Masayuki thinks that’s unreasonable for him to fight the enemy.

If Venom wanted to take his place, there’s no reason for him to refuse.

And, to Masyuki who was still confused, he heard reliable voices.

「Masayuki an-chan, we also here! We will show growth here!」

「If Masayuki-san watching, we can be relieved too!」

「Onii-chan, please see Alice and co’s efforts!」

Masayuki worried about how to reply to the children.

He was wondering of letting the children to fight in this trip.

(But, the children are actually stronger than me…… It can’t be helped right!)

In the end, he decided to approve them.

「Well, how long do you intend to groping my chest?」

Masayuki jumped back panicking at that word.

「I-I’m sorry. It-it’s not on purpose……」

Masayuki can’t make a good excuse, but his word is interrupted by Hinata.

「I understand. On the contrary, I want to thank you. That man was aiming at me right?」

That said, Hinata was thanking Masayuki.

(Well, I didn’t aim for it …… I feeling relieved of what happened though…..)

He wanted to say that, but Masayuki felt that destruction was waiting for him if he said it, he had no choice but to kept silent.

Actually, Arios’ target was Hinata.

The reason was one.

It was because Yuuki used to be worried about Hinata before.

Although she was not special existence anymore, he was still anxious.

He thought he should deal with her quickly as she was not a person worthy enough for him to kill.

However, as he knew Reiner and co’s plan, he tried to assassinate Hinata during the gap.

Velda declared that don’t aim at the royal capital, he didn’t want to interfere as much as possible but――

Reiner failed.

Therefore, he thought that he would assassinate her in an instant and immediately withdraw.

However, He failed.

Masayuki’s luck had thwarted the timing of Arios’s plan.

「It’s can’t be helped for things to be like this. Sadly, I’ll have everyone dead!」

「Shut up! I’m strong, you know? We have Masayuki here too!」

Venom responded to Arios’ statement fearlessly.

And so, the fight started quietly.





Chapter 223: Royal Capital Disturbance -Evacuation-


Behind Venom who was fighting Arios, were the children who were also holding their weapons up with Kenya as their lead.

Venom without being roused up, started attacking Arios without worrying about the children

Naturally moving as if he was walking, he rushed at Arios like a cannonball ignoring gravity and inertia.

And he reached the maximum speed immediately not giving time for Arios to prepare.

「Doom Enemy[1]!!」

The claws on Venom’s hands grew longer and dyed in black

And while releasing “Wave of Division”, he approached Arios.

However――

「――how naïve.」

Before anyone was aware, Arios was gripping a sword and swung it.

His sword shone like it was releasing radiance and cut off Venom’s claws with extreme speed.

Arios’ expression didn’t change as if it’s a natural result.

He looked at Venom just like looking at a bug.

Such condescending behavior was that of an overwhelming powerful person to those who was weaker.

However, his expression was distorted due to unexpected situation. Pain ran through Arios’ arm.

「Hahaa, serve you right~! Luckily, two of it stuck in right?」

Venom pointed it out and sprouting a smile.

As what Venom said, two claws had stuck in Arios’ arm.

「You bastard, is this your aim from the start?」

「Nope, it isn’t like that. I thought I’d kill you by the first strike.

However, I thought that even if you grazed by one would be good. Well. I’m so lucky again today.」

「You jester―― I will no longer hold back then.」

「Stupid~! Fighting without holding back from the beginning, such a thing should be the basic you know!」

Towards Arios who was dyed with anger, Venom was thoughtfully cheerful.

However, in contrast to his attitude, there’s no gap in his stance. With his cut claws already regenerated, Venom’s consciousness focused on Arios.

That’s natural.

From the exchange just now, Venom was convinced that Arios was an overwhelmingly powerful person.

(Hee! As I expected, there’s something that I can’t perceive even inside of where my surveillance are.

Certainly, he’s higher ranking than me……

But, it’s not because he’s fast that I can’t see his movement.

That means that it was due to his ability that I can’t detect him from the start, I’m sure my thinking isn’t wrong――

He’s stronger than me, no doubt about it, but it’s not like I can’t win.

In that case, it’s so convenient. I will kill this guy and take that power!)

While fighting, Venom felt laughter almost spilled out from his mouth.

Even if he defeats low ranking enemies, he can’t obtain more power.

Therefore, he thought this time was a chance for him. It’s a chance for him to defeat a high ranked enemy and obtained more power.

(I’m lucky. Masayuki is here, this guy will become a high-quality food for me!)

If Arios’ strength is comparable to the high ranking people of Rimuru’s closest aides――That’s on Diablo’s class―― and if Arios has an isolation ability, Venom would have no chance to win.

But, Venom noticed that Arios has no such ability.

Now that Venom was able to percept Arios’ movement, it probably meant that he couldn’t use that ability.

Arios was not an unreachable existence, Venom concluded so.

Currently, Masayuki’s ability had increased Venom’s luck.

It also exerted another effect on Venom, his strength increased unbelievably.

He can evade an inevitable attack for some reason, and attack that unlikely to hit was able to hit.

The evidence was the two poison claws stuck on Arios before.

In this lucky state, he believes that poison that shouldn’t work will have an effect.

If that’s so, there’s no need to hesitate.

Venom believed in himself and Masayuki, and was going to challenge Arios who’s stronger.

Masayuki stands with his arms folded while watching Venom’s fight.

Honestly, rather than looking at it, he can understand the fight to some extent from the sparks that occurs once in a while.

It’s not a speed that can be followed by eyes, Masayuki’s just pretending that he’s watching.

(Or rather, I can’t do anything like that you know.)

Because it’s no longer inside his area of understanding, the feeling of fear has weakened.

Since Masayuki decided to entrust the fight completely to Venom, Masayuki thinks about what’s going to happen later.

The most important thing for Masayuki is his own safety.

The children seem to wait for their chance to take part in the fight, and eagerly watching the fight between Venom and Arios.

Turning his gaze to the children, Masayuki ponders.

(They are stronger than me. If that’s so, I think it would be safer together……

Or rather, why are they here?)

Masayuki finally feels the doubt about it.

When Masayuki comes to the capital, the children had already saved Hinata from the crisis.

Masayuki appeared at a good timing, in a favorable place, but he never aimed for that.

It just happened that the timing match with his arrival with his companions by Venom’s transfer magic.

It wasn’t like they had acted together till then.

「Hey, Kenya! Why are you guys here?」

Although it’s too late, Masayuki asks Kenya.

Masayuki’s behavior was too natural, like not thinking about the fight――Although saying that he’s ignoring as he can’t see the fight won’t be wrong――in the people’s eyes, but he didn’t notice it.

He felt he needs to ask the question for his safety later on.

He wanted to withdraw from this dangerous place quickly, but he thought that he needs a reason for that.

「Ah, An-chan[2]. Actually, Alice is――」

「Uhhh, with my ability『Perceiver (Space Wiseman)[3]』, I somehow know that danger is approaching Hinata Onee-chan!」

「Because Alice makes a racket, we somehow do it……」

「For that reason, we came to help Hinata-san.」

「We got stronger thanks to Hakurou-shishou and Agera-Shishou’s training you know!

Right now we might not lose to Masayuki An-chan!」

So, the children answer Masayuki’s question together.

(What are they saying…… From the start, they were stronger you know……)

While thinking so, Masayuki consents with “I see”.

「I see, I didn’t think that you guys would be here.」

「We too, we didn’t think that An-chan would come.」

「Yes. But, if you didn’t come Hinata Onee-chan might have been killed…… Onii-chan, thank you!」

「Eh!? Ah, I guess so. Well, no need to worry if I’m here.」

Masayuki feels the sweats flowing on his back increased to the unexpected overestimation.

Aside from that……

Apparently, Masayuki concludes that the enemy’s aim certainly to be Hinata.

(Well, what should I do? The enemy is aiming for Hinata-san, but I’m near her so I would be in danger too……)

Masayuki thought so, but the children said that they came here to protect Hinata.

He’d like to run away with transfer magic but Venom is fighting, it was difficult to run away from this place.

Although the enemy seems not going to interfere with the city and the citizens, the damage seemed to be massive due to stray attacks.

While thinking so, Masayuki draws a conclusion that the safest place is next to Hinata who the children will protect.

「Alright, then I’ll be next to Hinata-san. Because I’ll protect you in case of something up.」

Standing naturally next to Hinata, Masayuki spoke without any hesitation.

But, that’s not the only reason.

Masayuki had something he wants to protect above all else.

The warmth left in his right hand ―― that’s right, the memory of the warmth and softness of Hinata’s breast.

(Losing such wonderful things, I will never allow it!)

With Masayuki’s intense determination, the effect of his ability increased to the maximum.

――While it’s a Unique Skill, it’s enough to reach the truth of the world.

As the result, the space called Lucky Field[4] which gives tremendous blessing to people Masayuki considers as ally expanded, that’s unintended by Masayuki.

「Hmm, as expected that angel-like guy is beyond my capabilities….. I can barely follow the movements.

Compared to that, your friend is amazing. He can somehow fight against that guy……

Truly amazing……」

Hinata nods to Masayuki’s word.

And then she continues,

「Well then, let’s us do the thing that we can do now.

I think that will be helping the people escape from this place.

Nicholas, we will spread defense barrier in this place!

Sealing the aftereffect of that fight, it will become the people’s shield!」

She shouts with vigor.

Based on that Girl’s belief, Hinata started to do what can be done now.

She doesn’t think of an outrageous thing such as she wanted to save everyone, but helping people that need help in front of her ―― that’s the way Hinata lived.

That’s the thing that led to confidence, Hinata understood that well.

「With pleasure!」

「Understood, Hinata-sama.」

‌「Leave it to me!」

Responding to her are Nicholas, Leonard and Fritz.

Following Hinata’s orders, the three ran to three sides. And then, a square with Hinata as the top is formed.

And so, with 4 holy knight class people, the defense barrier was spread.

Holy Field will be effective if the enemy is a monster, but this time there’s Venom here and the enemy has the appearance of an angel.

If they’re carelessly put holy attribute barrier, it will be a hindrance instead.

With that in mind, they chose Material Shield (Holy and Magic Defense Barrier).

It was a barrier with the purpose to block explosion impact, heat etc, that’s all elements.

Thus, Hinata plans to temporarily earn some time for the people to escape.

In align with Hinata’s action,

「Hinata onee-chan! We’ll also help!」

Alice said so and synchronized the effect of Space Barrier of Unique Skill『Perceiver』 with Hinata and co’s barrier.

As the result, the Material Shield deployed by Hinata and co was reinforced greatly.

Looking at that, Gale went out ahead.

「Well, I think my Unique Skill『Cultivator (Reclamator)[5]』will be useful!」

Gale’s Unique Skill『Cultivator』was originally an ability suitable for agriculture, but depending on how to use it, it was an excellent ability with various applications.

Interfering with the earth, Gale covers the plaza on the people side with soils that turned hard.

Gale synchronized with the spirit of earth, on that moment a protective wall as strong as steel was completed.

A wall instantly appeared in front of the people. Naturally, the people were shaken.

After Gale are Kenya and Ryouta.

「Alrighty! We will knock down that guy.

My eyes have gradually accustomed and become able to see that guy’s movement.

I don’t think Masayuki An-chan’s turn will come!」

「We’re also quite trained.

However, it’s reassuring that Masayuki-san is watching us!」

Saying such words, Kenya and Ryouta participated in the fight.

「Ah. When it’s dangerous, I’ll protect you both!」

Kenya and Ryouta replied with a nod.

(I never decided so though.)

So Masayuki thought.

As it becomes like this, Masayuki has no other choice but to believe that Venom and the children will defeat the enemy.

It’s a miscalculation for Masayuki that Kenya and Ryouta participated in the fight.

He thought that they will keep protecting Hinata.

However, the cornerstone of the defense, that’s Gale and Alice are still here.

Hinata and co’s barrier seems to have been reinforced, although it’s not going as Masayuki has planned originally, his safety is secured for the time being.

(Hmm. Like this, it would be better not to make an unnecessary move.)

Masayuki made a decision and decided to deal with the remaining trouble quickly.

That’s the gaze of the people around the place.

Because Masayuki is Masayuki, he wants the people to go somewhere quickly.

「Everyone, please calm down and leave the plaza! If there’s a place where you can take refuge in――」

Masayuki is trying to keep the people away while showing his cool side to Hinata.

His plan is one.

When the situation turns worst, he will run away.

He thought that to make it easy for him to escape at any times, having fewer people here is better.

However, the people received his words in another meaning.

「Hero-sama, he is worried about us……」

「Idiot, it’s different! We are in his way. If he’s fighting seriously, we’ll get involved!」

「Is that so? So that’s why he let the small apprentices fight……」

「That’s right. If Masayuki-sama himself fights, there’s no doubt he’ll win.

But then, we will get hurt too!」

「We’re hindrances to him!?」

Well, like that.

Naturally, they misunderstood Masayuki’s true motive.

「Everyone, please run to the royal castle. There’s a large-scale barrier set up in that place.

Although the angel’s army will come to attack it, it will take time for the barrier to break.

In order to let Hero-dono to fight freely, a smooth evacuation will be better――」

A man suggested so towards the people who try to flee from the plaza.

That man is Prince Elrick who confessed his own crime.

His face is like someone who had been released from evil spirit’s grasp, his eyes are of a person who prepared and decide to accept anything.

「Prince――」

Even the knights are surprised for a moment.

「Everyone! Did you hear it? Please move calmly, there’s enough space for everyone in the castle.

So there’s no one injured by panic, please leave this place calmly.

Leave the rest to Hero-sama!」

One of the knights issued instructions to the people with a large voice.

And then that knight ordered to the soldiers who were bewildered by the turn of the events to guide the populace and prepare to receive them in the castle.

Apparently, the man was the Knight Order’s vice leader, receiving the order the knights promptly started to move.

Attached to them, the soldiers also began to move.

People began moving like water from the plaza.

“We need to evacuate quickly so Masayuki-sama will be able to actively taking part in the fight” with that in their hearts.

Thus, there were only a few people left in this place.

* * *

[1] 滅殺分断破(ドゥームエネミー) Messatsu Bundan Ha (Dūmu enemī), the kanji means Annihilating Dividing Crush/Tear.

[2] It’s a contraction from Ani (Elder brother). Just like Aniki.

[3] 空識者(キヅクモノ) Sora/Kuu Shikisha (Kidzuku mono), the kanji 空 can means Sky, Void, Empty, Space, Shikisha= Well-informed person, Wise man. Kidzuku= to Notice, to recognize, to perceive. Mono= person, so the one who perceive/Notice= Perceiver.

[4] 幸運領域(ラッキーフィールド) Kouun Ryouki (Rakkī fīrudo), Lucky/Fortune Domain.

[5] 造成者(タガヤスモノ) Zouseisha (Tagayasu mono), Someone who reclaim/clear/prepare field/land. Tagayasu= To till/plow/cultivate = The one who till/plow/cultivate land = Cultivator. Feel free to suggest better name.





Chapter 224: Royal Capital Disturbance -Defeat-


Venom and Arios’ fight continued in the plaza outside the church.

The outlook was bad for Venom.

The difference in their strength can’t be covered with just luck, but it could be said that he’d been fighting pretty well.

(Tch! As I expected, this is hard.)

Venom thought so while regenerating the left arm that had been cut.

At this rate, his defeat was just a matter of time.

It hadn’t been three minutes since the fight started.

However, he could sense that the people had begun evacuating from the place, Venom guessed that Masayuki had conducted it well.

He buying some time seemed to be turning out well.

(Well now. To defeat this guy, my power is definitely not enough. If there’s some kind of chance ――）

Even though he knew that the situation is getting worse gradually, he has no other choice but to continue with the intense offense and defense.

In order to break from this situation, Venom needs to think of a plan――

「We’re late, but we’ll help!」

「I will try my best not to hold you down!」

The arrival of Kenya and Ryouta changed the situation.

「You kids, I don’t want to be hated by Agera, so don’t die!」

Venom shouted while dealing with Arios’ attack.

To be honest, Venom was irritated of the idea of borrowing the children’s power.

However, his defeat is just a matter of time, so it’s not the time to complain.

(Both of them are strong! Well, I will use them.)

That was what Venom really thinks.

「I get it! Shishou has said it many times.」

「Yea. If we died here without his permission, Shishou would probably kill you……」

The two said so.

And then,

「For that reason, let’s go all out!」

「Kenya, we’re using that?」

「Yeah! Spiritual Armament・Reforged―― Activate!」

Glittering lights wrapped both Kenya and Ryouta.

And then, the arms they got from Rimuru were worn on their body.

It was the armor that Rimuru made with Hinata’s spiritual armaments as the reference.

Its performance is better than the unique class spiritual armament used by the holy knight, but it hasn’t reach legend class.

However, it could be said that the arms will grow according to the growth of the person who wearing it, it’s the newest product that should be called as Advanced Weapon (Evolving Type Arms).

Above all else, the equipment has good compatibility with the children who integrated with spirit in their body.

Although Rimuru had experimented and made a lot as a hobby and it will go wasteful lying around, such is the reason why he gave it to the children……

He would never imagine that it would be useful in this place.

Arios seemed to perceive the danger, as there was a slight impatience in his expressionless face.

So does Venom.

(Heh, those kids…… they have almost the same energy amount as me!?

I thought they might be strong, but to be this extent……)

Venom was amazed.

In fact, Ryouta is about half of Venom’s. As for Kenya, Venom felt the energy is almost equal to his.

Their skill is trained by Agera.

Venom finds a good chance to win with the reinforcement that stronger than he thought.

And so the fight will be fiercer.

While watching the children’s participation, Hinata muttered.

「It can’t be, spiritual armaments……? That is the church’s secret arms that can’t be used by holy knight unless they were loved by the spirits ―― for it to be easily mass produced, as expected from the abnormal Demon Lord Rimuru……」

Her impression was mixed with surprise and admiration.

Everyone from the church have a similar expression with Hinata.

Apart from Nicholas who is a magician, Leonard and Fritz were lost for words.

Naturally, it’s because looking at 12 or 13 years old children showing more fighting power than a holy knight.

Above all else ――

「Moreover, Elemental Knight (Spirit Knight), is it?

My master, Izawa Shizue had talked about―― the ultimate fusion form of human and spirit.

Neither Shizu-san nor I can reach it, the strongest knight.

――is that the appearances of those with Hero’s Egg hatched?」

「Surpassing the holy knight, humanity’s strongest knight―― the Elemental Knight…..」

「Well done Masayuki-dono, you trained those children splendidly!」

「Ehh!? A, ah. Rather than my training, I’d said it’s those children’s power……」

When such topic suddenly brought up, Masayuki hurriedly denied it.

(What I taught to them is just special move poses I saw in manga! How can it be called as a training!?)

Masayuki denied it while being tired with the same flow of event.

「Hahaha, don’t be so humble! Even if you didn’t say it, everyone knows it!」

Saying anything is useless, so it’s reflected in his companions’ faces as Masayuki trying to hiding his embarrassment.

And, the same excitement runs through those who heard the conversation, quickly hope rises inside them.

To Hero Masayuki’s companions.

To the people who evacuating.

To the knights and soldiers who guide the populace.

「Do you hear it? They seem to be stronger than Hinata-sama who is the strongest holy knight!」

「Hero? Are those children Hero too?」

「They are Hero Masayuki’s apprentice….. So a Hero’s apprentice is also a Hero――」

「Then there’s no need to be scared of just a single angel right?」

「What, it’s not a big deal, right?」

「Stupid! That’s wrong. Hero Masayuki-sama is amazing you know!」

「I see, that’s right. As expected of Masayuki-sama!」

And so, like this, the people’s anxiety dissolved with great speed.

As a result, the people who were trembling and agitated have calmed down, and so they continued the evacuation smoothly without problem.

Masayuki learnt that anything he says is useless.

(That’s enough, if with that…… if with that everyone’s anxiety gone, I’m fine with it!)

Afterwards, Masayuki concludes that his task is to stand up with confidence face, and so he takes the stance to watching the fight attentively.

For this reason, there’s something only Masayuki noticed.

(Eh? Wasn’t Kenya’s group is a party of five?)

So, one of them is missing from the group.

(They are Kenya, Ryouta, Gale, Alice. Eh? Who’s the other one? Umm, maybe I’m mistaken. I only know 4 people.)

Although he has notice it with great effort, Masayuki concluded that it’s just misunderstanding.

Because they children influenced by Masayuki were only four people, that was the truth in a certain way.

Masayuki quickly switches his thought and prayed for Venom’s victory.

And so, about the fight――

Venom was in one-side defensive fight until the situation changed completely with the children’s participation.

Venom creating a gap in Arios’ defense which then Kenya attacks.

It became a coordinated attack.

The secret was『Telepathy』.

Venom allocated some of his computing process and enabled『Telepathy』with the children.

With this, it’s possible for them to communicate with super high speed thought.

While the three are fighting, they were in a conference at the same time.

『Listen kids. You guys can fight somewhat, but you guys are still weak.

Therefore, don’t overconfident with your power, do only what you can do.』

『Roger that!』

『Understood!』

Kenya and Ryouta delightedly answers, Venom begins to instruct the strategy.

『Ryouta, you’ll be our defense.

We’re lucky that your attributes are water and wind.

While healing me and Kenya when we are injured with water attribute, devote yourself in defense with help of wind attribute.

Listen, the strategy is messed up if you’re injured. Be careful!』

『Yes!』

『I’ll be attacking with the assumption of getting injured . I’m expecting your healing.

However, healing magic of holy system which will damage a demon is no good. I’ll kill you if you making a mistake!』

『Don’t, don’t worry. I’ve studied, I’ll not make a mistake!』

『Alright! But, prioritize your own safety. Don’t make a mistake, okay?』

『Okay!』

The key of the strategy was Ryouta’s healing.

Like this, Venom doesn’t need to worry about healing himself as he’s keep on attack.

Well, even if Ryouta failed, Venom thought that he will manage somehow due to Masayuki’s luck.

It’s because he can’t win against Arios unless he takes a drastic strategy.

Next, Venom instructs Kenya.

『Kenya, you will focus on offensive.

Although there’s healing from Ryouta, I want the healing to be focused on me.

So, I want you to use your strongest attack at the time that it will surely hit.

Get it? No need to do the impossible.

If you get inured too much, Ryouta’s healing won’t catch up.

Because I will desperately seal that guy’s movement, you must think a way to make him accumulate damage without panicking.』

『I get it! In short, Venom-san will be the Tank, right?』

Venom nods to Kenya’s question.

He often heard the term during the training in the labyrinth, Tank is a vanguard who tanking vigorous attacks of melee type monster single handedly.

Judging that Kenya has understood the strategy, Venom continued his explanation.

『Exactly. So, listen! That guy seemed to be a former human, he still relying on his eyes when fighting.

That is his weakness, understand?』

『Yes! We had been taught by Hakurou-Shishou and Agera-Shishou.

Or rather, when I rely too much on my eyes, my eyes got crushed you know? That’s a common sense!』

Venom nods to those words.

Using Full Potion, any body part loss can be recovered.

With such reasoning, Hakurou and Agera seemed to have calmly crushed the clueless children’s eyes and trained them.

(Those two, they are Demon……)

Kenya and co seems to accept the training without a problem.

“They have become stronger…..” So Venom convinced inside his mind.

『Alright, it’s good if you two understand it.

That guy didn’t lose his habits from when he was a human, he’s unconsciously protecting his eyes and important organs.

We use that against him and attack.

However! Pay attention to his sword.

Defending against it is pointless, don’t think of stopping the sword with a weapon』

『Understood! It feels more dangerous than Zegion-san’s『Absolute Severance』.』

Venom smiles and laughs when he heard Kenya’s response.

In fact, the power of Arios’ sword was above Zegion’s『Absolute Severance』.

Although, even if both are same in the point that you can’t defend against it, Venom thought that Zegion’s ability that doesn’t need to rely on a medium like a sword to be more troublesome.

In any case, Venom can only praise Kenya for being able to see accurately the opponent’s strength.

As expected from Hakurou and Agera’s training, Venom raised his valuation of Kenya.

And so, confident with the success of the strategy, he’s fired up to put it into practice.

『Alright! Well, you guys don’t be unreasonable okay. Well then, Game Start!』

Through such exchanges, the fight against Arios begun.

With Ryouta as support, Venom attacks Arios with everything he got in order to breakthrough his defense, Kenya then attacks Arios in the gaps.

Arios who receiving the attacks, shown a bit agitation on his face, but he immediately dealt with it calmly as he didn’t get any fatal wound.

Although, by unconsciously evading attacks that he doesn’t need to evade as Arios is a spiritual life-form, he didn’t notice that he receives attacks that shouldn’t hit.

Arios fell completely into Venom’s plan.

There were reasons why Arios didn’t notice Venom’s plan.

The first one is he should have already defeated the opponent who is lower-rank than him normally, which make him feels irritated.

But the problem was that his original power was sealed.

By Velda’s order, he was forbidden to attack the downtown area.

For Arios who violated the order and acted individually, violating the order more than this is taboo.

Therefore, he was restricted in using his Ultimate Skill『Weapon Lord (Sword Weapon)』.

As Venom and co felt, if Arios unleash the sword’s power, he can release “Severance Wave” which cut everything.

However, the power is too big and it will affect the city as well.

Arios was placed in a situation where he could do nothing but to fight Venom and co with such restriction.

This was all due to the effect of the『Lucky Field』 created by Masayuki.

Arios who looking down on his lower-ranked opponent, but unaware he was caught in a dilemma.

(It can’t be, for these annoying people…… They’re standing in front of me with their half-baked ability――)

While being annoyed, only time will passes as he will not receive any decisive attack.

Getting impatient about that, Arios didn’t notice that he gradually losing his calmness.

If he was calm, he would give up on killing Hinata and quickly withdraw.

However, Arios didn’t make such option.

It was like his thought disturbed and can’t make clear decision.

As a result――

「Now! Finish off this guy together with me!」

So Venom shouted.

Arios’ sword which pierced Venom’s stomach can’t be pulled out as it had been ensnared by Venom’s magic power.

He has no problem erasing the sword once, but he will receive Kenya’s attack directly in that case――

「Kenya, leave Venom-san ‘s healing to me!」

「Uoooooooohーーーーー！Unlimited・Justice Bringer[1]!!」

A single flash.

Arios whose decision gets derailed by hesitation for a moment receives a direct hit from Kenya’s strongest attack.

Even Venom who suppressing Arios, was cut in two by the terrifying sword attack.

Kenya’s enhanced spiritual power could exceed the limit for a brief moment. That’s because the divine protection of spirit of light which fused with Kenya ――

Worthy as a future Hero, he reached the level where he can destroy even an awakened demon lord.

In other words……

「Im, impossible――」

With those as his last words, Arios was swallowed by the torrent of light and disappeared.

“They did it!” That’s Masayuki’s impression.

Kenya’s technique was amazing, but his pose of accumulating power closely resembled the special move from manga that Masayuki taught.

(Ehh!? That becomes a really amazing power――）

Although he was dumbfounded by many things, he can only accept the reality.

「Yes, as I expected. Kenya, you seem to have mastered the technique I taught you perfectly!」

Masayuki praised Kenya with a refreshing smile ――His inner thoughts aside――

「Masayuki an-chan, did you see it? I did it!」

Masayuki nodded to Kenya who smiling.

Cheers of the people who were delayed in evacuation began reverberating, announcing the end of the fight.

(Like this, Kenya might stand out as a Hero more than me from now, I think it’s a good thing!)

While thinking it’s convenient for him and sprouted a smile, Masayuki didn’t notice that his smiling face charmed everyone.

Meanwhile.

「Hey, please heal me quickly!」

Despite being cut in two, Venom seems to have escaped from the torrent of light somehow and making a fuss.

Ryouta, Alice, Hinata and also Nicholas came running, everyone use healing magic and so Venom regenerated without problem.

「Of course! Self-sacrificing myself, it doesn’t suit me at all!」

Venom hiding his embarrassment while saying such thing.

However, Venom has secretly obtained the source of Ultimate Skill『Weapon Lord (Sword Weapon) 』as he shrewdly stole Arios’ energy.

It was exactly as Venom‘s calculation.

Normally it’s a strategy with low chances to succeed when put into action, but his decision that it was worth to try it was correct thanks to Masayuki’s presence.

Venom wins the gamble and obtained more power.

When Venom was healed and things calmed down.

「Huh? Where is Kuu-chan?」

Ryouta looked around and asked such question.

Noticing the same thing, Kenya also searching the surroundings restlessly.

「Ah, Kuu-chan is gone. She goes out as she pleases again……」

「Kuu-chan liked unusual things after all!」

Gale and Alice let out a sigh, they answered like they gave up on the matter.

「Again? It can’t be helped then…… Since we slipped out to come here, it would be bad if she doesn’t return soon though……」

Kenya’s worry is not about the person called Kuu-chan who seems to be their companion, it was towards the fact that if they didn’t return quickly, their absent would be found out and get scolded.

「Who is Kuu-chan?」

To Masayuki’s question, the children answer all together『A friend!』.

“Ah, they’re a group of five from the start after all.’ While thinking so, Masayuki stopped thinking any more by understanding that it was another child he didn’t know.

There’s no need to be worried now as the enemy is beaten.

The children start to search for their friend in order to return back quickly.

And so, Masayuki and co was busy with the clean up afterwards in order to eliminate the anxiety from the people of royal capital as they originally intended.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

In the sky over the royal capital of Ingrassia Kingdom.

‘Damn it!’ while shouting so, Arios spits out a rough breath.

Arios managed to escape from the worst situation thanks to『Duplicate Body』 that he prepared just in case.

(It’s not time to get flustered. If I’m thinking calmly, I can grasp that the enemy’s fighting strength is significant.

That brat has such much power. But, knowing it now there’s――）

However――

「Fumufumu. As expected, everyone think alike. It’s as Rimuru-sama says.[2]」

Arios’ thought was interrupted as he heard an innocent child’s voice.

To not get noticed by Arios who specialized in stealth, “who the hell is this person!?’ with that in his mind, Arios turns around in astonishment.

A young girl with black hair was standing there.

No, it was not a young girl.

It was a very bewitching and beautiful woman which makes him wonder why he mistakenly saw her as a young girl for some reason.

Her beautiful mix of silver and gold long hair flowed gently down her back.

Staring into her eyes, Arios was shocked to the extent that he couldn’t breathe.

「I’m Kumara.[3]

Lord of the mythical beasts, the faithful servant of the Great Demon Lord Rimuru-sama.

“Chimeric Lord” Kumara, it’s I.

Well now, the introduction is over, it’s time for farewell.」

Having said those words, Kumara sprouted a charming smile.

「Don’t underestimate me! I don’t care who you are.

This place is far from the city area. Do you know what it means?

It means that in this place I――」

「So noisy. Please be silent!」

Without time for Arios to react――

His neck is in Kumara’s hand.

Kumara’s expression is like she was disappointed.

And then, a sad expression showed on her face……

「I never think that you[4] would be weak like this.

This is due to Venom’s efforts, but how disappointing.」

Kumaru lets out a listless sigh while saying so.

She wants to do great works and get praised by Rimuru, but it can’t be helped as there was almost no turn for her.

What is more problematic than that…..

「Now, I wonder what excuse I’d said to those children……」

How will she explain to the children? That’s what occupying her head.

And then, she returned to her child form again and flew towards the royal capital while worrying.

* * *

[1] 限界突破(アンリミテッド)・正義執行希望斬(ジャスティスブリンガー). Genkai Toppa (Anlimiteddo)・Seigi Shikkou Kibou Zan (Jasutisu Buringaa). The first set of kanji is for Limit Break, the second is for Justice Enforcement Hope Slash.

[2] Kumara talks with de arinsu at the end. It’s a variation of desu like de arimasu de gozaru and so on. Shalltear use de arinsu too

[3] Kumara use Watchi to refer herself. Archaic form of I used in the past by Geisha and Oiran during Edo period.

[4] Kumara use ぬし様 Nushi-sama from おぬし Onushi which is archaic form for you. Pretty much Kumara talks in a polite way.





Chapter 225: Intersected Checkmate


Velda surveyed the situation of the war in various places expressionlessly.

The results are unsatisfactory.

Or rather, it was so disastrous that it may be said to be a total defeat.

In the battle in Milim’s territory, the angels are being expelled as Vega was defeated.

Although it was a large army numbered 200.000 angels, it was a disastrous scene as there were only 10.000 or so remaining as the result of being absorbed by Vega or annihilated by Karion.

Overwhelmed to the point of annihilated.

Victory on this battlefield couldn’t be expected anymore.

Looking at “El Dorado”, the place ruled by Leon, the stalemate continues as there’s no one commanding the angels and the city barrier can’t be broken.

Although he couldn’t see the situation inside the isolated castle by a barrier which disconnected it from the space, Velda knew that Kagali was already defeated.

He gave『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』to Kagali’s subordinate called Footman, but it would aim both sides that are inside the place.

The fact that the barrier remains standing means the fight still continues…… but Velda felt an uncomfortable feeling.

The decisive one was Dagruel’s defeat who attacking Holy Empire Ruberios where Ruminas lives in hiding.

Dagruel who is the strongest among the Four Fiends of Heavenly Commanders, his defeat as one who boasts combat capability next to him is something that Velda couldn’t ignore.

The giants of the Chain of Restrain Titan army seemed to stop moving and accept defeat.

(It can’t be, for Veldora to win against Dagruel……

Even when I check the combat data with Velgrind, I can’t find any winning factors――）

It’s vexing, but it was outside his imagination that Veldora won against Dagruel.

「I’m very sorry. In my calculation, for the Four Fiends of Heavenly Commanders, that’s Vega, Kagali and even Dagruel to be defeated is――」

Velda raises his hand to stop Lucia who starts apologizing.

「Oh well. Even in my calculation too, Dagruel’s defeat was not expected.

The question is how to do the next move.」

Dino who’s attacking Demon Lord Rimuru’s headquarters is still alive.

Most of the war potentials were concentrated on this place, but it was because Dino is the one with the most passive combat capability.

As for Milim’s territory, there’s no problem to leave it alone.

Because Demon Lord Milim who was the most important issue had been obtained.

He can ignore Leon’s “El Dorado” too.

As for the reason of the attack in the first place was because he allowed Kazarim’s selfishness who showed an obsession towards Leon, it doesn’t mean that it’s an important place.

As for protecting the Heaven Gate and also cutting the source of the people’s faith, it was important to destroy Holy Empire Ruberios……

The hope of the Western Countries’ people was lost by telling them the annihilation of Demon Lord Rimuru.

In addition to this, if he destroys the headquarters of the Western Holy Church, the people who are resisting would give up in despair.

But ――

(The presences of Veldora and resistance forces in various places keep giving hop to the people.)

That was Velda’s analysis

Even for the Holy Church, it’s only one of them.

It seems that the network between the countries is beyond what he imagined and can’t be looked down.

Velda felt ironic as it was Kagurazaka Yuuki, his host, who created the organization specialized even in information transmission, that’s Freedom Association.

(It won’t be interesting if it’s not like this. Everything would end immediately once I go out, let’s have them resist as much as they want.)

It was more fun than he thought, Velda was satisfied. Next, “Well then, what would they do?” he thought.

In front of him is Lucia.

On her right side is Milim.

Kneeling down below him were the last two of the Executioners, Zero and Mai.

They are his remaining war potentials.

He intends to defeat every one of the Demon Lords and in reverse blame it on Demon Lord Rimuru’s subordinates.

In territorial strategy, it could be said to be his complete defeat. However, the enemy’s “King” that is Demon Lord Rimuru has already been destroyed.

There’s no need to panic so Velda thought.

Above everything else, his true and important goal is to defeat Guy Crimson and Chloe O’Bell who have the possibility to be equal to him.

In fact, if he destroys the strongest people in this world, it would be easy to purge the remaining forces.

Currently, Guy is fighting against Chloe. Also, Velgrind is fighting against Velzard.

Chloe would be free once she defeats Guy, but she wouldn’t be able to point her sword at Velda due to the restriction. However, just in case, he ought to kill her together with Guy.

As long those two perish, it might be possible to persuade Velgrind.

Thinking so, Velda makes Lucia states her opinion.

「It’s about time for Demon Lord Guy Crimson and even the True Hero Chloe O’Bell to be exhausted.

We should send all of our war potential and kill both of them.」

Lucia answered so without hesitation.

Satisfied with her answer, Velda stands up.

「Good! Then, I will give new power to Zero. With this, go to Guy’s place――」

Before he finishes talking, Velda stopped moving.

(Wait…… isn’t they are too easy to be read?

The calculation derived by Lucia is also worrisome as everything ended up with failure.

――Although Demon Lord Rimuru was killed, why there’s no hesitation in that guy’s subordinates’ movement?

Also, Veldora’s action is……

No way, he’s still alive?

If that’s the case, he knew that I’ll be aiming at Guy and the other.

Then…... what I should target at, is Tempest?)

It’s completely unexpected from Lucia who is the strongest Manas.

Although she doesn’t possess Ultimate Skill『Wisdom Lord Raphael』, Lucia’s intellect is very high.

And yet, the result was too unnatural.

「A change of plan. Attack the Monster Country Tempest. Zero, assemble all remaining troops and join Dino.

I’ll give you this, Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』, it’s almost approaching its completion, accumulated more combat experience.

Master it. Even Ramiris’『Labyrinth Creation』can be broken if you use it.

Go! Trample that place and realize the birth of the new worlddestruction of this world!」

「As your will!」

Receiving Velda’s command, Zero stoop up and went away.

Mai too follows Zero and left the place.

Only Lucia and Milim remain.

Velda calmly sat on his throne and laughed a little.

(If Demon Lord Rimuru is alive, there’s no way he won’t move when Ramiris is in danger.

He will guess that I was going to aim for Guy and ChloeRook and Bishop, but he’s wrong.

Instead, I’ll lure him out and get the checkmate in one go.)

Velda was convinced that Rimuru had survived.

However, as he didn’t show himself, Velda predicted that he might not in perfect condition.

Or maybe, he thought that Velda will move in order to end both Guy and Chloe and awaiting the opportunity to strike at such opening?

Either way, Velda has seen his plan.

(As long I’m in this Sky Castle, I won’t lose. On the contrary, I’ll lure Rimuru out and put an end to him.)

That was Velda’s thought.

「It’s a checkmate, Rimuru! Well, how will you move next?」

The Sky Castle with only Lucia and Milim left was filled with emptiness.

In this place, Velda’s laughter echoed a bit.

His laughter became a small signal announcing the war entered its final phase.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Too damn strongーーーーー!!

That Giant Ossan is so absurdly strong!!

I didn’t think that Dagruel has so much power and I’d see Veldora-san fighting with full power.

「Kufufufufu, as expected from Veldora-sama. Even I wouldn’t be able to win against Demon Lord Dagruel with my body intact.」

I’m nodding in admiration as Diablo has the same opinion as me.

As I can feel his confidence from his words, I don’t think that he would lose one-sidedly.

However, for him competing against Veldora in strength is abnormal in the first place. Dagruel is too strong.

I didn’t notice anything that indicated Dagruel would be this strong when I met him before.

Even in the fight just now, Veldora would have lost if he made a mistake.

《Indeed. Without the combat experience from fighting Velgrind, Veldora might have been defeated.》

Ciel-sensei calmly said so, but she seems have not doubted that Veldora would win.

She was probably confident as Veldora’s ability was strengthened by her own hands.

Oh well, that confidence is justified.

Veldrora’s Fertile Paradox has transformed the barren desert into a great forest.

Didn’t he strengthen it too much?

It was refreshing seeing his usual magic experiment.

This ability is too haphazard.

Sacrificing the angel army who was attacking Ruminas’ capital, the land which was poured with excessive energy has splendidly revived.

Absurdly, it seems the angels were not allowed to resist it.

The probability of success was manipulated and it seemed that resisting became impossible.

Indeed, so Veldora-like. What a terrifying guy.

「Kuaahaaahahaa! Actually, I used the magic essence completely! I want a refill.」

Although if he didn’t come back and then demanding like this, I would think that he was such an amazing guy……

I let out a sigh like saying ‘Good grief’, and began transferring my energy to Veldora.

「Hey, the other thing is fine, but Velda won’t know this place right?」

「Of course. Do I look like someone who will make such blunder?」

Veldora-san is so confident.

It’s visible when I asked him, oh well. Let’s think about it when we get exposed.

Besides, Veldora-san’s activity this time is a wonderful work worthy of praise.

He restored the out of order ley line and corrected the distortion of that land.

Thanks to that, there are more cards that this side could play.

He also acted skillfully not to raise Velda’s suspicion.

Therefore, I thought that I will let him taking a large amount of magic essence from me.

Well then, it can be said that the war has completed its first stage.

In Milim’s place, the army lead by Karion had exterminated the angels.

Gobuta was participating in the meeting in Tempest, but it seems that he return back and cooperates with Karion again.

There seems to be some injured soldier from Gobuta’s subordinate, but they recover immediately as a large amount of High Potion seems to be prepared beforehand.

This place will be fine I guess.

Even in Leon’s “El Dorado”, it was a real victory.

While maintaining the barrier, orders were issued on the battlefield.

There’s no problem in here either.

With this, victory in various places except in Tempest is confirmed.

However, Ciel’s strategy is amazing……

What I’m really anxious about is just Gobuta’s fight.

But, there was insurance even for that fight. Because it included the cleaning up afterward as the Devil Lords defeated the Seraphim.

In the worst case, Diablo would go and support them, but I just worried too much.

As for the reinforcement request coming from Mizari, there would be danger for anyone who went there.

However,

《Benimaru is the one who go there. Because Kazarim is related to Gelmudo’s matter.》

Ciel said so, asserting that there was no need for me to issue orders.

There were various things that make me want to go, but it can be said that everything is going as Ciel’s prediction.

From the moment of predicting Dagruel’s betrayal, she prepared Veldora to be lurking in preparation just in case of the worst.

If Veldora didn’t wait for his turn, Shion and the others might not have a hard fight though……

I suspected that this might be a part of Ciel’s strategy so Shion would show some growth.

Well, I don’t think that it’s like that.

Although I was the one who sent Masayuki to various places, it might be just a coincidence that he happened to be there when Hinata facing her crisis.

But, it seems it was Ciel’s intention for the children to go to Ingrassia Kingdom. It’s not surprising as Ciel knows Alice’s Crisis Perception ability and incorporated it into her strategy.

The proof was Kumara going together with the children as their bodyguard.

What caught my eyes next is Masayuki.

That guy’s grasp over people’s hearts seemed to be strengthened to a level that can’t be taken lightly.

I sincerely thought that I’m glad Masayuki is my ally.

However, he helped to wipe out people’s anxiety in various places.

The result is beyond what I intended.

Regarding Masayuki, Ciel didn’t modify his ability, but taking a memo of the acting coaching is Ciel’s idea.

As expected, Ciel had a part even in this matter too.

Seen in this light, it’s terrifying because I see everything is playing right above Ciel’s palm.

Oh well, it’s convenient for me as I want to end this war quickly.

For Velda, I give you my condolences.

There was nothing to say other than he chose the wrong opponent.

Well now, how will he play his move next?

「Well, the battle in various places has ended with our victory, but how do you think Velda will move next?

I don’t think that he will give up in destroying the world, where will be his target next?」

「That’s, it will be the place where Guy, Miss Chloe, Veldora-sama’s sisters are fighting right?」

When I ask him, Diablo answered so.

Yes, the same opinion as me.

Initially, my reason for neglecting the battle in that place is to lure out Velda.

Then, we also moved and waiting for Velda’s arrival or so I thought at first.

《Please wait. Currently, everything is advancing just as planned. As a result, I anticipated a change in enemy’s thought.

Velda has doubted master’s annihilation and convinced that master is alive.

In other words, Velda’s next plan is attacking this city.》

Ciel stated her opinion.

I see, as expected he would feel suspicious.

Because even though I should have ‘died’, my subordinates are still playing an active part in this war.

If you thinking about this, even I will feel something is suspicious too. Oh well, it would be weird if you don’t feel anything suspicious about it.

To predict that it would be like this…… As expected from Ciel-san.

Normally, if I’m the one who came up with the idea and executing it, the differences would be like heaven and earth……

「Then, Velda is aiming at Tempest right?」

《That’s certain.》

「And, his aim is to lure out me who panicked?」

《That’s right. And perhaps, he will send his strongest forces including even anti-labyrinth.》

Anti-Labyrinth ability?

That seems impossible.

That labyrinth is an invincible area, granted with absolute immortality by Ramiris.

As long as we fighting inside it, there’s no way we will lose.

As for the method of capturing the labyrinth, there’s no other way than to destroy the creator that’s Ramiris.

《No. If it spreads it roots in the labyrinth, it’s possible to rewrite the effect. In other words――》

Ah, that’s right.

Hearing Ciel’s explanation, I understood.

Certainly, it may be possible to nullify the labyrinth with such method.

If that comes true, it’s likely that the final decisive battle will be done inside the labyrinth.

I immediately thought about the countermeasures, also I told Benimaru who returned to Tempest about it.

I want to believe that those present there, Ramiris included, will be able to deal with it later.

And then, I converse with Ciel.

「Then, it would be impossible to lure out Velda, right?」

《Yes, I expected so. Conversely, you could say that we succeeded in confining him.》

Exactly as Ciel said, it can be said that Velda shut himself inside the Sky Castle.

Up until now, the location of the Heaven Gate was unknown.

Or rather, due to the raging magic essences in that area, 『Magic Power Perception』can’t be activated smoothly.

For a long time ago until now, the Heaven Gate has been hidden.

However, with Dagruel who is the Gate protector defeated, the disorder of the magic essence was corrected.

What left is only the defense mechanism of the Gate itself……

If it was before, if you aim at the gate, Velda would immediately guess your intention.

And then, before you break the power defending the gate, he would put some countermeasures.

But, right now.

Because of Veldora’s great efforts, the gate has become exposed.

It would be too late for Velda when he realizes our intention as we quickly destroyed the gate and get the checkmate.

An eye for an eye.

As Velda is going to attack my city in order to lure me out, on the contrary, he would also get invaded.

Now that we have shaved off Velda’s forces, we don’t need to defend all of our bases.

Far from hoping for the destruction of the world, he better realize that it was a foolish idea to send his forces gradually to various place.

For the next turn, it would be an attack from our side.

I shall teach him that it’s a mistake if he thinks that it will be his turn forever.

『Testarossa, Ultima, Carrerra――』

By calling my summons, I connected to the three Devil Lords with『Telepathy』.

It’s a secret line made by going directly through “Soul Corridor”.

『This is, Rimuru-sama! You’re safe after all――』

Testarossa answered filled with emotion.

I nodded and ordered those three.

『You three, go destroy the Heaven Gate. Furthermore, conceal the fact that I’m alive, oke?』

『Even though you said so, everyone is convinced that Rimuru-sama is alive……』

『I have asked Benimaru about it, but oh well, just in case. It’s not the time for me to appear yet, so don’t say it’s an order from me. Even if you are asked by other people, it’s fine if you refuse and don’t say my name.』

『Please rest assured in that case. Because it’s only Rimuru-sama who could order us!』

Saying so, Testarossa and co laugh happily.

Come to think about it, those three are under my direct control.

Because they won’t receive an order from other people, I guess I’m thinking too much.

As for Benimaru, it was too late as he knows I’m alive.

While I was thinking of such things to hide my own embarrassment, Testarossa and other seem to have finished their preparation.

And in order to execute my order to destroy the Heaven Gate, they began moving with glee.

Next, the remaining problem is――

There are people who are fighting and causing unnecessary environmental destruction on the northern continent.

「Well, it’s meaningless for Guy and the others to keep fighting. I think someone has to go and mediate between them.」

At the moment I said so.

「Oops, Dia――」

「I have the important duty as Rimuru-sama’s guard. This place aside, oh Veldora-sama, please go and admonish your sisters!」

The victor is Diablo

Veldora tried to push that role to Diablo but was brilliantly ignored.

It was his utter defeat.

Thus, it was decided that Veldora would go and arbitrate the quarrel between his sisters.

Veldora’s expression was overflowing with sadness, but as he had taken a large amount magic essence from me, there’s no need for me to feel any sympathy for him.

I want him to try his best.





Chapter 226: Labyrinth’s Encroachment - Part 1


Veldora kept looking back in my direction many times and then left regretfully while I saw him off.

The one who gave up is the loser. It might not look much, but he had taken a large amount of magic essence from me, so I wanted him at least to try his best in arbitrating his sisters.

Besides, there is no way for other people to arbitrate the fight between true dragons.

Even I don’t want to do it.

That’s why, I sent Veldora off without any compromise.

It seems that Velda’s remaining forces are low.

From Dino’s information, Velda’s executives consisted of 14 people.

After he heard of Dagruel’s defeat, 「Eh, are serious!? For that Ossan to lose……」was his surprised reaction, he then told me the information.

I don’t know whether he’s saying the truth or lying, but I think Velda might not have any more hidden forces. After all, this is not a Shonen manga, there’s no meaning of hiding them till you’re at a disadvantage.

The Four Fiends of the Heavenly Commanders and the Executioners seemed to be Velda’s trusted retainers and his strongest war potentials.

After that, Pico and Garasha, Dino’s fallen angels subordinate.

And then, Lucia.

Only Dino was left among the Four Fiends of the Heavenly Commanders, and 4 of the Executioners were killed by Testarossa and others.

Moreover, in Ingrassia Kingdom, by the Children and Venom’s efforts, also Kumara who dealt the final blow, killed one of the Executioners.

‘Well, I wonder who will make the next move’, while I’m thinking so……

At the same time, it seems there’s movement in each country.

The angels who were showing their last resistance against Karion and others had disappeared suddenly with Teleport.

Even the angel army that attacked “El Dorado” disappeared at the same time.

Apparently, all of angels who were scattered across many parts of the world seemed to have disappeared altogether.

And then, they appeared and combined all forces on Tempest.

Their numbers are around 600.000.

Despite losing 40% of their 1 million, it still boasted an overwhelming prowess.

All of Velda’s remaining forces came attacking in order to crush Tempest.

Accordingly to Ciel-sensei’s prediction.

In this way, although we were victorious in various places, the threat of the angel army still high.

If we carry out the war honorably we will not end up unharmed.

However, this side has the labyrinth.

Gerudo and Gabil were deployed on the surface and have been playing with Dino, the purpose was a sort of diversion.

The purpose is to make Velda believe that it was a war.

In the worst case, we would withdraw to the labyrinth. Like this, the angel army couldn’t take an action as an army.

Just like when the Empire attacked, we can deal with every one of them individually.

Naturally, there’s a problem.

There’s a limit in Ramiris’ ability that is the range where she can create entrances is limited.

She can’t make entrances anywhere she likes.

To be precise, she could link to the previous Dwelling of the Spirit and the 100th floor from anywhere, but you could only get out to the place of your entry.

It’s not possible to enter the labyrinth from Tempest and go out to Ulg Nature Park in Ulgracia Republic.

This is a problem for the adventures and Tempest’s citizens who are taking shelter inside the labyrinth.

Since the entrance and exit are restricted, if it gets blockaded, it means checkmate.

Those with higher rank can use transfer, but there are few people who can transfer among the general public.

Transfer magic is out of the question as there’s a problem about the transfer destination.

More than anything, the use of transfer magic has complex rules; it’s dangerous for normal people to do it inside the labyrinth.

If it’s me and the executives, we could transfer to anywhere freely though……

It’s possible to live inside the labyrinth, but it might be difficult to spent your whole life without being able to go outside.

For such reasons, it was decided that we would defend the entrance till the end.

However, that’s already the end too.

If Velda carries out his plan to lure me out as I expected, he will not stop until he destroys the dungeon.

It’s a pain for the entrance to be blockaded, but that’s after we break through the blockade later.

Let’s pretend to fall for this plan and respond to it skillfully.

Everything is according to our expectation.

The next plan has already been issued.

We will be alright as long as the enemy forces didn’t surpass our assumption, but I wonder how it will turn out.

Benimaru hasn’t recovered his energy yet.

The enemy forces is unclear, I’m a bit worried

However,

「Leave this place to us! Be relieved Rimuru-sama, please see the defense force of the labyrinth.」

I decided to believe in Benimaru’s words.

Well, in the worst case I’ll let Diablo go and we will manage somehow.

It doesn’t mean my uneasiness is resolved, but I can do nothing but to believe in everyone left in the labyrinth.

The plan this time will put the labyrinth in danger.

Therefore, I wanted to remove most of my uneasiness, but the enemy won’t wait.

Thus, while I’m worried, a full assault against Tempest has begun.

　−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−−

Zero gathered all remaining angels in various places after he was given the power by Velda

And then, they all depart to Tempest for a full-scale assault.

Zero is a taciturn person.

And his true identity is not a human.

The leader of the Executioners was Arios, but Zero is the strongest.

That’s natural

After all, Zero was made by Yuuki, he was an artificial human[1].

If you interpret it in a broad sense, it can be said that he’s Vega’s brother.

While Vega was tuned with a pseudo-aggressive personality, all emotions were removed from Zero.

He was created in this world as a combat doll possessing both high computing power and calm judgment not affected by emotions.

Among the hundreds of the handmade dolls created by Yuuki, Zero is the only one that can be called a success.

With a unique combat sense and perfected battle creature body.

Zero evolved as spiritual life form after he got the complete control of the Seraphim power given to him.

And right now.

He obtained the completed Ultimate Skill『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』from Velda, Zero was going to cross another wall.

After Zero’s body mixed with『Evil Dragon Lord Azi Dahaka』, a peculiar change occurred.

It’s a mutation beyond Velda’s expectation.

The mutation is progressing within Zero without being noticed by anyone.

The army of 600.000 angels finished organizing, Zero, Mai, Dino, Pico and Garasha, those five people meet face to face.

The objective is to conduct the last briefing.

As soon as he arrived, all members were gathered by Zero.

As Zero was given the title of the Heaven’s Supreme Commander, Dino and the others don’t have right to object.

Also, another reason is, compared to the time when he met him before, Zero’s aura has this overwhelming coercion.

Thinking that it would be troublesome, Dino has no other choice but to obey him.

「Well, what kind of plan are you going to do?」

「Dino-san, you can’t win if you fight halfheartedly, you know?

If you want to attack, attack with everything in one go. You should concentrate your forces and not give time for the enemy to recover.」

「Don’t be ridiculous.

It’s troublesome because they are hiding inside the labyrinth, I’ve been attacking them steadily, you know?

It’s a plan you know, a strategy.」

To Mai’s retort, Dino boldly says the excuse he already thought out before.

Not hesitating to say what he thinks is Dino’s amazing point.

In fact, he was slacking off but as he said his words boldly like he has one.

「Guh…… how impudent……」

For Mai who is a diligent, honor student type, Dino was an opponent she’s not good against.

Delighted that Mai was unable to refute, Dino tried to pursue further but,

「We don’t have time for a quarrel. Let’s begin the plan quickly.

The order I received was destruction of the labyrinth with all-out attack.

Therefore, even if they were barricading themselves inside the labyrinth, it’s fine.

After all, we’ll destroy the labyrinth, there won’t be any problem.

Quickly sweep aside the surface corps and begin the labyrinth’s invasion.」

Zero stops Dino and told Velda’s order.

Dino and the others have their expressions changing due to the order.

「Hey hey, don’t say an unreasonable thing like that! That labyrinth is impregnable.

It’s not because I failed once, but seriously it’s disadvantageous for us inside.

The enemy is completely immortal and ignored any damage.

Even if we attack with an army, we will be divided and defeated one by one.̍」

「That’s right! Besides, there’s a tough guy among the surface corps.

It’s hardly a joke, to that guy, any attack aren’t working at all.」

「See! There’s also a warrior who can goes toe to toe with this Garasha too.

They are not people who you can easily defeat just by pushing with numbers.」

Following Dino, Pico and Garasha also complain.

In fact, during the attack in the last few days, those two were at loss how to continue fighting against Gerudo and Gabil.

They don’t know how it will be if they release their full power, but it didn’t seem like they could win by fighting normally.

Because of that, the girls quickly objected to Zero’s words of dealing with the surface corps.

As Dino understands the high difficulty of the labyrinth, this was advice from his heart.

His real intention is that he doesn’t want to enter the labyrinth again, but that is something is better left unsaid.

However, the talk has advanced toward the worst direction that Dino worried about.

In short――

「I told you there was no problem. Mai, I transferred the command of the angels to you.

Command the whole army and clean up the surface corps.

If it’s you, there’s correction for long range attacks.

Make the angels fire volleys of Holy Light Sphere from the sky and annihilate the enemy on the ground.」

「Understood. It’s a suitable stage for 『Accuracy Increase』and『Long Range Attack Power Increase』of my ability heh.

I’ll make the angels synced with me with『Connect』, is it fine right?」

